<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e9e41db4-0edf-35d5-b287-f46f104742c4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,choosing occupation is becoming more and more important,
which means it is an essential decision of life.
As you know,choosing occupation is related to many things of life.At the beginning ,we
need to take our education into consideration.You are what you have learned,your knowledge
may really have something to do with your work.Beyond this,we also have to choose a field
where we are interested.It is important to enjoy our work,so we had better choose
a job corresponded to our intrerest.And another thing is your family.you need to make
your family content with your work so that they can let you go for your work freely.And you
have to take responsibility to suppport your family.
For my own part,choosing occupation is not so difficult.What I need to do is to take
everything into consideration,spare noeffort to make everyone satisfied with my work,enjoy
my work life and try to realize my values in my work.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9b0a2313-85de-3f04-871c-1a952e07400f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is of great importance for individuals nowadays to choose a suitable occupation. Considering differences in characteristics and values, people’s choices vary a lot. As is a most common idea, a management position with little pressure and a high salary can be popular among a large amount of people. Meanwhile, there are still some, who are passionate about expanding the diversity of life, tend to try kinds of jobs with relatively low salaries but a lot of excitement, challenges, even danger and a great cost of time. And it is because of these diverse choices, society runs effectively.
I suggest peers consider at first what their interests are about, since there is a saying that if you have a satisfying occupation, half of your life is completed. Then the stability and salary levels come into considering. Only when we are actually doing what we like and like what we are doing can we gain from the job much more than the experience itself.
In the near future, if I have a chance to decide, I will be willing to work as a science researcher. I have seriously thought about society’s needs and my field of interest, thus making it a proper way to go. May this choice be a fulfilling one for myself whole life through.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID adb4a57b-3090-3106-9c9e-2a46e0c3ef4e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is of the importance for your whole life. As a popular saying goes, you are what you do. Once your job has been determined, it would not be easy to change it. Usually, you would do the same job for several years. So choosing occupation must be cautious.
It is necessary for a graduat to take various factors into account. There is no doubt that what you majored in and what you are good at is always the first choice. On the other hand, your majored in is not your limited. You must have the courage of taking a crack to choose other jobs without the first choice. Another gold suggestion is that do not only focus on the hottest occupation. Those occupations are most wanted and usually unavailable. Pay more attention to those occupations that have potential.
As for me, I perfer to choose a occupation I like without much pressure. In fact, I do not care about the salary.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0a49c46a-5558-3321-8883-9e8e76ecaab2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Many students have trouble choosing occupation , in fact ,it is really a very important decision to make in our life , which may determine our happiness in the future.As a result , a lot of relavent factors should be taken into consideration when choosing your occupation.
The first thing that you shoud think about is whether the occupation meets your interest ,in other  words ,you should make sure that you have great passion in your job and you are willing to repeat doing it over and over again in the rest of your life.The second thing that is worthy of consideration is your ability.You must be qualified enough to get the job and have the ability to do it well.After all ,it is exhausting to perform a task that is beyoud your ability and it is shameful to be fired by your boss.In addition ,you should also think about some realistic factors such as the wages and  the health influence your job has on your body.
Concerning all the factors mentioned above ,my choice of ocuupation is a psychological researcher.For one thing ,it is my interest to do research in academia.For another thing ,I have some kind of talent in psychology and I can do psychoanalysis using mathematical approaches.
Wish everybody have a wise choice on your occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 38871a3b-cf04-3830-b7b9-5e9a6ca9e1d1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
No one can deny tha fact that choosing occcupation is an vital desicion in your life.It is not only a matter of what you will do
but also about what accmplishments you can achieve,more importmant,your sence of happiness .Choosing a occupation satisfing
you will make you feel you are part of the world and you are needed by others rather than the victim or failure of social and life,
and there lies the final defination of pleasure ,I think.
There are many things linked to choosing occupation facing to the complex world.When it comes to this point,the first thing come
to my mind is what you are intersted in.Just as the old saying goes,no teacher can be better than interest itself.The second thing that
we'd better take into account is your ability and conditions.Of course,it is unwise to give up to fate facing challenges,but expanding
vanity can burst you either.Sometimes, social condition,perspective of job,wages can also influence your desicion,but in my opinion,
the occupation fitting you is the best.
As for me, I want to choose an occupation interesting me and I believe I can manage it.Perhaps iit might be a little hard for
me,howere,everything is possible,isn't it?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b5744e6d-1a1c-3523-9701-6dcd7df3fa92> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
No one can deny the fact that choosing occupation is a vivid decisions . When it comes to choosing occupation, large quantities of things have to be considered.It never fails to confuse us that whether to find a job which we are fond of or those we can own more money.What is more,where the company is , how long do you want to do it and the rest  have to be turned over.Therefore, choosing occupation is a sort of difficult problem.
Trom the point of my mind,I want to be a businessman extemely. I am keen on various of economic books. Born in a businessman's family I learn plenty of things about business.however, medicial enjoys tremendous popularity. My parents want me to be a doctor very much. to they, they don't want me to be a businessman. but I will go to great lengths to persade my parents to allow me to do what I am extremely fond of.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 61b5b495-1c33-3a8e-a24c-f344717147bd> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a essential decision of our lives for it may decide wheather
we will have a happy life. So how to choose a right job is a critical quality in nowdays.
To choose a occupation which really fits you, you must unify every aspect to make the
decision. A case in point is that your interest, your settlements, and the work environment,
andwhat's the most important, the reality. Maybe you have a dream to be a singer, but your
vioce is not so sweet, then you will haveto face the trueth and begin another career as a
cook or a driver. You should choose your furure by yourself with a sensible mind. But you
also should adopt advice from your parents and your friends,in that they may know you far
more your imagenation.
Frankly speaking, I think I have choosen the right career as a doctor in the future, for
that when I choosed my career in the future, my view was same as my parents'. I think a family's
decision is always right. Now I am learning medicin a pretty good university, and I believe I
will be a good doctor to rescue people'lives.
Now we have already been adults, so it's time to realize what we want and what we can be. Once
you have decided,you should try your best to perform it successfully, do something and get somewhere.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7c03fc03-5820-3c11-bdc1-72727809dec3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the important decisions in your lifetime. Occupation will influence many aspects in your daily life. It may change your living conditions, such as a good occupation will help you earn more money and you don't need to worry  about basic need in life, as a result, you will lead a happy life. But what shall we consider about when we are choosing occupation?
When you stand in a cross road, which way to choose can have a great effect on the later walking. So does choosing occupation. Different occupation is different road that you will walk on. Not only should you consider the road condition, but also which way you want to go. A direction which you have no expectation or interest to go is not the way you can walk on all the time. That's to say, while choosing occupation, you must think about what you want and what you need. Only high income won't satisfy you, even it seems attactive. And another factor which you have to think about is that whether the occupation can do something good for the society and your family members, which means the job should be useful. And I think everyone have something he is good at, such as someone has talent for music, while someone do well in design. You need to consider about it, and choose something is proper for you.
Synthesize various factors, we can get the conclusion that choosing occupation is important and serious. And my choice is to be a good doctor to help people reduce pain and get rid of illness. Maybe when I was not busy, I would open a cafe, for relaxing and entertainment, also offer people a place to reduce their stress. I will make my great effort to achieve my goals.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 162419c0-d635-31c8-bd44-f5f8e9c84632> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is very important, which may has effects on our whole life. As a result, it is essential for us to learn about what we should do when we are choosing occupation.
Above all, interest is one of those things that we must take into consideration. It goes without saying that we will not do our work well if we have no interest in it. In addition, there is no denying that the need of our society is another important factor, for the reason that we should make sure that we can make contribute to our society. What's more, we should choose occupation through which we could help others.
As far as I am concerned, jobs such as being doctors, teachers are valuable. The reason is that such jobs can help people developing themselves and stay healthy. There is no doubt that such occupations needs more hard work, but in my opinion, it worth striving for.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID aa4261df-ef13-38e1-9cef-b35e8175213a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important decision in one's life. A bad job may make one bored and unhappy but a good job may give one not only money but also pleasure.
So if you want to choose a good and suitable job, you need to put a lot of things into consideration.First and most important, I think, you need to find what you are interested in. Take your job as an interest and you will be willing to put your time and your passion in it which can help you succeed. Second, of course you need to think about the salery the job can provide. To be honest, you need to earn your living through your job. Then whether the job can develop wll in the future is important too. If you find a job that is a new and developing one, you may not face the risk of losing your job. And you also need to think of your ability and skill and some other things.
As for me, I’d like to be a farmer in the future. That’s because I love animals and plants and I enjoy sunshine and fresh air.And no matter how our society develops, everyone need to eat food. Farmers are always needed. So I think it's a good choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 339ef6dd-99c8-3a4f-a6a2-e1e57b2f7638> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Today the social competition has been very fierce.And making one's living become harder and harder,
so choosing an appropriate job is very important.It may determine your whole life.So how to choose
a job?
Choosing a job need to consider many facts.First one is interest.If you are fond of this job,you will
devote yourself in doing it.If you don't like it,you may always have a negative emotion when dealing with
your task.Nest fact is about the job's social prospects.If the job you choose is very hot,congratulation!You are very lucky.
Doing this job may bring you a lot of advantages.As for the last one,I think it should be about salary.If you cannot earn enough
money,you can't feed your family.The problem is very cruel.We have to face this.
When asked which job I will choose.I will say medicine without hesitation.Because I like it.And I'm confident that I can do
it well.Besides,my mother is also a doctor,she can help me a lot,so I can get improved quickly.And doctor is a very sacred
profession,I can help a lot of people.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e85d334b-a8bd-3745-b4c1-fe695cefbec6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society, it becomes more and more important to choose our occupation. It seems that it has been one of the keyest part of our career.
If you look forward to have a good occupation, lots of kinds factors should be taken into your consideration. First, the occupation you choose should be in your interests, which can give you motivation to devote into. On condition that you don't love a occupation,there is no doult that you can't do it well. Second, you are supposed to think whether the occupation suit you very well, in other words, your self-factors should be considered when you choose a occupation,such as health, family and so on. What's more, the salary you will get is also an important factor which can have an influence on your choice. So, only you take all of them into consideration can you have an ideal occupation.
As far as I am concerned, I will take the occupation to be a teacher, which can lead me to have a good relationship with a lot of children. On the one hand, I think that we can't emphasize the importance of education too much, I am willing to devote myself into it. On the other hand, I can also enjoy myself during the possession. I believe that I will not regret my choice that Imake today.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3796bd47-212f-302b-8564-a05d6b320f75> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,it's a very important matter to choose occupition.Choosing occupition
is one of the most serious choosen of life.
Many factors must be considered before choosing occupition.At first,the occupation what
you choose to be engaged in is supposed to fit you.Without interest,you won't do anything
good.Besides,the place where you work had better be close to where you live so that you
won't drive to the place far away from you home everyday.Furthermore,the society is cruel.
What I mean is that if you dont's get a good occupition with a high salary,you can't feed
yourself well.Therefore,salary is also an important factor.
As far as I'm concerned,I will choose to be a doctor.My major subject is medical and I
love this job.Above all,it will give me a high salary job,so I want to be a doctor.
I hope every one can get the appropriate job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e52a5912-56f5-3a57-bad2-80edb30aa7ef> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone faces the problem of choosing an occupati0n after graduation from college or university, which plays an essential role in his life. An appropriate occupation makes a man work with not only enthusiastic feeling but also vigor,as well as contribute to the whole society.So,it is one of the most importent decisions during our lives.
To make a wise choice, there are lots of important things which should be taken into consideration.First is the interest-only if you choose your favourate position,can you do your best in your work.Next is what is your good at.for ourselves,having interest at one job is far from the order,in other words,we are supposed to realise what we can do or what we can be qualifide for.Last but not in the least,  the demands of  society is also an element that we should think about.Only if all of the aspects are connected, can a man show his talent and ability to the best advantage. If we can not combine these three aspects, we will  have trouble in choosing an occupation.
In my view of choosing occupation,I have chosen proper one-doctor.But I have to say,doctor  is a job where we must try our best to achieve our duty for we are the one who can rescue the people's life.In spite of hard-working and tiredness,I am still proud of myself and my occupation-So,I believe I can become an excellent doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d4363f60-ccde-3d46-8023-d4d7ce2bb34d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,no one can deny the fact that choosing occupation is one of the most important
determinations in our life.What you will become depends on your choice,and it may make a
difference in your future.
Important as choosing occupation is,varities of things have to be thought about.For example,
as we all know,it's your interest that will lead to your success in your future life, in
this case,our interest is usually the first thing that occurs to us.When it comes to
choosing occupation,what's more,there are many other things having to be thought about.Where
you would like to live,now,is also becoming a serious question to an increasing number of
people.Besides what are mentioned above,there are still something else.
In my personal point of view,it's my best choice to be a dentist in the future.It's not only
a job which will lead to a better life but also a carre which can make me find the value of
my life.It's my dream in past ten years,and it's time for me to make it come true.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2074c809-f4df-3c02-b0e7-054438134d6f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There may be hundreds and thounds of decisions we have to made in our life.But very few of them can decide the final end of
our life.In other word, several decisions are far more important than the others. Choosing occupation is one of them. Once you
choose an occupation, your whole life will attach to it tightly.So we must be cautious to make the final decition.
In order to choose a proper occupation, we have to take a sea of  points under consideration. In general, most normal
people will put the profit and social status in the most important place. After all, our basic need toward a job is that it can
feed us.There are also some ambitious people who consider dream is higher than any others.Although it may means they may be
short of other respects, money ,for example. They persuit their dreams bravely and they got payment, the satisfaction of
persuition. There are more possbility for them to achieve great progress because they do what they love.
As for my choice, I choose doctor as my career of whole life. I suppose doctor is a holy job, for they are called "the angel
in white clothes".I'm not sure what will wait for me in the future. But I will fight to the end to defense my pledge "Save people
is doctor's born job".

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b5f5c92a-b7fe-34bf-be08-591f789a54e1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Life consists of three parts: study, career, and entertainment. Acorrdingly,
choosing occupation should be attached a great importance to, it determines
how long you can go in your own field in the future after all.
Nevertheless, owing to plentiful factors involved in chooing job, we can never make
casual and irresponsable determination. For example, the salary is vatal to our level
of life and should be given due attention. Furthermore, whether it is indeed in consistment
with our major is another topmost priority. In addition, we must take consideration that
whether the distance is enough convenient for us to take a round-way at noon, and that
whether we have sufficient holidays to visit relatives especially our dearest parents.
In my eyes, to be a trustwothy and respectable doctor is my future career I ever dreamed
of most. To start with, it is everlasting sacred occupation which will accord me maverlous
feelingand abundent sense of achievement. Let aside the hardworking, presistence and
concentration it demands of, the life is more than striking. Atmost importantly, the wages
does meets my least request, and the behalf it supplements to my family is really remarkable.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a1e27c86-c5cc-3a42-a66a-32e57c8b05d0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is an important things for us to choose our own occupation in our life.
The occupation you choosed not only can tell you what you wiil do in you life ,
but also can desied what you will be.
Because of these things, there are many matters you should think about before
you choose your occupation,First, you should konw which things do you prefer and
which things do you disguist.If you have a job which you are interesting on it,
you will find it that hard-working means enjoying yourself.It has no doubt that
you can achieve you dream easily on the condition that you love your job.Then,
if the occupation suit your characters or not is also a question for your choosing.
For an exmple, it is terriable for a man who has no braveties to be a policeman.
Last but not least, skills for the occupation can let you think over that you will
choose it or not. Not everyone suits every work. Some works, such as doctor, request
a lot of konwlege and highly trianed before you can get it.
As many young people, choosing occupation is a problem for me. As far as I konw
myself, I choose doctor to be my job. I believe I can let my dream come ture upon it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b2dd6234-f8b8-3f9a-ab94-5bad9544e9dd> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After seven years, we will graduat from college, and we have to choose a job
to get money for our family.It is an important choice to our life.
To find a job which is suited to us, we should conside lots of factor. For
example, whether the job can get enough money or have enough free time. what
is more, we also should think about a question that" Do I realy love this job?"
As we know, "One enjoy his work, one keep happy." so a job which we love must be
long-term work.
I want to as a dorctor to help people away from ill and pain, and keep health.
I think I will enjoy this job, beacause I feel happy when I see people's smilling
face.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 20a4cdd8-a8e4-344e-8fcf-2e2f878590fa> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Just as we all know,now, choose the occupation is a person to face one of the many problems.When we grow up day by day,we must spend much time to choose our own occupation,because choosing occupation is a serious decision for our life.
To make a wise choice,many things should be taken into consideration. The first one is your own interest.The love for your job is the best power to help you do well in your job and get a perfect future.What is more, the people can show his talent and ability to the best advantage in what he is interested in.The second one is the demands of people and society,because if no one need your ,even if the job is wonderful
,you will feel you are useless and the job has no sense.Finally,we should listen to the suggestions carfully,especially from our parents.
About my own occupation,I want to say I like treating the patient and make them have a nice body,so I choose becoming a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 475bd981-fe24-33f0-825e-12d3a658df40> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
What is known to us all is that choosing occupation is a significant choice in our lives.We need job to
support our familys and to realize our dreams.Therefore,we must put emphasis on it and turn it over cautiously.
I take the notion that we must take the following factors into consideration.
Topping the list,I think is interest.As an old saying goes,interest is the most important teacher.If we habour
the passion to take up something,we would be filled with love and would find the jod is more easier and enjoyable.
Besides,we must cosiderate the reality.There is nothing ambiguous about the fact that the occupation we choose
must be enough to make ends meet and support the familys for we are not live alone.Last but not least,we can choose a
job which is benefical to the human beings.We are the happy generation because the last generation create a
peaceful and wealthy environment for ous.We need to try our best to repay them and devote ourselves to buliding
a more harmonious socirty on an individual level.
My choice is a doctor.I feel content about doing something meaningful .And whenever I sense that I will use
my ability to cure the patients in the future,I feel that my life full of value.Another reason is that I love
my familys so I want to let them more healthier and live happier.
In sum,choose your suitable occupation and devote yourself to it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b5776f7b-88cf-32e6-bb09-3d5ae86654cf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Now，as we heard，occupation choosing is one of the most important choice in our life。It is reletion in our futher。
We are often heard occupation choosing has many aspacts。Firstly，we need consider the money the enployee pay. It is the cause we stay here. And if we are pdid low, we should consider changing joy.
However,only basing on this, it is far away from our imaganation. We should also think the interest of our own. Think that in a company you dislike, if you could make a difference. So the interest is
important. Beside, we should also thihk our ability. If you have little technoledge about the work you do, you will become very tendence. That, can you finish it, of cause you can not. According to,
that there is a more important aspact is if it is hot work you will do. A joy may hot only several years. But what is then. SO we should also considerit.
In my opinion, just be on my interest, and  having ageneral wage is ok.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7116db27-b10b-302f-a757-ce7af46ba2ba> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that choosing occupation is one of the most important things in our life. A good occupation can not only provide you with a great salary, but also a feeling of happiness from your achievement.  Choosing a suitable job is seemed to be more important in this age filled with competition.
There are lots of reasons should be considered when you are choosing your occupation. first and the furthest , you should follow your own hobby. That is to say you should choose something you like as your career so that you can put all your heart in it. Second, I n my opinion, you may choose one in which you are gifted. Hard-working can only works when combined with your talents. You cannot do something well if you do not have any talents . Last but not the least, your choise should be able to support your daily life. You cannot live without enough money in this society. Some subject can only be regarded as a hobby but not an occupation.
As for me,  a boy spent his childhood in hospital, take it for granted to choose the medicine as my occupation. I would like to save more individuals' lives and make my limited contributions to the society. I have chosen my career and I will never give up my choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID afcdc4d7-2ace-3cd4-aef9-a85ef9cec246> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Most people spend their most valuable and precious time on their job. So it's critical and vital to make a decision.Unluckily,it's also the hardest decision during one's lifetime,noticing there is no one of.
Its difficulity partly results from its various factors which we must take into account to make sure it's a round-body decision.Let me show a few of examples here.The most people may put the salary in the first class. Because money play a important, not only of couse, role in your latter life.Most people can only make it by working hard and get their salary. Even though money is important, I do not think we should think of it so highly. After all, there is another decisive one called job quality. We will spend the majority of time on our job. So what if you choose a job with bad work conditon or a bad grace? I do not think you will contribute your best to your group, which also means you may never get a good position. A job with perfect quality is not equal to a job you like. One can develope love to his job in day-by-day contact. Not evertone share the same point on that what the most decisive factor is. Just choose your perfect.
From my own part, I will choose a reserch-related job by considering folling factors.
At first, a research job do not require too much interaction with various people which is what I am bad at. I can interact with those who are similiar with me in some degree only.
Then, a successful research job need  hardworking which can push me forward contineously.The last one is simlpe but vital. I love physics and am willing to distribute my lifetime to it. This is a strong reason, isn't this?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9ed91958-b4d3-3309-a3d2-1c15595a4117> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us all,choosing occupation is one of the most important things in our lives.Before entering university,we spent a lot of time deciding what can we major in in the university,in that every decision about our majors can change our lives.
When we are choosing our occupation,there are plenty of factors that we should think of.First,we should choose an occupation which we are really interested in.As the saying goes,interest is the best teacher.Only we are intersted in our major,can we treat it as a hobby instead of a task.In this case,we may pay more attention on our occupation and devote all our love and enthusiasum on it.Second,when choosing occupation,we should consider whether this job is needed by sociaty or not.All of us should be awared that no occupation can live without sociaty.If we choose an accupation which the sociaty is eager for,we can make a living easily.Finally,we should obby the law and moral rules.No one can escape from the net of law if he do something illegal.
As far as I am concerned,I make my decision to be a doctor.I have dreamed of being a doctor for many years.I want save people,and improve myself.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 18069a6a-a0b7-3ec4-aa71-1e5a13b24b63> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,great importance has been attached to choosing occupation,since it's a signaficant decision for the entire life.Various factors account for the choice and therefore,should all be taken into consideration.
Personally speaking,what does matter in a occupation is my interest in this yield.Or to say,I would follow  my heart and choose what it belongs to.My reasons are as follows.Firstly,only when I'm interested in the occupation,can I be willing to delicate myself to it,which converts a job into something called career.Secondly,with passion and love,when l am confronted with difficulties,I would regard them as challenge instead of setbacks.Last but not the least,interest and passion suggest my capability to out stand in this yield,which can definitely contribute to my development in the occupation that I has chosen.
To sum up,when making the tough yet inevitable choice of occupation,I would consider whether I have interest and passion for a certain occupation or not.Salary,vacations and other objective factors are less important.Because when I am doing what l do want,the work itself is the best reward.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 33b353b1-4c85-30a5-9160-6ab1b56675d4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
If we have a good and proper occupation has great relationship with the level of our life and weather we will enjoy ourselves from the work.How important it is to choose occupation for us during our life.
How to choose the best occupation? We need to consinder many factors.For example,money is the factor many people may think first because money is so important for our daily life which we can't leave.Competation is also what we need to think about.The job with high competation is a good one of course,but if you also take part in,you will know it is so hard to stand out in so many competitors.What's more,the most important factor is intrest.There is a famous saying that：Intrest is the best teacher.Only you choose the thing you like,can you spend all you efforts on you job and make great prograss.
I have chosen to be a doctor.The most factor to let me make this choice is intrest.I want to konw the secrets of our body and creatures,and I am looking for the happiness to save a life and cure people's disease,even only decrease other's hurt.The competition of doctors is not so hot compared to others like IT,so it's easier to have a good job.What's more,the page of doctor is not so bad,does it?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5397b61b-a1eb-38dc-9e46-85be993c2fae> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in all of our lives. Nowadays, with the deueloping of the society, choosing a property occupation become more and more important. So we should consider many factors when we choosing occupation.
Here are some factors about choosing occupation. First and for most, whether we like the occupation or not is the most important factor. Only when we like our occupations, will we won our success. Then we should choose one occupation which we are able to bear it. If we can not bear our occupations, we will not have any achievement. Last but not least, we should choose one occupation that fit us.
As for my choosing, I choosed to be a doctor, because I want to be a doctor and my parents and my grandparents are not healthy enouth, I want to try my best to care of them. And I think that throuth my hard learning, I will have the ability to be a good doctor.
Above all, I think a occupation which proper us is the best one.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8f49867a-bdbb-30cd-93eb-00eec410f0e7> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
we can live a better life if we can have a good job.so choosing a job is important to us.we
should be wise to choose a job.
a good job is a good life.when we choose occupation,we should think about the fllowing factors.
first,we should choose a job in which we can enjoy our life.when we take on the job,we should not
give up our hobbies and interest.second,we should think about whether we can get a good reward
from the job.if a job is good to uor development in the future,we can choose it.
I want to be a doctor,not only for myself but also for my parent.my family is poor and my father
is sick.if I am a doctor,I can look after my fatherand save a lot of peple.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cf10a8f8-a80f-3829-bc73-0ff9e9053152> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupations have a variety of types, How to choose a suitable occupation is the most
important thing for a person.
Choosing occupation is a important decision of ones life . Choosing a suitable occupation is
concerned with the quality of life and the happyness in daily life. If you choose a suitable
occupation, you feel satisfied with life. Otherwise, you will think life is helpless and not
have inspiration.
Choosing occupation have to think about many elements, like payment, reputation, social satus......
But it is not the work which can make more money or have higher social satus or have more reputations
is the best choice. A occupation suits you is the best to you.Thereby, choosing a occupation which is
most suitable to you is important.
In my opinion, choosing occupation should think over three elements.First of all, whether the occupation
suit you is most important.Secondly, social status also is important for you. A good social status can make
you feel satisfied.Last but not least, payment is a important element too. According to think about three
elements, you can choose a occupation suit you.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6e8351d5-6100-3370-bdb3-d5da16438ce0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is one of the most important disicion that we will make in our life. Facing the moderm sersiaty,what should we think about when we make the9 choice?
FIrst of all,wo should know who we are.This is not a simple question to anwser.Everyone should know himself well so as to find out what he wants, what he can do and which occupation is the most suitable.This point contains major, skill, hobits, and lifestyle. Second we should consider about our income.Money is the basic element that keep us alive nowadays.Third, as a human being, we should make sure that the job we do benifit someone.We can hardly become a super hero but we can do something tiny but good.
As for me, I determind to be a dentist after I greduating for university. I think it is a really meaningful occupation and in that case, I will do my best realize my dream. In addition, I give best wishes to those who are facing the choice and may they can all get satisfying jobs.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 046dd773-963b-364d-b6a6-ec9b55c3fc41> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all known, it is very importent to choose our occupation in our life.At  the  same time, there are many elements
to consider whene we choose our occupation.
First,we must love the job that we want to choose.Because we can get very large chievement in our filed only when we
love our job very much.It is very pained to do the job that you do not like at all.
Second, the payment must be consider whene we choose our jib.Without a good payment, we could lose interst in our job.
If we can not support our family with our payment, it is impossible to continue to work.
Third, if we hope to have a good emotion whene we are working, we need to pay attention to the working condition. Your
workmates also are considered, because your workmates affect, to the extent, what you will be.
Forth, where the comply are should be considered by ones who have bought new houses. We need to care about our family,
whene we work.
In my opinion, the working condition is the most important to consider,whene we choose my occupation. In a  good
condition I will feel fun everyday ,so I am just welling to work forever. Of course, I must support our family, at that
point, I also consider the payment.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5d3298e6-bcaa-3b18-ba92-673d22d4d272> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone in the sociaty should have a job. So choosing occupation is a most important choice in your life.
In choosing occupation, you should think of many elements, such as your hobby, the salary, how busy the work is and so on. Only
finding a balance between these elements can you really enjoy your work and your life.
My choice is to be a psychologist. I like psychology since I was in high school,I think it is full of mistery. What's more, mental
health becomes more and more important in the morden sociaty. Facing the pressure in life,work or study, a large number of people
have trouble in their heart but most of them have no good idea to deal with it. I'd like to help these people, in which way can I
also learn more about people's spirit. In a word, it is an ideal occupation for me, at least I believe that.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0d2adfa3-087a-31b7-a961-144631cafa5b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
According to an authoritative survey organized by CEM, the short for Chinese Educational Ministration, there is about 40 percent of
graduated students who can not find their jobs. So, we can easily make the conclusion that choosing occupation has been a hot spot
of modern society.
We can not emphasize the importance of choosing proper work too much. Personally, I believe there stands several factors for finding
a willing occupation. For one thing, what you learned during the period of university is vital. It shows your advantageous region after
all. As for working place, a wonderful city should be taken into consideration when you seek your job. For another thing, the salary
can never be ignored. The aim for searching a work is to make a living by your own. If it does not pay what you need for leading the
daily life, to some degree, it is better to give up than stick to working.
From my point of view, I prefer to work as a doctor. Doctors shoulder the great responsibility to rescue patients. To be private,
I am confident that it can offer me and my family a life filling with unforgettable experience.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4931816b-4d7c-31e5-b3d3-e6a76583f864> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
chossing occupation is a big decision we made in our life.once we make the choice, it does not mean we can only do this job,but usually the first job determind our life direction in some degree.
when we choose an occupation,many fectors should be considered.the first one ,also the most important one ,i think ,is chossing a job which we are interest in .our interest will give us more passion when doing our jobs.our ability in working are also very important.we should choose an occupation we are capable for, only with interest is not enough when doing a job.  then we should think about the prospect of the occupations.if we can not see an development of this occupation in the future,forget it,or we will be regretful.last but not least,think about the salary,our biggestgole in working is making a living,so don not ignore the money problems.
i have already made my choice .i want to be a medicine doctor.i think it is an coccupation with great honour.i want to help others to release from the pain.i know it is not easy to do it well,but i will try my best.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e9b7307e-afd5-3a86-a591-3b6b16667ed4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As it known to us, the occupation selection plays an essential role in everyone's life. To many of us, only
one job would be chosen during our lifetime. So how to choose a proper job must be fullly considered.
Many specific things should be thought about before choosing occupations.
The first maybe your own interests. As the old saying goes, intersets are best your teachers. So when you
are faced with occupation selection, the most curial thing you need to consider is: Would I get addicted to this
job or was I born for this job?
And second, abilities. Imagine that when you get interests in a job that you have been looking forward to for
years, nevertheless, you can do nothing but stand around and just watch it. That totally make no sense. So, to
avoid that ridiculous sence, you must train yourself strictly for your job.
Last but not least, no matter what job you have chosen,it must be useful for the whole country and human beings.
That's the ultimate goal of your life and job.
As for me, when I get to choosing a job, what I think about most is: Am I suit for this job? Because I am a
medical student which means I must be well trained before I meet my first patient. What I need to do now is learn
about the medical knowledge in details and pay more attention to occupation selctions. After all, we must be
considerate when it comes to choosing occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a50e6a2c-f0c2-33e9-a00d-7f4575da555e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that occupation plays an important part in our life . It is never too careful to choose a ideal job . What you choose today can influence you future . Therefore , we should be careful when we choose our occupation .
Considering various factors ,we want to choose a suitable job . What is the most important is that when we choose occupation we should obey to our hearts , which means that you should choose the one you like . Because if you choose a job you dislike , I don't think you can take the passion to complete it . It is possible that you will give up halfway . Secondly , we should absorb our parents' idea . It is obvious that our parents have more acknowledge about the society even if we don't understant what they do today . Last but not least , we should consider the employment prospects . If you want to make more money or want to make more contributions to our society , there is no reason for you to ignore it .
In my opinion , we should make contributions to the development of our Medical Science . Thus I choose to be a doctor , a job not making much money but can resolve the pain . Perhaps it is not a very great job , but I still think it is the one that is most suitable for me to give my energy to the country . I can foreknow that it is so happy when I solve the problem the patients face . Only in this way maybe I can sense the really pleasure .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2a53a1b3-f0ef-3578-a42e-bbd6c06b8c70> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
For everyone, choosing occupation is a very important determination of our life.It decide what we will do in the future and have a great influnce on whether we will succeed in the future.
Of cause,there are many things we need to think when we choose our occupation. In my opinion,interest is very important when we decide what we will do in our future.If we do not  like the occupation that we choose,we may have no pation to do the work and even do not achieve our dreams.BUt if we have great interest about the occupation,we may work hard day by day and succeed in the future.Besides, when we choose our occupation,we should think about what we good at.
My choosing occupation is math,because I like it very much and I am good at it when I am in the high school.I think I will succeed in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3cc19aff-1393-3963-b967-a82a2f9334d0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, an occupation which is approriate for ourselves and we are interested
in is of great importance for us. As a consequence, every one of us want to choose an
good occupation.  Choosing Occupation has aroused public attention .
There are kinds of factors accounted for choosing occupatian. As the old saying goes,
interest is the best teacher. So, first of all, our choice must be based on weather we
like this job or not rather than attitude of oher person. What is more, salary is some-
thing we must ture over. We all take on the responsibility to bring up the family in the
future. We can not deny the fact that an occupation with good salary can give us a much
more high-qualified life. Last but nt the least, some people choose their occupation under
the direction of their parents or teachers because they have no ideas about what they like
and what they suit for.
As far as I am concerned, doctor is the only occupation I would like to choose from the
bottom of my mind. Even though it can not give me a great number of money, being a doctor
can make me feel satisfied. It is so nice a feeling to see people recover from the disease
under my help and treatment. Never will I give up my dream to be a doctor because I think
the happiest thing in the world is to bring health to others. I will persuit the thing I
like without hesitation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 319a6c00-5050-36e2-b1c0-22d6dc372a70> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are lots of important decision we should to make in our life, and choosing occupation
is most typical one of them. As a saying goes "good beginning is half done". So choosing a right
occupation also make great senses in your life.
When it concerned to how to choosing a suitable occupation, there exist quanlity of factors to
to think over.
In my opinion, the first one you should take into account is your own interest. Only when
you engage in something that you show great interest in, can you go further. Then you
should analyze market requirement carefully. Once you know will about market damages, you can choose a occupation that you are interest in and you can to find a job on it easily. Next you
should think over is the occupation you choose should have its own development potential
Choosing a occupation that are potential, you can have a wider space to improve yourself.
In this way you future will be brighter than you thought.
As for me, I'll fix my work field in computer science. I am crazy about it and now I major
in it. After studying it almost one year, I found computer science is a filed that is filled
with magic. Buried myself in it I can rise my passion all the time. Because it just something
that I find for over years. Besides, it a occupation that the market needs all the time and
its potential is beyond our imagination.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e8726b4d-4fc5-3af9-8e52-83407d5ddf91> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation,which can determain what kind of life we have in the future,is one of the most vital choices in our lives.Therefore, we have to consider it seriously.
We should think of nearly all kinds of factors when we choose our occupitions,such as the nature of the work,our abilitise,interests,salary and so on.Because all the above can influence our work enthusiasm and work state,which can directly determine the quality and achievement of our work.
As for my choice,I would like to be a doctor.To be honest,becoming a doctor is not my first choice since that I don't really like the major of medicine.Studying medcine can be very difficult so I have to work hard,always more hard than students in any other majors.And What's more,it sometimes even make me feel sick.Worst of all,I don't like studying medcine! I always believe that a person should study a major he has a passion for so that he is long to try his best to do well in it.Only in this way can we get good grades and then be successful in our career.However,It's a pity that I have not chose my favorite major.But I am trying to accept this major and persuade myself to fall in love with it gradually.It is not because being a doctor will bring me high income,nor because it is a sacred occupition which can win good repucation and respects from others.It is only because I want to do something to help others by bing a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 643d2ef1-e702-3e33-959b-69ac221e3b15> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Yes, I have to admit choosing an occupation is a significant decision in one's life, and it is worth careful consideration. A job is not as easy as it is spelled. It is related to your happiness, your sense of satisfaction, and your final achievement in about two thirds of your life. To choose a job, you need to consider factors from all aspects. For instance, will you have to worry about how you can earn a living, that is to say, can your income support you and your family? Are you interested in your job or does your job have anything to do with your major in college? Will you be exhausted after work? Will your job even endanger your life? When choosing an occupation, please integrate all factors above.
However, I don’t mind these so-called necessary factors. I just want to be a tramp. I don’t care whether I can manage to make a living, or whether it can win me fame and social position. I just want to be myself. I can go to every corner of the world, and appreciate beautiful views that others have never seen. I can sit in warm sunshine for a whole day, without considering when I shall begin my work. I may hunt, beg, or steal occasionally to keep myself alive ,but I will never sacrifice my human dignity. By sleeping in the open air, I get far more closer than most people have ever do. Poor as I am, I can flee from the thousands of anxieties which afflict other people. People often speak of tramps with contempt and put then in the same class as beggars, but how many of us can honestly say that we have not felt a little jealous of the simple way of life and their freedom from care?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4d2f6857-fe16-3376-bc94-6dbc98e61188> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,there are many different jobs in the society.And everyone is responsible for his own occupation.A job is a
tool for you to make a life .So choosing occupation is a very significant choice for everyone .And even,it will change your life.
Obviously,you should pay attention to many details when you choose occupation.The first and the most important thing is that
you should make a choice according to your interest.It is said that the interest is the best teacher.So you can't make a
decision without thinking of you interest.The second is the future of your job.The interest is not the only one you should
consider.Things can be nearly perfect when it's combined with the life.But in a word ,whatever you do or whatever you want ,
working hard is the key to succeeding .
My choice is to be a doctor.Someone may say to be a doctor is very tired and it's difficult to be a good doctor.But what I
want to say is that I just want to let more people keep away from disease so I decided to be a doctor.I looked forward to being
a doctor when I was young .And I will try my best to make my dream come ture!I believe myself!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2dd90409-edea-36af-9581-6b379d98f42d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As the saying goes well "It is unfortunate for a man to choose a wrong job,and it is same with a women choosing a wrong husbend.So choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our life.
Since the thing is so vital,I think everybody would take all aspects into consideration.The most important one,I think ,is interest.People usually like doing something they love,they would get passion from what the are interested in.As a result,they won't get bord, instead they will make some differeces.The salary might be the second one comes to one's mind,when they choose a job. A good salary could garantee the basis of your happiness life. Thought many people think money is not a good thing, meanwhile ,they have to accept men cannot live without money in nowaday's socity.
When I was a little child, I dreamed to be a scientist.Because science is very fascinating,and I am will to devote my whole life to it.so I study hard,and try my best to realize my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ecf1e3e5-c6bf-3d7b-bc99-a0dca17c1481> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Recently,there is a heated debate in our school about how to choose occupation.As we all know,choosing
occupation is one of the most important decision in our life.The factors for choosing occupation can be
listed as follows.
Firstly,we should choose the occupation which we like.This is the basical factor.No one would put his
fashion into a work that he does not like.Secondly,our occupation should be related to our major. Different
majors we learned in university can contributes to different occupations.The last but not the least,we
should consider about the Market Requirement.Sometimes this occupation is full,we should not follow others
to choose it.We can choose other occupations that have light future.
As far as I am concerned,I would like to be a dentist.I think dentist is really meaningful in that case.
In the end we are mightily and merely people,each with similar needs.Find the good occupation,and praise it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID aee568b0-8033-3edc-b74c-6e61fcefa237> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As everyone know ,occupation choosing is a great important decision in our life.we have to decide what we will do in our whole life before we take some acts.In other words ,we must have a aim first and then can we make every efforts to achieve it.
But it is not a easy thing to ensure what you will do.Your interest,your major,your familys'opinion and the rest are all the thing about which you must consider.Even more ,you must think about the transport around your company.It means a lot for you to take it seriousfor it's not a easy thing to change your job in a short time.what's the most important,you must choose a occupation which you have interest in.Other wise ,you will lose the confident and the motivation to finish your job. It also have good effect on you to choose a job which is connected with your major in your university.
I'm major in medcine.It means that I will become a doctor in the future.It is a difficult way to go because we have to face with all kinds of patients and even dangerous.Few days ago, a doctor was killed curelly by an illness.I heard about that and I was scared.But I will never be regret of my choose.Constantly ,I will do my best to become a well prepared doctor and dominate myself to medcine.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 901ce30e-f13f-3ae5-a0ee-ae4a3b0e9772> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a important decision during our life time. Good occupation can make you a more comfortable life to live and make you feel happy. But what can we do to choose a proper occupation? I think we may think about the things as follows.
First, what we should think most is what we really like to do? In other word, it is what is you hobby. We should think about it , for only we choose a job we like can we live a happy life. If the job we don't like we may feel boring and lose our heart to live a comfortable life. Second, we should consider about what style of the life do you like. That means do you need a large income or just proper income which just for you life spend. Different occupations have different incomes. This is really a big question. You need to think twice before you make a decision. The last but not the least, you should also consider what you parents hope you do in the future for they may give you some suggestion which is more proper for you.
I think I want to be a doctor in the future. They can make people live longer. It is really a good job. I hope I can be one of them.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 521de596-c8ca-335c-80b4-9da7bd0526fd> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all known , choosing occupation is a very important decision in our whole life . So we must
be cautious when we chose our occupation .
To make a wise choice , many important points should be taken into consideration . Firstly ,
we are ought to think about our interests . Only when we love our occupations , can we show our
talent and ability to the best advantage . Secondly , our occupations should meet the demand
of people and society . There is no doubt that everyone wants to find a job easily . Thus ,
our occupations have to meet the demand of people and society . What's more , we also need think
about our ability . After all , our occupations can't beyond our ability .
As for me , the choice is to be a doctor . In my view , my choice meets all the points . And I will
do my best in the furture .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 40891f59-fe43-38e2-8b64-40c6b05efa6b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In our life,there will be a lot of chooses  big or small that will make us go to different places.
When we still were children, our parents do the choices that they thoutght right for us.May be we did
not 
like parents' choice,but we did not have another choice. But now,things have changed.Because we
have grown up,we must do the most important choice by ourselves--Choosing occupation.
In fact,it is necessary to think twice when we choose occupations. In the first place,we shoul
start from our hobbies.Only you love one thing , you are ethusiastic to do it and want to do the best.
Next,you must guarantee your occupation is legal.Do not choose the bad occupation. We only have one life,
wu should not do something that will let ourselves down. And then,If you want,you could choose some
occupation that are beneficial to people. And last ,what also need think is the pay.Though the money is
not the most important,we still need it.  It is our responsibility to support our parents and give them
a happy old life. We need support our family too.
For myself , I choose becoming a doctor.Many people say doctors are so tired and greed.But I do not
care these,because like it.My dream always is I can cure people' illness one day.
Everyone has a choosing.If you listen to your heart,it will be the best.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fee04abc-e2a7-32b2-8c8d-93bb42569b43> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
choosing occupation takes a significantly position in our life as it may
sometimes determine our directions in our overall career,what is more ,it
can even be a turing point in our life.
like doing other things,finding jobs need methods and skills,mainly
including  the following three respects.
first of all is getting to know yourself,including your knowledge,skills,
characters,hobbies,health and so  on.  before finding jobs,you must have
a comprehensive understanding of yourself,and you must know what kind of
job is proper for you.
secondly,you should get to know  your selected jobs and industries,including
the content and category of the job,as well as the  requests for the  basic
qualities.
thirdly is the self recommendation.in fact,finding a job is just like promoting
the sale of goods.you must tell customers how good is the quality of your goods
well as the price if you want them buy yours.similarly,you should promise that
you are able to do the job well while your require is reasonable as well when
hunting jobs.
only by doing so and recommend yourself can others hire you.and i believe i
can do it well after my graduation.and ,of course,to be a doctor is my dream
which i  am always commited to.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 776b5a10-db34-304c-be9c-10d2ef291744> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone will face the problem of choose occupation no matter which statement he or she is in the society.The choivce of occupation is very important in one's life .And the choice may influence his whole family.
There is no doublt that the choice of occupation is very hard.Because many factors should be thought about and most of us want to get a great and honnorable job.
In my own opinion,the first factor that we should consider is the job should cater to our interst as good as possible.When we make the final decision,we may do the job for a long period even our whole life.If we don't like the job ,the time  of one day will be like one year.And we will feel especially boring .Secondly,we should consider the true ability of ourselves.We should do something that we can do after some hard work.We shouldn't choose one job that we can never do it no matter how hardworking we are.I don't believe in the wonder,because all of the wonders are made by our hands. Thordly,dream should be connected with the reality.We cannot live in the dream all of the life.We have the responsibility of supporting the family and devote our strength to the society.We shouldn't just be a daydreamer.Last but not the least,the choice of the occupation should be legal and we should follow the professional principle and never break the law.
As for me,one medical student,I may be a doctor or a teacher.But there are changes everyday.I don't know what will happen the next moment.But when I chouse my occupation,I will choose the one I like most and be satisfised with by most people in my family.Besides,I want to realise my social value and my dream through my own choice.I want to save people as more as possible.Thus I want to be a doctor.
In a word,choosing occupation is of great importance and we should balance everything and consider many factors.Maybe the first choice is the final choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f07ebb7b-a583-331e-995c-5d19285bad1c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With an increasing number of unemployment we pay more attention on chossing occupations.
Choosing occupation plays an importment role in our lifes.Because a carrer can change the way you live,show you a brand-new sightview to the world and add some joy in your life.
Now, chooseing the occupation is one of the many problems a person must to face。So what factors should we make it a consideration to determining.There are so many that wo can not count it clearly,such as the opinion of our parents,the futhru of the occupation and the income of it.
Finally, clear the professional, you've got to work hard, try to find a satisfying job.
My choice is to be a doctor.It can impire me now and then and when I help a sick I am happy to see their exciting eyes.And I also hope everyone is healthy and can live in the world moe pleasent.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e3b03dd8-93db-3a25-8bad-2211f06f7481> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know that it is important that you make the right choice to do your job. We everyone have our own dream to achieve.
We go to school to grasp knowledge mainly to improve our level of many aspects.And then we want to get a job which is suitable
for our own tastes.We live in the world and we have the duty to make it more beautiful. Our occupation just provides us with
the chances to make the common dream come ture.We cannot deny the fact that choosing occupation is important to each of us.
There are many elements influencing we choice of our job. Frist of all, as an old saying goes like this: Knowledge can change
your life.It gets it.What we major in college can influence mostly what we choose in the future. We spend much time and energy
studying the knowledge, therefore we have grasped the basic of the occupation. Secondly, interest is the greatest teacher in
the world. We should choose the job which is suitable for our own tastes. Last but not least, our parents' views can influence
our choice.We should have the right view that the job is fair.There are no difference among the jobs if you try your best to
do it.
From where I stand, I want to be a doctor in the future just based on my interest and my major. I will try my best to study
medicine to grasp the knowledge.No matter what you choose, it is necessary that you make great effforts to mke our dream come
true. All in all,One can become the master of his trade provided he is diligent and tries hard. One may distinguish himself in
any trade.We should try our best and make a good chioce.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3badd9a7-1282-3848-a7fb-62b8179fb20e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is very important to everyone, and the choice of occupation is a major decision in life.A good occupation may means a happy rest life. As the saying goes, men are afraid of the wrong profession, women are afraid to marry the wrong husband. To be honest, women are also afraid of the wrong profession, such as myself.
When you are choosing your occupation, various factors must be taken into account. Actually, there are too little suitable occupation to a man, no matter who you are. First of all, we must think about the mojar we had in college. As a medical student, suitable occupation to me seemed more less than others. And then, your own charactor is a very important factor. For example, can you imagine a girl who is very shy being a policewoman or a reporter? Last but not the least, you must have all the qualities the occupation require for.
Of course, I want to be a doctor, otherwise I might not be a medical student. And I wanted to be a doctor from I was only a very little girl.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 90ac9ad4-1dac-3476-b75c-25734d95fe15> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an invital decision in our life, especially for us uiversity students.In order to get good jobs in the
future,we students study around 20 years to get many qualifications,the knowledge and the skills we need in our uncertain jobs.
While choosing occuoation,we need to think about too many things.
I always hear that I have too consider many other things if I do that job when I'm facing a job seeker.In my mind,what the most
people think of when they shoose their workare nearly these things.The first, we'd better choose a job which is conform to the
profession we studed in the school.Beacause it would be pretty hard for us if we choose a job unconformed to the profession we
studied,and we have to work hard to learn many other new things to grasp the work.The second,many people choose their job nearly
according their interests,and they will never do the work they don't like at all.The third,a few people consider more about their
wages.And the forth,many people consider more about the value about the job and so on.
As far as I'm concerned,the first thing Iconsider of is that if the jod is conformed with the profession I studied.And it is a
little hard for me to receive a job which is strange for me.Secondly, the wage is pretty important for me. Because I have to eran
enough money to deal with my living expenses,and I have to make my child receive a good education in the future.And then,it's a
little better if the place of my job is not fao from my home.Last but not the least, I would like my job very much if it attach
my interast.
i hope that we will choose the jobs we like inthe future!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID da3cbc92-5462-32a1-acfa-d415b57735bf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is an important decision in our life. Everyone in the world has his own life goal, and the
right occupation choice must be an excellent way to realize it. As a result, we should pay more attention to it.
There is no doubt that we should think about virous kinds of respects when we choose occupation. If you can't take it serious,
you are likely to make decision that you will regret some day. On my view, there are two aspects you should consider. First of
all, your interest is the basement. One person tries his best to do something for he loves it. If others force you to do something
you have no interest in it, you can't do it well. What's more, the payment is important, too. Living in the society, we have to
make a living. It's necessary for you to make money except that you have other income resource.
My choosing occupation is a doctor, because it's not only a good job to make a living, but also a job that I realy be fond of.
Futhermore, it's an occupation good to our country and people. I believe my choice is right.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 002ad2b5-40d3-3ee2-bd00-edfc1d495077> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing a good occupation is a very important task in all people's lives.It's
revelant to our future.So,how to choose a suitable job?
Fist,you must hear your heart voice carefully,only when you fall in love with
your occupation ,you can do it well.After,an interest is best teacher.Second,think
about your advantage.When you are good at your job,you are superior to others,and
so you are easier to win success.In addition ,you also should turn over your parents'
oppions,they have the right to take part in the option.If you are in disagreement,
you need to think about your detemination again.
As far as I am concerned,I want to be a doctor.On the one hand ,I major in medicine
in university,so I have less room to choose.On the other hand,becoming a doctor is
my dream all the time and my parents are in favor of me.What is more important is that
in this feild ,I can help more peiple and let them stay away from illness.In this
way, I can contribute to my country and achieve my value .
In a word ,choosing occupation is important ,everyone needs to be caution.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6c844893-d013-339a-a074-b132fa87c59c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We all know that choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in one' life.It influences
not only one idivadial,but also one family even the sociaty.
One may consider many aspects when choosing occupation.Most people give priority to salary,and they
consider money the most important. There are also some people blieve " Intrest is the best teacher",and
they would like to pick the job which they have intrest in. Besides, some people may choose the job attached
to their major, so they can use the knowledge they learnt from college to work.
I am willing to become a mecical doctor in the future. I choose the possition to save others'lives and
I'm not work for ruturn. But I'm sure assisting others can fill my life with love and appreciation,which
will lead my life to happiness.
In a word,occupation is important ,we should choose cautiousely and  be responsible for our choice.
No matter what occupation you choose,you can make you own contribution to the society.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f1661304-533a-3b6d-9de6-d04ed297fb97> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important decision in our life. What job can give you are not only salary, but also your society circle, satification of contributing, living experiences and so on.
you should consider about various factors when choosing occupation. In my opinion, the primary thing you are ought to think is whether you like the job you are going to apply, which may determines whether you are happy or not in the following years. What’s more, you should also consider you petential of development in that job. By the way, salary can be taken into consideration sometimes, but needn’t be too concered about.
As for me, being a professor of physics is my ideal choice of occupation. Because there are two long vacations every year and one needn’t care about his salary at all. However, the key point is that I like physics, so it’s my dream to treat studying physics as my occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a951c942-49c4-3d98-a1b3-d19a9788c4ec> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone is going to enter the society in different way sooner or later.But what is the same is that everyone acquires a job to earn his living.So,it is unvoidable for us to choose our occupation,which is a very important decision in our life.
And,of course,choosing occupation is not easy.It involves many aspacts.Such as it's wage,holiday and the rest.As we all know,it becomes tougher and tougher for us to find a job,because of the increase of the number of collages and their students.What's more,the situation gets worse as students nowadays are getting pickier and pichier.They all want to get a good job which is easier to do and more to get.But the truth is that there are not so many occupations for them.These so called "good jobs" are prapared for those who put their feet on the earth and are willing to fight for a better future,not the one who is immersed in fantasy.
When it comes to me,now that I have choosed to be a medical student,it is my destiny to be a doctor.So it is my duty to study hard to be a good doctor which I will mever regret to.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 59827261-3d59-3c3e-a8aa-73fe769c4e2d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a serious dicision in our life. Many elements are considered in occupation choosing.
First, the most important thing is hobby. Only if you like it, you can devote your efforts and energy into the occupation without others remarking you. When it comes to the successful people, the same of them is that they like their occupation. Such as Bill Gates.
Second, the characteristcs is also affective. Romantic ones may not be suitable for leader a team producing the goods . But they can do well in designing products.
Third, the subject you studied in university is important, too. If you majored in English, it is hard for you to become a doctor or nurse. The occupation needs the knowledge you learn is better for you.
As far as I am concerned, I love Biology and I am a person can operate exprements careful. And my major is Biology, so I chosse to be Biology reseacher.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c953b407-a0fa-3c34-bf86-552f98cdbabf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the booming of economy,a proper occupation's chosen is playing a more and more essential roles in our darily life.Thus,choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions which could infulence our whole life.
From where I stand,many factors ought to be considered on choosing occupations.Firstly,It's my strong suggestion that we should put our personal Interest on the top of every factors.As a proverb saying,Interest is the mother of success.Secondly,It's declared that the futher situation of the occupation is an important part.However,being a intelligent people,we should put these tips into careful consideration.
As for me,I feel great honored to share my choice with you.I'm fond to be a doctor.Because being a doctor can not only save patients' life,but can make money to live a harmony life with the family.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 27777896-796d-3408-b770-17abf40684a2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are a lot of important decisions we have to make in our life.Above all of these decisions,chooosing occupation may be one of the most important.This decision would influence our life and it may decide our life quality of the rest time of our life.So choosing occupation is a very important decision.
We have to consider many factors when we make this decision as it's so important. As far as I'm concerned, what we should consider first is our interest. Everyone has his or her interest and everyone should consider this as the first factor when he or she makes the decision. Second is the environment of your home and your surroundings. You should choose an occupation that is useful and quite important in our social. The most important factors I think is our ability.If you think you are good at painting you may can be a painter.If you think you can wirte very well you can be a wirter.But sometimes you can't make everything perfect, you may want to be an actor but you are not good at perform,you have to change you mind and sacrifice your hobby.You should make a balance between all the factors.
I used to want to be a scientist because I like science but it's not easy to do that.Finally I dicide to be a doctor to help others.I think I'm good at communication and observing,and doctor is a very respective job.So I decide to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fea48dd3-730b-3e21-90d0-441dfb2a168e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's a big decision in our life to choose occupation. From the day you choose an occupation, your whole life will have to move towards  a speticular goal. Some people even say what you have chosen is not only job, but also life.
To choose an occupation, there are many factors to be considered about. Let me ask you a few questions. First, what kind of job do you like? You can do something with heart only if you really like it, and you can be extremely successful only if you do your job with the full of your heart. Second, are you good at what you like? If yes, congratulations, you may succeed easily. If no, also congratulations, you can succeed by doing what you are good at, the prosess might be a little hard, but I think it's worth it.
The choice of my occupation is to become a doctor. I guess I am a lucky guy. Becoming a great doctor has been my dream since I was little. And I found it's quite interesting. I know there's a long road ahead of me to make my dream dream come true. But something for sure, on my way of success I will always do my best with heart!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ebf4d5ca-cec5-35c3-8a7f-9efa91401e99> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing an ideal job is such an important thing that it will be around you and affect your
everything in the rest of your life. Nobody would like to have a work that he didn't pay much
attention to .What we want is not all about money ,but also our relief.
Many aspects must be concerned when you make up your mind to choose a job.First of all,you
should clarify what attracts you most that can lead you to spend much of your life devoting to
it. And that is your point. Then you should take what you have learned into consideration. What
you majored in can have large effect on your later life.The last but not the least ,you should
consult your families about their attitude towards your decision because they have much
experience about life. So many of their tips might be useful to you.
For me ,I would like to become a gardener in the future. I feel honored to cultivate so many
beautiful and shining life that can make people feel happy. And stay with flowers and plants
can tell me the true essence of my life .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 14ac4b32-687d-3b9e-9e7b-2b6cabccc968> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a big decission for one's life. The job you choose may have a deep influence on you. So it's important for everyone to make a right choice for himself.
There are many influencing factors that contribute to your choice. Whether you will have a bright future or not in this career is the most important mater. If you believe you will do better and better on your job and have a bright future, the salary can be overlooked-though it is also aimportant. Of course, your interest should be considered. Once occuped by a borring job you dislike, you can hardly do it well.
As for me, I want to a chemistry proffeser in university. Because I love chemistry. It must be a happy choice for me to devote myself to this carrer. What I will do is doing experiments, teaching some students at the same time. What's more ,it is good for our nation. We know here are no chinese scientists that get a Nobile Prize. I think it's time for us to take this challenge.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a8430ac0-45ef-3adb-9a41-e35b4edaa1a4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in our life .Occupation is one
part of our latter life .If we choose an occupation which belongs to our hobbies
, our life will be happy .
However , when we choose our occupation , we should consider a lot of factors.
First , we should consider that if we are fond of this occupation. If you don't
like it,you can't occupy yourself in it . Second , we must ask ourselves if we are
ready to have it .If you only like it ,but you have not prepared for it ,you can't make
it .Third, the salary is important. When we choose occupation ,we never choose a job that
boss pay a little for it.
My choosen is being a dentist. Althought being a dentist is durty, we can help smoebody who have
a toothache. In addition to that ,the salary of dentist is better than that of a lot of other
jobs.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID def067ca-666f-3bdd-b21a-c266d05d7779> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Each one has different experience, so that we have different values, we choose different occupation. And choosing occupations is an important determine in our life, so we should be considerated.
So what should be considered in our occupation choosing? First, and most important is what do you want to do, if you do not enjoy your job, you can not do it well. Second, what profession you studied in college make you suitable to some job. Third, your physical fitness should also be considered, it decideds there are some jobs you can not take. Next, societal stiuation, and so on.
As me, I want to be a doctor. It is my own choice to be a doctor. I want to help patients to reduce pain and make their life better. Doctor is a respected occupation. Now, I study Clinical Medicine in Shandong university. My family also think doctor is a good choice and they support me a lot.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c6ebe061-4197-3b89-9e54-90500f5d615e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Undoubtedly,choosing occupation is an important decision in life.As soon as we decide what we want to do and what we want to
live with in the rest of life,we should walk along the road firmly.Therefor,it can never be too careful to make the significant
decision.
However,there seems to be various factors to consider before we decide .First,you should ask yourself what on earth your
interest is.Because interest is the source of progress.If you do not like your job, you can not do it well.Maybe someday you will
fail to do it.Second,think over the question that if you have had the ability required to do the job well you choose.If you bear
most of the abilities it needs ,you may move up and develop quickly.Or you will lose confidence in the continuours probliems.
My choice is a doctor.And I think I have made the first one reason.As for the second,although I have not mastered, I am making
efforts and I think I cao make it in the near future.
In a word, ask your heart what you want to be before you choose you occupation.It can,and only your heart can answer your
confusion.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1a967304-84b9-3d51-9831-8c9536d5b60e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are many important choices we must make in our lifetime including occcupation,boyfriend or girlfriend and so on. As a college student, choosing a job is by no means a far things.we must consider carefully about what we want to do in the future.
As we all know, there are many tinhs have influence on our occupation choosing.
Our family, our interest, our dream , the salary , the atmosphere in our office and the last but not least, our majior in university.Konwledge is the basis that we choose a certain job as our occupation, Without knowledge we can never get the job we dreamed of. However, in my view, when we choose a job
, we must take our interest into account, for interset is the motivation to support us to achieve success.
As a student major in medecien, I may choose to be a doctor as my occputation.
As people said, doctors enjoy good salary. It's a good thing for me. On the other side, people may don't know how busy and tired the doctor may be. I think it is a chllenge for meTo be honest, doctor is not my favourite job, I would rather to be a teacher if possible. Because thachers have vacations. What's more, I like to communicate with my students, teaching them not noly knowledge but also my own experience. It's really a relaxing and interesting job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fbe7cdd3-7929-3edb-983b-e7a09e0435b0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There's no denying that choosing occupation is a very important thing.It's a necessary and important decision in your whole life,which may decide all of you.
And how to choose occupation?It can be hard.It's true that we should take all kinds of factors into consideration,such as income,your interest and so on.What's more,these factors can be veru important and limit your occupation.If your occupation can not be your favorite,it's income can not afford your life,you will be very depression and upset,or can be unable to make ends meet.
As for me,about my occupation,I think I will choose to be a doctor.And the reason why I choose it is very simple.On the one hand,being a doctor is my dream evenm when I was a child.I'd like to help other people to get out from illness,I believe I can do a lot for others .What's more, I think I enjoy helping others.On the other hand,I support being a doctor can afford my life,and it's a respected job,which has a high social status.Though there's no doubtable that being a boctor can be stressful and tired.But I have prepared for it!That's why I choose Shandong University medicine school.I enjoy it!
In conclusion,choosing occupation is important,and a good occupation should be valued!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1aa38032-025c-351c-a81a-19b0e3db42fe> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As  is known to all,it is an essential decision to choose occupation in our life.No one can deny the fact that a proper job can do much good to a person.On contrary,if one has a job that may be not suitable for him or her may have much trouble in the future.Choosing one's occupation is a serious progress which may have much influence on his or her life in the future.
However there are lots of factors that you should think over cautiously when you are going to pick up a job.First,in my opinion ,when you try to choose your occupation,the initial thing you should think about is your interst.There is an old saying goes that interest is the best teacher which reminds me that if you are interested with your job you would pay much passion to it and you will make great progress.Then it is also critical to think about whether the job that you choose would have enough room for you to develop yourself.If you can not make any achievement in that job,there seems to be no sense to choose the occupation.Last but not the least,you should also pay attention to the overview of the job ,and the payment should also be concerned about.When you find that the occupation can not develop very well or you can not gain much in the future,you should think it over seriously.
Finally,I'd like to say something about my choice of occupation.Now I am a student major in dental science in Shandong University.I think it is a good choice to be a dentist in the future as being a doctor is alwalys a dream while I was a child and this occupation has much room for us to develop ourselves in the future.I think this job can change me a lot and make me have a good future if I try my best and pay a lot efforts to it.
In the end,I wanna to express my best wishes that I hope everyone can get a good job and have a lightful future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a3c57e2e-1a56-38d2-9943-1209ac1d8d87> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, it is critical to choose an occupation which you are qualified to in our life, especiallly for those who just set their foot on society after graduation, due to it's the souse of substance.
Many factors must be taken into our consideration when we choose occupation.Fist of all,we must connect our interest with jobs, otherwise, you can't put all your passion into it and you won't work with excientment. Next, what you major in university also have a profound influence on your decision. Most people are willing to choose those occupations related to their studies, for they can fits thir job as quickly as possible. Last but not the least, salary can't be negleticed. Though relaxing and well-paid occupations are more popular to us, it is hard to find.
In my eyes,a satisfying occupation don't have to pay a lot, after all,the one equal to you is the one best for you. the reson why I intend to be a doctor is that I tend to survive life. I believe I will enjoy my job in spite of pains.
In a nutshell, we need a caution thought before we choose occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d7bdb650-30ba-3221-9762-fdb2201f0d82> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is a crucial decision in our life to choose occupation. Once you make you
decision, it will be so hard to exchange. Every person in the world need
to be careful enough when choose an occupation. How could we choose our occupation or
career correctly, suitable and interested?
All kinds of questions should be taken in your mind when choose occupation. First of
all, think this question please: Do I Interested in the job? If not, you would better not
choose it. that is bacause you will not happy when you do it in the rest of your life. Seconed
,The Occuoation you choose should be the one which you are good at. Only you do well in it,
could you make you career great and successful. Last but not the least, you could make enough
money in doing this job, for you need to support you family.
My decision is :teacher. I like children and Iike teaching very much. I will do my best
now in learning how to teaching children. My parents also courage me and help me to make my
dream come ture. Sevaral years later, I will stand in a classroom, playing happily with children
. It is geat.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f82a24a5-4b60-32ca-a82f-33f164c3aaea> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw,choosing occupation is a important desicion for everyone.A good chooice always means a successful life.However,making a suitable choice is not easy. So，how can we make a suitable choice and what should we think when we make choice.
First,I think we should consider our interest ,interest is very important,if people do a job they are interest in they must work hard and be success.so when we choose occupation we must ask ourselves what is you interest.Then, I think we should do a job which can offer a good life for us.For most people,job is a way to a better life ,so we can't ignore the benefits that a job can give us.Besides,we should consider the future of a job,if we choose a job which would be useless in the future is really terrible.
My chooice of my occupation is being a chemistrist because I learened chemistry in university and I really like chemistry.I think if I can be a chemistrist I must work hard and get success.and I also think it is a job which has a brighten future,so I think my choice is suitable.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 193a0f7d-65fe-3f90-ac23-4e029e28037c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,choosing a occupation espeacially
the one you like is one of the most important decisions
you make in you life.A satisfying job will makes you
feel energetic and happy when you are at work.So you should
try you best to choose a job you like.And it's better for us
to stick to the following tips when we are finding a occupation.
First of all,choosing a occupation that in our own capacity.Only
in this way can we do a better job and make contributions to your company.
Second, considering salary is another important factor.Your salary must
match your workload so that you will not feel unfair and frustrate.What's more,
choosing a nice place to work and that will lead to a good mood.
From my point of view,I'd like to choose a job I am interested in cause I can
use my knowledge to make contributions to my company.Further more,as I am a student
majored in biology,I'd like to do researches in laboratory or to be engaged in
bioengineering.Last but not least,a good job you choose keeps bad mood away.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c30e415a-a6ec-3cc2-ac5a-080996c8a13a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is a stage where we can show our own value and realize our dreams.Needless to  say, choosing occupation is a significant desicion during our life .
A lot of factors should be taken into account in terms of choosing occupation.To begin with,interest counts the most.As we all know,interest is the best teacher.Only when we are interested in our occupations can we have the force to move forward and achieve our goals finally.Furthermore,considering the need of society is indispensable.Society provide the chances of working for us and the occupation we choose must accord the need of society,or we may become jobless.Finally,I believe we are supposed to turn over the expectation of our family.
From my point of view,I will choose the occupation of being a  surgeon.Doctors are believed to relieve the pain on patients and save people's lives,which is a behaviour of helping others and devoting oneself to society.What's more,the occupation of doctor is always considered to be respectful and I believe I can achieve reputation in this position.To sum up, I believe to be a surgeon is a wise choice .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3ff9e6e3-6d63-3006-99d0-e2f1e7ad33a7> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As everyone knows, choosing occupation is of importance for one's life. Therefore, it's necessary to discuss the problem.
When choosing occupations, many fators should be considered. Of the most important I think, is one's hobby. I would rather work hard, laughing happily than sit doing nothing, feeling bored and valueless. And then, wages come to the second place to think about, which is most people's first choice. A job should raise your family or rather, yourself. Otherwise, the job makes no sense. What's more, you ought to think it twice whether the relationship among the collegues is good or not, in that it will bring great influence to your efficiency of work. Last but not least, you need to find a kind boss, who will not dismiss you or reduce your payment with no reason. If necessary, remember to sign a piece of papper in law.
Maybe there are still many fectors needing considering, but as far as I'm concerned, you just need to keep a merry mood. For me, I prefer to be a medicine doctor, which was ever a dream in my childhood. Now I got the chance to attain it, and I won't quit. I think doctor is great because they can save many lives, like angels, kind and beautiful. what's most important is that I am willing to help other people, which gives me inner peace. And I have determined to make a contribution to our country' s medical technology.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 35af4d1b-37a0-32e9-9fe6-65a46c0e75a4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Whether you want or not ,you must working in this society .Because you need money to buy food or something you can live in the world .So ,people have seen the birth of a word --occupation .Choosing an occupation is a big descion in the life .You will be happy and more active if you have choosed a good occupation .On the contrary ,you may have a bad mood in you dailylife if you have made a wrong decision ahd have choosed an occupation that you really don't like.
How could we choose a good occupation ?There are many factors that you should consider .First ,you should consider about whether you like this occpuation or not .If you unlike it ,maybe you should give it up no matter hoe much money youn will get .Second ,you may think about whether it is suit for what you have learn .Finally ,you may consider about how much money you will get .
In my opinion ,the first element of choosing occpuation is intersting .If I am intersting for it ,I think I will more active and more happy .Then I will consider whether it could give me more money .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a1344416-f299-3bd8-b00e-900342eebb75> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In modern life,choosing ocupation has been a more and more difficult decision for young people to make as the employment environment has been affected by the finacial crisis.
Nevertheless,it is necessary for us to stay a cool head to make the choice in bid to be responsible for our future.Once we do the choice,many factors should be taken into consideration.The interest,for example,is the most important factor that we should consider.The reason is that interest is the best teacher for a person to work hard.Another factor that we have to consider is the present enviroment and the trend of the world's development.Because it is in the future that we are work. In addition, we still need to listen to parents' and some other family members' advice.They have more experience which can help us to know better of the employment environment and the trend of the world.As the proverb goes"The mount of salt I have eaten is larger than the rice you have eaten."
Taking all the factors into consideration,I finally make the decision to be a doctor.A doctor could help people who got illness to relieve pains even save their life.After all,there is nothing that can be equal to a person's life and it is also my pleasure to help people.Moreover,once my family members are ill,I could also try my best to heip them got out of the trouble.In a word,the the doctor is a profession that is benefit to patients and also myself my family and friends.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c8df3574-a057-3a9d-902d-ced928b23a0e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is a very important thing in our life. It decides the way you live. However , it is in no way an easy thing to do. You should know what you want. You should think about many different things before choosing your career.
First of all , you should concern about your interest . If you love some thing very deeply ,you will do it very well too. Interest is the motivation for you to do some thing in your heart . Besides , you should think about the salary . Although money is not the most important thing in our life , but it is very necessary . Your parents are getting older , it  is the responsibility for you to raise them . Also you should raise money to raise yourself. Ability is another thing should be concerned . You shoule think about your ability  before choosing your career . If your dream is too far away from your life , you can do some other things before you achieve it .
In my opinion , interest is the most important thing for me to decide my career . I love studying biology , so I choose  it as my career . And I am willing to strugle for it in my whole life .
However , different people have different choices . The most important thing is that you enjoy your work and your life .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d917cbca-04b8-342b-ab01-d42cc7ccef12> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As far as we know,it's a important decision for us to choose occupation.It's related for our future's life.
Certainly,it must consider about all kinds of factor.Such as wages,a,district,psychology and so on.My choosing occpation is to be a doctor .Being a doctor is a dream when I
was a child. It not only can help other but also can make myself happy.With devolepment os society,It's need more and more numbers of doctors.
My choice to be a doctor also is my parents hope.With the timr going by,my parents is older and older.If I become a doctor,I can give them more patients.They hope that one day
I became a famous doctor and can heal the wounded and rescue the dying.Maybe noe I'm tired of heavy homework and the stress from program.But I believe I will be proud of myself .
No matter how tired I am ,I will go on my dream.
Everyone has their own choice,I think you must have.Which kind of occupation you choose?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 542a9d7b-e19c-3934-9d00-78df736138dc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we growing up,we must face many probiems,and also we have many things to choose in order to make our life become better.
Where should we work when we graduate from schools?What work is suitable for us?There are many situations we must to choose,so we
can have a wonderful situation to live.Thus,choosing occupation is a very important issue that we should be careful.It is true that
choosing a right one can lead us a successful life.
However,we must take all the factors into consideration when we choose occupation.First,the kownledge we studied in schools is
the most important,whether it can be used in our work is very necessary.Next,the salary and the surroundings around working place
are also important for us.We live in the world,so we should pay everything we use everyday,if we don't have enough money,we may
have little food to eat,bad house to live,poor clothes to wear,and we will feel upset that the efforts we pay so many years have no
effect!At the same time,if we have a poor situation to work,we will feel sad and we don't have much passion in work.Besides,whether
we should come back to hometown to work is less important.Perhaps,somebody want to go to far place to work while somebody want to
return hometown.It all depends on our choices.
For me,because I am studying medicine in unversity,I will choose to be a doctor in the future.Maybe I will work in a hospital
also I can run a clinic.I have not dicided yet.I have gone too far away from home to study,I will back to home to work for I miss
it very much.Now, I should concentrate on my studying so that I can get a good job having a bright future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 539ce00f-7135-30d1-b8be-044b991e9420> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occuoation is one of the most important decisions,becanse this means
what you do to make living in the future.
Whether the work you choose you like or not.Whether the salary of the work you choose
is satisfing or not.Whether the work place is a good environment ang so on. All of the
aspects are the things which we should consider.
In my opion,I think doctor is the occupation I choosed.Relieve other`s pain is the most
glorious thing in my mind.So the work deserves my energ and I like it.The salary of a doctor
is not low.Opposite,many skillful doctor`s wage is so high that lots of people envying them.
The work environment is not very good,because virus surrounds you every time.But I don`t
mind it.
So,to be a skillful doctor is my aim.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9035208f-830b-3f5a-9030-2a64cc64028e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Crurently,with the development of competive occupation market ,a majority of employments are in delimma when they decide to choose occupation.So when it comes to choosing occupation,there are a considerable number of people  in favor of the idea that we should attach great importance to it urgently.
As far as I'm concerned,what we can't fail to take into account is that there are a great number of potencial elements when we make our determination to choose occupation.To begin with,what we should  think carefully is the salary which derectly determines our living circuntances.In addition,it is considerable for us to take working environment and holiday into consideration.Furthermore,it is distance from where we live to the company that plays an critical role in choosing occupation.Meanwhile,we may be trapped in a situation where the occupation isn't related to what we learned in school.Last but not least,faced up with ideal working conditions,we may be unsatiafied with the job for the reason that it dosn't meet our stomach.
Personally,what I  firmly supported is that we should choose the occupation which we can devote ourselves to . Only in this way can we make great contribution to our country and  bring ourselves to a bright future.
Do remember,follow our own heart.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 17d31cfa-ace4-3bfc-a6e4-8461e8e87fde> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When talking about what to do in the future, graduates usually in the disillute. Because choosing occupation is an important choice in our life, and it is closed about our
dream or future.
Choosing occupation needs to think about varied elements. For example, what jib is popular with graduates,and its prospect if is bright. Also where we want to work,is
first-tier city or second-tier city.The tow kinds of cities has different scense.At the same ,we needs to think about our home and family and so on.
For my part,I will be a doctor in the first-tier city. The reason why is that my dream is being a doctor,I want to try my best to make my patients recover and be away pain.
This is my the biggest hope.And the first-tier city has more opprove carre oppotunities. I believe my choice can make my dream come true.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f3263339-55a7-358e-b3b9-f5939b287be2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
recent years we have observed a  highly-developed country are gradually coming toward
us. all seem to be so important for us to have good occupations that improving  ourselves
a lot. in a short, choosing a good occupation can decide on our futrues what our lifestyle
is.
before my entrance to shandong university, i take it for grented that i am what i shoosing
so when it cmes to choosing ,many things ought to be thought. firstly,find out obsolutelly
what we really  likes and dislikes, having our concentrate on our intresting occupations or
try to achieve what we hane dreamed of.secondly,we should make our efforts and take advantages
from the things we are good at.only in a correct dicretion we can do our best. thirdly, we should
know more about waht the function is in our society and how much popular it is in jobs seeking.
having a popular occupation always means a lot. at least you can make a better living than others.
these just are some basic principals when choosing a occupation. more is required to be discovered
by yourself. i still remembered that when i choosing my occupation , i am doing to be a good doctor
, which is more stabbled when compared to other jobs.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c3b9acc7-69a7-384c-a51e-392da9ea530b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Almost all of us will face a vital problem that is choosing occupation.You choice means your career in the future, which would definitely make big differences in your life, or rather, change your life state. As we can see, choosing occupation is really important.
There are many factors which we should think about when we make the decision. First of all, your interest. Interests can stimulate potentialities, so that you can complete your work more excellent and perfect than you do other works that you are not interested in. Choosing the occupation you are interested in will help you to realise your personal value. Secondly, your major. There is no doubt that you would do better and easier in the area which you are major in. Last bu not least, other's suggestion. Especially old people's suggestion.For they know the society better, and they will give you more reasonal suggestion, which fits you better.
These are my opinions. As a medicine student, I am intrested in medicine so much and to be a doctor is a dream from my childhood. There is no wonder that I will do my best to learn knowledge and become an excellent doctor in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c560503c-7a11-3eff-bd07-e36ccd0955da> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,people need jobs to make a living.It not only
have a relation with their own developments but also have important inffluences
on familly.so choosing occupation is an important decision of life.
The society has many risks.we should be careful to choose our occupations,and
we should think kinds of factors which could have an inffluence on our occupati
ons.for example,we should consider our knowlage learned from schools,thus,we can
have a good condition.other idea is that we ought to think about our characters,
that is to say,different characters suit different jobs,only choosing right work,
you can show your abilities,what's more,you could get great development.Last but
not least,you should choose job which you are tntereted in,as the result of the
factor,you will have strong passion,your job can have a good result.
As for me,I dream to be a doctor,I hope I can save lots of lives,and I
think I can do this job because of my knowledge ang my character-patience

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5f52878f-7489-33eb-81d4-7fd9ead73d7d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision. As it decides what we do and the kind of our life in the future.
I  know what will happen in the future once   I choose the occupation of a doctor .it means I will study for many years and
After graduation, I will spend the rest of my life in hospital with different patients.
I won’t regret to choose to be a doctor. When choosing occupation we need to consider all of the factors. First of all, we
Should obey our heart which I think is the most important factor. Make sure what you want to be, what you are interested in and
What kind of life to live in. when you obey your heart, you won't give up your dream even how difficult and unrealistic it is.
Then we also need to consider the obtain employment of the occupation, as we will lead a life with this work after all.
I decided to be a doctor. In fact, it is a dream of mine for years. It is also my parent’s idea. Besides, I’d love to help
the patients far from the pain. And I believe I will enjoy this kind of life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d1d49de3-9be0-3fd2-963e-22f6c570ac2e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's universalling acknowledged that choosing occupation is a very important decision in everyone's life.There are virous of jobs in the world.But we might regret forever if we haven't choosed a proper occupation.  The following are my views.
It's no doubt that everybody had a dream when he was a child.For instance,we want to be a soldier, or a pliceman, or a scientist and so on.But with time going by, we change our mind when we learn more about the world. We have to face the true world.Of course,we will find more interesting thing.After that, we must consider what we want to do after graduation when we study in the university.So we ought to consider many factors when we choose occupation. Although it's very hard and we may feel puzzled,we should pay all attention to it. We can ask ourselves what we have learned in the university and how can we use them in the future.Besides,we'd better know that if we can fulfil ourselves in the occupation.In addition,before we choose the occupation ,we should find the useful imformation about the occupation on the Interent or consult others who konw the occupation.Moreover,we must keep a balance between life and occupation.
As for me, I want to be a teacher in the future and it was also my dream when I was a child. My father is a teacher,I  long to be a grand man like him.And I'm found of staying with students. What's more.I want to try my best to educate more young students. I'm sure I'll be happy  to be a teacher.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 88768493-0c52-391c-b672-2715ee96f9e9> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's known to us that twenty first century is a competitive century for all of those who lived in this century. And is's obvious that we all have to face with the same prolem, occupation competiton. Choosing a right occupation seems to be an important decision for most of us.
In the eyes of mine, occupation choosing means a lot in our future development. First of all, it's mainly related to the majors we choose to learn during college. So somebody will make a choice according to their own interests, and others will consider more for their future occupation condition. Whatever the way you think about your majors or occupation, there are always something we can not avoid to take it into consideration. At first, it must be the work you have the ability to do, ability is the base of the rights of choosing. If we don't have this basic item, we only have the choice to be chosen. Secondly, we should choose the job we are willing to do. It's important to realise that we can not get our bosses' expected result if we are not enjoy the whole procedure of work. And for the most, except for the two I have mentioned, we should choose our occupation which suits us well. We all know that carpenter is not the right person for our house painting, it's the same in our future occupation choosing.
And finally, I made up my mind to be a doctor during my last summer vocation. To tell you the truth, it's a hard decision for me. I know there is still a long way to go but I will never regret the decision I have made.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 57739c3d-e020-3681-af3e-f9854e23f756> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
I think every knows that chosing occupation is a great decision. A good work will give you good mind and you would
like it that you devote yourself to your work. However if you choose a work don't suit of you ,you would lose your
heart and you can't do the work as well as you want to. So, we must know the importance about chosing a work which
suit for you.
When we first think about our work, we must ensure if we like it or not, someone says: interests is a goood teacher, we
can follow our hobbies to choose our work. Then, we must have some pities because hobbies is not only matter above our
work, we must think mang problems. Just as the great oppertunities, we'd better choose the best one, also we should
accept parents, frends and socity's suggests. In a word , sometimes we must change our mind in work choosing, it's not
give up, just because we have some dutiesfor our parents and socity.
My choose is we not only think about ourselves, but also the sosity. Then we can choose a good work.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID be49293f-a103-375d-8626-8609f4bc9755> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, we go to college just learn the professional knowledge in order to find a good jop after graduating.Therefore,
choosing occupation is an major determination of our life.So we think of it cleanly and carefully.
Of course it is not very easy to do it. There may be somethings we should consider.When you choose it, first you should base your
hobby.Choose the one you like.Sencond according to what you have learned in college, it is better to choose the occupation close to
your major.Third the ability of communicating plays an important role in choosing jop,better communication gives you more  chance to
make it.So we had better to develop our conmmunicating ability during school.
Based on my personal conditions, I make up mind to choose medical jop.It is to say, I want to be a doctor after graduating.I am
fond of it.I am learning it.I have a warm-kind heart.I am sure I can do it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 50a6b8ee-a268-3147-ab23-b1a59e36db15> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is one of the biggest and the most important decisions made in our lives. Before we graduate from college, even at the beginning of our college life, we are supposed to think about what we are going to do in the future and decide what major we study, which is helpful to our future career.
Therefore, there are several factors involve to our choice about our occupation. In my opinion, the most significant one is what you like. It is wise to choose a job which you are interested in, for you will never get bored when you suffered from busy working. Secondly, take the fact in mind that when you work on a career in which you can devote yourself to the whole world, you will become extremely satisfied and think you are useful to the society. Finally, it is better to know that which job will help you get higher reputation from the public and lead you to your dreaming success and a wonderful future.
As for me, I want to try my best to make contribution to our country, even if I can only do a little in pushing our society move forward. And of course, the occupation I choose must be the one I love. As a result, I am determined to be a doctor, which will help me to realize my value. I love this job and I am sure I will spend no effort on helping the patients recover from illness and gain a healthy body.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 13b10fdc-1d0d-360e-b9cc-850aff7423ff> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our lives.
The job which you choose will have a great effect on your whole life.
We should take every possibility into account.Above all,what really matters is
that whether you enjoy your work or not.There is a saying that Interest is the
best teacher.If you can get a ideal occupation,you will concentrate on it and it
makes it easier to improve yourselves.We also need to consider the salary.There
is no denying that we should make a living by ourselves.Also we need to make sure
that our parents can get through a peaceful period of time after retiring from
work.
Consiering all the possibilities,I choose to be a doctor.It is a great job
because it can make others live better.Helping others can realize my own value.
Live is the most treasure thing all over the world and what I can do is save
lives.It makes me proud of myself.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4f6cbb6c-3e46-30fb-8b29-96648c9ab214> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important even in my life.My father is a doctor
and my mother is a nurse.They don't want me to be a doctor becuase they know it's a
tiring job.But my father loves his job though he is so weary sometimes.When I grow up
I want to be a person who can save lives like my father.I think it's a honor to me.
I know it will go through hardships when I choose to be a medicine student.But
I believe it will do some goods for my life.Meanwhlie,The relationship is very nervous
between doctors and patients.I know I can change nothing.But as a doctor,I will try
my best.
I choose to be a doctor no matter how hard it will be.And I will never change
my mind.I believe I can achieve my goal.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 499adf63-523b-312e-8da0-3dffca1d07b6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is beyond any doubt that choosing occuption is a big decision in your whole life.Once you make a decision,then you may devote your lifetime to specific career no matter whether you have preference to it or not.Therefore,we shall put all aspects into account before we decide what career way we will step on.Initially,we should take a serious consider about what we are fond of,as if you are passionate for your possential career,you may find strong motive which can have you immersed in your job without complints and boredness.Consequencely,chances are that you can achieve great success in your field.Besides,the majority of people would like to choose a career with a pretty promising.It is quite reasonable that people rely on a favorable career to make a living.So before you are determined to choose your career,frist you should get a thorough consideration about it.
My profession is medicine learning,which I think is of vital importance to human being.As is known to all,recent years has seen swift changes in medicial field with the rapid technology development.Thus I am confident of my profession and decide to make contributions to it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3a9b41d7-e6b1-3387-9a60-a5e31f9523ba> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When it comes to occupation choosing, people from different background may have very
different opinions about this issue. whatever to say, choosing occuption is one of the
most important decision in our whole life. we must pay more attention to it.
There are so many fictions we should consider when we choose occuption. First of all,
the salarys may influence our choices largely. Everyone want to make more money and
live a happy life. What's more, we must consider the working environment. As we all konw,
some work may be harmful for our health, we should avoid it. Apart from these, the
distances from the working place to our home is also a important ficton to our choices.
By the way, I prefer to working near my home because I suppose family is more important
to the working. Last but not the least, I suppose the occuption we chose must compose
with our insterests. If you don't like this work, you may feel tired of it and live a
boring life day by day. So, let's enjoy it!
As far as I'm concerned, I want to be a good doctor. Now, I'm a student studying how to
be a doctor. When I was young, I did really appreciate the occupation. I like this work,
it's not only because this work can save many people's life but also because I really
enjoy it. I believe, whatever occuptions we choose, we must love it and just enjoy it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 646fd35c-87e3-378a-a27a-ffcf619c9ea0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With time going by,choosing occuptation becames a very important item for our students .If you can chooose a right occupation ,
that is to say,you willl have a  perfect future.Now let's talk about the occupation.
From my point of view,theren are so many things can lead our own occupation,for example,our interests,enviroments,home condition,ect.
When you make your decision,you must consider seriously,because that if you choose it,it's diffcult to change your occupation.Besides,
you should pay your attention your occupation,and treat it as a part of life.So,my dear friend,don't make you decision easily.Our interests
is the biggest effect to our occupation,Only if you like it ,you can do it try your best.What's more our home condition is also a
important effect,if you daon't have a ecconomic support,youo can't stick your occupation.
In my opinion,my occupation is being a doctor,because i think if became a doctor,can i save many lifes,it's proud.Even if we must
work harder than others.You can't imange the happines that you can feel through helping others about their health.
My friends,Only if can have a good decision about occupayion and pay your all attention to it,can you have a good future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 516fe81f-044c-3ce2-a555-41d02238ea06> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Study,study study !As everyone knows,we should spent almost all of our time in studying knowledge as  medical students,even in
college.Well,why did us choose to study medcine at that time which can decide our life?"If you study medcine,you can get a good
job after graduated.And you will be respect as a docter who fecth people from death."
It is a important decision in our life to choose your occupation,a good job can make you feel satisfied and happy every day.You
can get enough money after doing equal labour.And a good job can give you enough time to enjoy good time with your family.In one
word,your job decide your life!
What should you think of before choosing your occupation,there are many factors,the most important factor is if you like your
job?And then you should think that are you satisfied your salary.Some people will considerate the environment,the work time and
so on.
I choose to be a docter,not only because what my mother said but also i think i can master a skill in here.I can treat my family
member if they are uncomfortable.I got many wonderful time here,i will go ahead and hold enough knowledge in order to be a professional
docter.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 93a0b0dc-0dca-3457-a4c1-15b067fa8c0c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,choosing occupation is such a important decision for our whole life that makes us have to  think too much.In the one hand,it means how to spend the rest of the life.In the other hand,it depends what kind of partners and friends we have.
We need to do a lot of things for choosing occupation.First and the most important,what kind of work we really interested in.And then,we should know whether this work is fit for me ,such as the working atmosphere,the job duties and so on.Of course,in order to having a prosperous situation for our family,we should consider the income for the future occupation.
Obviously,I choose to be a doctor in the future according to my major subject.Honestly speaking,I think a lot for my decision.In fact,our family doesn't have a doctor and my parents and I both think this occupation is fit for a girl to do.Besides,I don't hate the atmosphere for a hospital.However,the relationship between doctors and patients is nervious now,and I want to be a good doctor to set an example for them to prove we can do this!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5b28905a-ac41-38b8-8206-90094fa59d58> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is a very important determination in our life.As we know,we students,especially our medical students must have several years education in school and we should pay more attention to our today's study and tommorrow's career.
When we choose the occupation, we should pay attention to many reason and consider about many problem. We should care about our own interstings because it makes a large difference in our future's enthusiasm of our job.At the same time,we should be considered about the difficulties in our employment.You know that today,many of the college students can't find a suitable job after thier graduation.Although the reason is utilitarian,it is also a fact in the present.What's more,may be we should choose the occupation according to our major in the college for we can take it more easy.
As far as I'm concerned, I have a big possibility to choose the doctor to be my future occupation.The first important is that my major lesson in college is medicine and in one way,I love this job because of the proud feeling it can give me by saving the life of others.According to the current situation,tha doctor is a good job. That is to say,doctor has a more stable income and has a good welfare when compared with other occupatons.But in fact,doctor is very busy and has few holidays to relax themselves.The doctor should work carefully day and night.To be a doctor also has large stress from the leaders,the patients even from the families of the patients.So I should work hard and pay more attention to the situation of doctors from now on,and I must try my best to be a good doctor.
In the explosive compesition  of the occupation,only when I real devote ourselves to the career,can I have a bright future.On the mean while,we should focus on the choosing of the occupation .May be the occupation we chosen is not the best one, but it must be the suitable one for ourselves.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3648012e-7f9c-3bb2-9cdd-dca2a3bdcb79> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupations is a really important decision in people's life, for choosing occupations will dicide our life
in the future. After we choose the occupation, we will follow the pace that the job gives to us. So if we choose the
the wrong job, we may be uncomfortable because we are always doing some things that we are not eager to do.
Oppositely, if we choose the proper occupation, we will be happy all day and never feel exhausted.
So to make such a important decision, we need to consider a lot of factors. First of all, we have to think about
what we are able to do. Do the things we can do is always a good decision. Secondly. it is wise to choose the
job which we are interested in. Doing interesting things can make ourselves happy and we will be enthusiastic
of the job so that we can finish the job better. Last but not least, we have to choose a occupation that we can
earn enough money for our life. A very important reason that we have to find a job is that we need to make a
living so that the occupatuion we choose must correspond to this aim.
The occupation I choose is to become a scientist after I have considered all of the facters. Becoming a scientist
is the job I have dreamed for a long time. In addition, scientist is also a occupation that we can earn much money.
So in  conclusion, scientist is the most proper occupation for me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e6fd3f37-0ad1-3688-8584-0bcd15245e38> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In this day and age, choosing occupation plays a more and more important role in our whole life. It is not only a significant decision but also a reflection of our future life. So how can we choose our own occupation?
As far as I am concerned, we should take all kinds of factors into account when we are confronted with choosing occupation. First, as the famous saying goes, 'The interest is the best teacher.' We should ask ourselves a set of questions, such as, 'What do we really love?', 'What is the thing we can devote ourselves to?' It is obvious that if we have great passion for the work, we could  do wonderful things easily. Next, under the severe trend of economic crisis, we had better consider about the economic factor. What's more, we need money to support the basic outcome. Last but not the least, we should take responsibility to the human beings. No matter what job we choose, we must make contributions to the world's development.
As for my decision, I choose the doctor as my occupation. There is no doubt that medical science do help individuals get rid of disease and painful. It is doctors' responsibility to devote themselves to the patients, I hold. Once I made my decision, I will never regret. Only when everyone makes contributions to the world, could we live a better life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6cbe01d1-6c01-306d-88cb-674e971fdf69> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the population of the graduates becoming larger year by year in China, the competition between job seekers tenses much more. Thus, more and more people, especially Senior 3 students and their parents, cast more attention on choosing occupation.It is a big decision to choose your occupation in your life.
It is not exaggerated to say that we should take a multitude of factors into consideration when choosing occupation. First of all, our major in the university plays a significate role in choosing occupation. After all, there are more opportunities for you to attain succeess if you gain a job relevant to your major. Besides, on no account can we ignore interest which weighs more than our major. Those who are interested in their work are more enthusiastic about their enterprise.Therefore, they have more access to success. What's more, there is no denying that more people are concerned about the income and the status of their occupation. Last but not the least, as the successors of the socialism and the Party, our occupation choice should be in accordance with the demand of our nation and the society.
As for me, I select doctor as my occupation, for it is noble to heal the wounded and rescue the dying. I will spare no pains to be a competent doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 57a8fb14-3381-33cf-840f-0cbfa7fe46aa> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
For many people occupation occupies more than half of their lifetime. It is a so important choice that it decides the foundation of people’s economy, mood, health and living environment, even their sons and daughters' future. Thus, making good occupation choices is essential.
When it comes to choosing occupation, somebody prefer jobs with high salary, someone may consider whether the work comfort or not. Well, I’ve got to admit that these features are really cares. Yet, there are still something else which we should think about, such as morality ,health harms ,influences of society ,and so on.
As for me ,if I’m left to make the choice ,I’ll not hesitate to choose a promising occupation First of all, I appreciate the honor and challenge it brings to me. At the same time, if I work hard, it will offer me a lot of opportunities including high salary, good position, etc.
So ,choose what you think is true .And it would be the best for you .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6482369e-1f65-3d3a-9216-34448b33c74f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In the recent years,there are more and more occupations in the society.Choice of occupation is a major life decesion.The choice of what kind of occupation will decide our life.
We must be cautions to choose occupation.Choice of occupation need to consider all kinds of factors.For example,our character,our family,the style of our life,economic income,working conditions,place of work,and so on.We must consider the occupation on the self development of life impact and role.
In the choice of occupation,we need to build up self occupation development,in order to play,the cause of the success of the occupation values on the basis of social needs.
Integrated all kinds of factors,I decide to choose medical science.Because I like medical science.And I want to learn medical science to salvate patients.I want to let the patient to reduce the pain.I do not care about how much income and what kind of working conditions.I only want to join the medical institution.
Occupation decide my life.Choosing the right occupation will make me a better development.Medical science is just my best choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f4a498f6-3db9-3f37-a57a-2a59602d6d2a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw ,it is one of the most impotant decision to choose occupation in one's life.IF you make a wrong decision ,you will lose almost all your happiness , get into a terrible circle and have to deal with something you hate.
In apart , choosing occupation is excepted to think about more ,it contained all kinds of facts .For instance,whether you enjoy your job nor not and whatever you can learn from the job are especially important.What is more ,if you can get well with the job and earn enough money are really something that you should consider before you decide to choose the occupation. Take Hanhan for an example ,he fit extremlly well as a writer and a professional race sporter but he would be a joke if he choose to be a boxer.
As for me ,my ideal occupation is a docter with Docter’s degree.I have thought much more and gave my life a goal to be achieved.In my opinion,doctor is a real alternetive for angel,I will try my best to cure sickness and defeat illness.Besides , I had an experience of losing my favorite grandfather due to cancer ,I always think ,if I were a doctor ,my grandfather would may be alive today.With my great patience and obviousness ,I firmly believe that I can do well in the futuer.
Be careful enough to choose your occupation, just do what you what you want to do.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2a581d5a-24f6-39ac-b3bd-62b6ad079cd5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important decitions in everyone's life.
However, you must be deliberate before you make the decition, because it may affect you in you hole life.
Then,how to choose occupation? Choosing occupation, you must take every factor into consideration. For instance, your hobby, your enthusiasm, the income and so on.
For me,I would like to be a dorctor. It's my dream when i was a little child. I love helping others even if there is no repaying. I love the feeling after helping others.I have the enthusiasm in it.And the payment is also pretty good.So i chose to be a doctor with any doubt when i was asked to choose subject.
And now, i am on the way to my dream,I will work hard and try my best to study no matter how difficilt it is.I will keep on going untill i could achive my goal.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fb0203ed-d197-3656-9f2b-42e3e0be166c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in our life, for it will influence the routine of our life. So, we should pay great attention when we choose our occupation.
There are many factors we should consider when we choose our  occupation. First of all, we should know which field  our interensts are in. Interests are the best motivation which make us get to our decision and never give up . Next, we should know what academic knowlege and skills we have abtained. So we can know what job we can do and we will do it well. Our interests should be combined with our real abilities. Then , we need to get more specific information about  our occupation, such as wether it has a good salary or if it is benefitcial to our develoption in the future. Of course, there are still many factors we will consider when we choose our occupations.
After a long serious consideration of those matters that relate to occupation choosing, I made my best choise----to be a doctor. The most important reason that I want to be a doctor is that I am interested in this occupation and I love it. And I want to help others feel better with my own ability. I will try my best to do a good job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID aef5b04d-6159-3bec-a054-5bdd9051b52d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an essential decision of our life. It has great influence in your fulture. So we'd better choose it carefully.
There are many factors should be taken into consideration for choosing occuption. Above all, your interest has the most power to decide your occupation. Because it contributes to whether you are content with your work and enjoy it. In addition, the wage of the job also matters a lot. A well-paid work can attract more employees to apply to. Besides, the work envirenment also has an effect on  choosing occuption. Let's put it in this way: if you have a hamonious and quiet environment, you will be in a good mood, thus you can concentrate on your work and be absorbed in it, and in the result, you will have a good outcome and be praised. Finally, for many people,the attitude of their family is also have an influence in  choosing occuption.
Considering all of the above. My choise of the occuption is to become a doctor.
As I am keen on medicine and the cure of patients. Fortunately, this is also agreed by my family. They approve of my choise and have a hige expection of me. I will do my best to become a respectful doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c471cb67-2545-36ed-a093-142163d8750a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a very important thing of one's life,much consideration is needed in choosing occupation.Once you decided what is
your choice,your life is decided,too.As the old saying goes:The thing woman fairs is choosing the wrong husband,but what the
man fairs is choosing the wrong occupation.So one should choose his or her occupation very carefully.
Many kinds of things should be count when one choose occupation.First and also the most important,I think,is whether
the occupation fits to your dream.If it does,you will not only be happy when you are persuiting it,but also you will be more
motivated than you do other things.Then,you should consider the environment around you,like the future of the occupation you
would like to choose.And also,you should consider what you have for this occupation,what you do not have yet.But the third
one is not necessary if you really like the job,for you will work hard to adapt yourself to it.And if you are the only child
in your family,you maybe should consider the wish of your parents.
As for me,I want to be a doctor since I was very young,because my grandfather was a doctor,and he was famous for his
knowledge of rescuring people around my homeland.But he was gone at his gold-age,41-years-old.I even never seen him both in
the photos and in the fresh.In my heart,to the deep,I envy the people who are brought up by their grandparents.And for this
reason,I want to become a traditional doctor as he was.Besides,I am interested in traditional medicine as myself.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4de6a43b-6957-361b-b08a-c248ca098d75> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in our life,which relates to our fulture happiness.
As we all know, there are all kinds of reasons that infulences us.
To begin with,the salary as a life basis is too important to ignore. Without money,we can not really
live a wonderful life. Just like that when we work hardly, we only get a little money which we can not
afford our family. How sorrow we will feel. Secondly, the interest is the energy for us to struggle,which is
like wings to make us fly on the work sky. Without interest, our life is like a dead water that smells poor.
Thirdly, the enverement should not be very tough. If we work in a dusty room where a lot of smoke is among us,
we must be very tired of our daily life. As far as I am concerned, there are still a lot of points.
If I choose a job, I will frist consider whether I like it or not. Life is a time we should enjoy it rather than
accept it. If the pay is enough for me to live, I will choose my favorate one not the well paid one. As a doctor
in the future, I really believe I will focus on my job rather than the money.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0c891c56-6694-363b-a3f4-e44b52e2b06e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,it is important for us to choose an occuption which is the best for us.And choosing occupation is an important decision in our life for it decides the kind of the life you will live in the future.Actually,as soon as I finished collage entrance examination,I began to think what kind of life I want to live over and over again.
It must happen before you chooose your occupation that think about all kinds of different elements.For example,when you choose to be a teacther,you are supposed to think about the character of you is good for it or not,and so on.What's more,when I choosed to be a doctor,I had thought all different elements.In general, no matter what kind of occupation you choose,you'd better think it clearly.
Finally,I choose to be a doctor.Not only because that it's benificial for my family,but also because that it's my dream to help people keep healthy.In my opinion,only when you work by the control of dream as well as the life can you try your best and put your full heart into it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f8330734-14d6-3afb-b066-0f3075bad1e6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
For every college students,chooosing occupation is an important determination,Becuase you may work on the job till you retire.And you may spend your youth time on it.So choosing occupoation is an important and difficuit decision.
But how to choose a job?We need to consider various factors.First,the work should be what you are interested in.If make you working in a job which you dislike,i think you can't stand  the boredom.Second,the occupation should be closely related to your major in school.You konwledge got from college will not be wastedand you can fit your job faster than others.Third,you need to think the job's future.finaly,the salary should be took into account.
As for me.my choice are various.I may be a doctor or an official in nation health system.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID af62bfd6-0ed1-36ff-92fb-4e99192523c0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In this competitive society, choosing occupation is of vital importance to everyone. It is also one of the momentous decisions in our life.
Surely, when choosing occupation, we need to consider factors in all aspects. Firstly, we are supposed to make it according to our interests. Only in this way can we love our occupation in our hearts and have chance to succeed in it. Secondly, we should learn about the developing conditions of all kinds of occupation. As we all know, everyone would like to have a good job, which can help us make a fortune and live a wonderful life. Finally, we also need to consider the thoughts of our parents. Parents bring us up carefully, and they expect us to be a useful person. So when making a decision, we should think about advises of them. In addition, we need to know whether our families can benefit from our occupation.
Considering every factors, I choose the doctor, an occupation that need me to make contributions for different persons. As for myself, Iam interested in this occupation. I reckon that it is an honorable thing to help patients pick up. Furthermore, my parents wish me to be a doctor when I was very young. Because for this, if families are ill, I can help them, which is so convenient. I also realize the dreams of my parents. In all, I am proud of the occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cbdff2d2-2bb3-3aa1-ad98-6c939b8ef8e5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occuption is an important decision of our life. If you choose a job you like and are good at, you will enjoy a happier rest life.
People should turn over a lot of factors when they face the various kinds of jods and make the final decision, such as the pay, the work conditions, the people they work with, the character of boss, the future and so on.Sometimes people will not take whether they like the first place, but regard the salary as the most important thing.
As to me, the best job is decided by three factors: how much you like, whether you have the gift and what you can do for others in it. So I choose the doctor as my lifework. As a doctor, you can not only gain good pay and lots of honor, but also help countless people sufferring bitter and pain, which I think most meaningful and truely makes one happy.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9d3b1031-52e8-3fe7-bdcb-298160851562> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation plays an important role in our life.No matter what we are major in,while graduating,we all will face the problem.The quality of the life in the future depends on what kind of occupation we choose.
Paying attention to every factors about the job can help us a lot,especially the people who lose their ways in the job market.The salary,in many workers' view,plays the essential role in job-hunting.For the workers served in the big factories such as Foxconn,safety may be the first factor they're considering about.The job with high endowment insurance is suitable for the people
with extreme feeling of hardship consciousness.No matter what we treat as the most crucial condition,however,we need to consider every factors while hunting for a job.While mastering the factors,we get the key to find a Satisfition job.
As a medical student,I dream of being a professional doctor.With consummate skill,I'm determinded to solve the pain and sorrow my patients are suffering.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 10e5c72d-79f9-3beb-9909-3a7bfa9c5212> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone should have a job to make a living.There are a lot of choices for us ,but which
one is most suitable for us?Choose occupation is a very  important thing in our life,maybe it
is the second biggest thing after marriage.
What should we consider when we make an occuoation?
First we have to make it clear what we want to be at the beginning of our college and
if not we should find out the answer during our college and the earlier ,the better.When
we know what we want to be ,we can work hard toward that aim.Then at the time we leave
school,we are able to identify what is our right choice.
Second we should think about our interest.Only you are interested in something ,can you
enjoy the thing you are doing and make creative success.So try your best to find a jod
satisfying your nature.
Last but not least,we ought to consider the salary too.We are working to make a
livelyhood,so we must earn enough money to support our basic demand.Enough is OK ,don't
be greedy,otherwise ,you are working for money but money works for you.
As to me,I will coonsider my interest first.I am curious about medical science,so I choose
to study it and decide to be a docter ane day.I think I would enjoy my job .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 46283c52-874a-36b2-9d09-18ffb0cba2f2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, everyone should have jobs in our society. What is more as a
student of university, I have to face this situation, which I should chose my
job. Meanwhile it is very important to make this life discision.
As far as I am concerned, it is necessary for us to take every hand into
consideration before we make job decision. For me, what does matter most is the
interest. Because I believe that what I like most will make me work hard most.
And therefore I will achieve more in my job. But to be honest, every cion has
two sides. So it is hard to say that we will make great achievements in our jobs
which are chosen only by interest. We need others to be considered. Such as our
charactor, our ability, our resource and so on. All of these will make differences
to our success. Take charactor for example. If I like a job such as waiter, but
I am pretty shy, so that I can not do it well, although I like it. Thus in my
opinions, we should take as many hands as we can ioto consideration when we face
chosing jobs.
But,by the way, anything is possible. As for me, I am interested in besiness,
although I am pretty away from my interested job in my charactor and ability. But
just because I like it, I should and will take some measures to make up. So all
in all, I want to be a besinessman in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 00b3d452-c405-31b6-9984-cac00ed35e9b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
I feel a great honor that I can enter shandong university which
is one of the most famous university in medicine . I dream of being a
famous doctor that can cure of many patients in my childhood. I believe
that doctoe is a sacred occupation. I love it very much.
When I entered the sacred medical hall, my life was contributed to the
human health which is my life's goal. So I take it for granted that dotor
is my choosing occupation in the future.
As a medical student, I learn that the medical study is the bitter process
,but I can try my best to come true the dream . I will improve myself as much
as possible. I believe the famous remark that where there is a will there is a
way.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f797e40a-4cbf-3ee8-88dc-8f50d0674d5f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As everybody knows,there are so many kinds of occupations in the world.With the development of science and technology,some new occupations have come into being.Faced with such a lot of occupations,it is of great significance for us to choose a suitable one.Only if we do this can we evoke the potential of us all.
When choosing an occupation,there are plenty of things needed to be considered.The most important factor,in my opinion,is one's interest.As Albert Einstein said,interest is the best teacher.With the inerest and passion for this major and work,one will spare no effort to learn and practice till he become the best of this major,which is no doubt good for one's development.Secondly,the gift and one's personality are also play an important role in choosing an occupation.We need to choose an occupation that we really good at.What's more,some other factors have an influence in choosing an occupation,such as the suggestions of family and the society.
As for me,I would like to be a doctor in the future and now I am studying for it.Though it is hard and tiring,I will devote myself to the  medicial cause of humanity.I am willing to be dedicated.Wish my dream come true!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4cc6ecb6-7159-3657-b3da-4ebcd1585fb5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Recently, the whole world has seen a severe financial crisis, which causes serious rise of jobless rate. Thus, choosing occupation becomes a vitally significant decision for our life.
Many fators should be considered when we choose our occupation. Some are as follows. To begin with, we should find our interest. Doing what we enjoy can bring high motivation to work hard , which can help us live a happy life at the same time. Moreover, salary is aslo a major concern. After all, we must earn our living by ourselves,especially during the special period. A harmonious family will surly do good to our work. In addition, many people prefer to choose a steady job in case of being worried about geting fired day and night.
From where I stand, I decide to become a doctor in the future. Not only because I can have a steady job, but that there has been a dream to be a doctor since my childhood, and I turly want to try my best to save people as mang as possible. I hope that I can have the honor and get satisfied.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 68518de3-46f8-320f-8194-c882c9074273> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is universally acknowledged that choosing occupation is essential to our life,
which is always difficult for us to make a decision.Since there are a large amount
of factors to consider,we must attach great importance to choose a suitable job.
We cam not emphasis the significence to get a job which we are interested in so that we can
be absorbed in it and devote our life to pursue our dreams.Meanwhile, we should consider whether
or not the job is worthy to our society.Beside,we should bring home to people the value of our
family's suggestions.
My desicion is to be a doctor.In my opinion,it is honor to be a doctor,which can save lives and
make contribution to science as well.I choose this job not only for myself,but also for my family.
I have a dream that deseases would be less and less and people in all works of life would have a
happy life forever.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f445930d-d2c1-3205-9bad-84827ab72eac> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing an occupation is a big decision for everyone. After graduation from university
，every one has to face the problem of choosing an occupation, which plays an important part
in his life. An proper occupation can make you work with passion and contribute to the
society.
Choosing an occupation need consider all kinds of factors. two of the most important things
are the interest and the demands of people and society. Only if the two aspects are content, Can we show our talent and ability to the best advantage. If the two conflict，you should  balance them.
As for my choice in the future，I am fond of computer science. So I want to be a computer
scientist. I think that being a scientist is a noble and glorious thing. Because Science makes human progress.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cbf4e9db-2db5-3736-8b01-588103e0ac18> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone has his own enjoying habit,but few people chooses habits as their occ-
upation,because occupations in part are as the same important as people's life.Wh-
at type of occupations they choose lead to what type of life they will live.So,cho-
osing a ture occupation has an important meaning to all of us.
Sometimes,chossing an occupation is not an easy thing,because it contains many
considering matters.First,we should think about the sociaty.We should know about
what kind of things we can do and what kind of position we could get in the public.
Second,we should learn about all kinds of different occupations.we should understand
what are the working directions of different occupations.As long as we know those things
,we can do a better choice.Third,we should consider about can we get from the occupation.
In reality,we should not only care about how much money we can get but also what we can
learn from it.
Above all,my choice is becoming a doctor.One reason is that my learning direction in
university is medicine.Second is that I enjoy it and I consider it as the most meaningf-
ul occupation in the world.Doctors are respected in dalily life,and they do the most im-
portant thing in the world--saving people's life.As young people, we should know,time
and tide wait for no men,and if we want to choose a better occupation and a higher po-
sition,we should make the best of the present time to fulfill our dreams from now on.
Try your best,and I believe everyone will achieve it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 26f92813-ed09-3837-b994-6c1e3afdecfe> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Every one in this world need an occupation for living as fish live in water. So you must
know that choosing occupation is a vital determination in your life to which you must pay
attention.
When you choose your occupation, some factors must be considered carefully. Someone
said that “Interest is the best power,” and we can also see that doing something that
interests you is a beautiful thing in one’ s life. Of course your major should be
referred to when you choose your occupation, which means you can learn to meet practical
needs. Importantly the occupation you will be doing must have a quite light future or you
may get trouble in the process.
For me, I will choose the physical research in my life. My present major is physics
and I will always stick to it. And I think doing physical research isone of the most
beautiful things in my life because I can use my knowledge to solve problems for human
beings. It is my mission.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 891fa1bf-3267-3d94-a0e0-5f17f75f608a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,we have many choices to make.One of the most important choices,as we all know,is choosing occupation.Even there are few people would try varieties of completely different jobs through their lives,the most ,indeed,would do only one job continuely.As a result,we should think it twice before we decide what kind jobs to which probobly devote our  whole lives.
There are some factors which should be considered seriously again and again.Interest,which I think is the topmost when it comes to something like occupation,seems not be attached enough importance today.No interest,no passion,then no occupation could be named career.Another one is the payment,which takes the place of interest and up to the top.Actually,it is less important than the former.But you can not live a happier life without enough money to support your family or only yourself.Then,you should pay attention to the development of the occupation in the future.If a kind of occupation does not have a good view decades later,then you have to think it over.
As far as I am concerned,my choice is definitely doctor,because I am study medicien in university.Moreover,I am immersed in medicien and study to invest the way to keep health of human being.I will get good preparation for my future occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cd5bc452-7214-316b-900a-f01d18fc99eb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
To be or not to be, it is a question. To choose what kind of occupation for ourselves is also a question. Though we cannot choose our born, we can choose our future.Generally speaking, choosing occupation is an important decision for life. It may become a good or bad point of change in our life.
In accordance with a social survey, people have different opinions about choosing occupation. Most of people depend on the salary of the job. Some people depend on their major in colleges. Only a small number of people choosing a job depends on their interests. It needs futher discussion about what is the most important factor in choosing occupation. After we study our major in college for four years, it is obvious that everyone expects to get a job which is relate to the major. However, the real situation of employment is not too positive. We still nees too face the high unemployment rate in society. And I convinced that we learn how to study in college rather than knowledge. So the major in choosing occupation is not that important. As for salary, I think it is not important at the beginning. We should focus on the potentiality of a job at first. We can learn something in occupation and do what we good at. After we do good job and get an opportunity to promote, the high salary will follow. To sum up, there are varioius of factors to influence our choice of occupation, and different people have their own choices.
Anyway, in my view, it is necessary to consider about salary, majors when you are finding a job. But it is not the most important. Therefore, I perfer to find a job counts on my interest. And it has lots of space of promotion in the future. Also, as most people thoughts, if it is related to my major, it's better.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e8b2bd8c-e551-31b3-bdbe-8988017c9b46> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In my view, what occupation means for most people is that you have to spend your whole life on it. Choosing occupation is an important decision for one’s life so that you need to think seriously about it. With the development of society, more and more occupation appears, which provides us opportunities to choose a good job. But, if you want to pick up a job that is suitable for yourself, it would requires you to think about many factors to choose a better job. For instance, you should consider whether the job is what you are interest in, and whether it will give you a stage to show yourself and improve yourself. What’s more, in the long run, you need to earn enough money to feed your family.
And as a medical student, when I choose to study medicine, it means that I choose to be a doctor who can help people get rid of pain and illness. I love this job, although there are much competition in the industry, I will devote myself to it for the whole life

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 291e4d7c-4988-343e-928f-a80889bcdb19> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is an important part of our life,so it is a big choice to choose our occupation.But what types of occupations suit us?
So we have to think about some kinds of things that we will meet and we should know.Firstly,we should learn that which kinds of
occupations we can do,otherwise it is a waste of time.And it is necessary to learn our own advantages and disadvantages,in that
case,we can make a good choice for our occupation.Secondly,we should know how much money we can earn,though it is a common talk,we
all need enough earnings.Thirdly,the interest is an important element that we can't overlook.If we don't like this job,it is mostly
destined that we can't make a great progress in it.Last but not the least,the enough skills is necessary.If we don't have some skills
about that job,what we had done is to work in vain.
In my opinion,the doctor is a good job for me,because i am majored in medical science and what we have learned is to save people.
It is a great achievement when your patients are saved.At the same time,I like medical science more than other jobs,maybe it is an
element that make me do that choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 364edf26-fefa-316f-85b6-169ab40817c4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is counts more that choosing occapution than going to a college.
while we are in Senior high,what we were caring  about most was that which college would we choose.Instead of choosing a
career.However,as we come to the university.It is gradually becomes more clarely that the thing we used to neglected was the
life's  most important part,which result in how your own life will be.
As consequence we should be as much serious as we can while choosing occupation.There are many tips that we should keep an
eye on as follows.
Firstly,you should ask yourself 'what I like most in mylife?'.For interest is the energy to your work.Otherewise your life will
be a complete dust every minute.Secondely,to apply your ears to others' bona fide advice,such as your parents',avoiding make
an impluse.thirdly,You are supposed to think it carefully whether itone can feed yourself and your family in the future.everyone
has his or her own responsbility to support a family.
I didn't feel any regurt while choosing to be a doctor in the future.Becuse I Love helping people and talking with them.And I
think it is goodness to reduce their pain within my power.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ed908796-8f93-3188-9893-3c0a0e1974a7> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is an important determination for everyone in the
life.It determined how successfully you would achieve in the future and the contentment of your whole life.
There are many facts that we should consider when we choosing our Occupation.First,intersting is most important.If the job you choose is not intersting for you,you would find it so boring,as a result,you wouldn't have the enthusiasm and patience to do your job well.Second,the Occupation you choose must be something what you are good at or you are familiar with.Third,you have to consider the interaction with your family.
My choosing is computer science for I have intersts in it.It is so amazing.You know,computer is neccessory in the future and it could do much things for our human,but it isn't good enough now and we have the chance to improve it.I would try my best to do it well to improve human life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID da45cc91-efd1-3575-90bc-284a09af2073> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is known to us all that choosing occupation is the essential choice in our life. The reason why it is so important is that
it plays an important part in our life. If we do have a right choice, we will live a happy life form then on.
How to choose occupation? That is the major problem. As far as I am concerned, we should take the follow elements into
consideration. First and foremost, we should listen what our heart said. Second, we should consider the payment. Sometime the
payment has effort on our life quality. Last but not the least, we should assess ourselves: do we have the ability which the
work call for.
My choice is that to be a doctor. I could help people get rid of illness in this way. What's more, I could become a useful
Person to the social.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0f465e6a-3b06-34db-a696-eb0f5fc53d07> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are many ways in our life,and we have to face choosing to decide the way that we want to go. Choosing Occupation
is the important one of the many choosing in our life.As far as I know that choosing Occupatiom is a decision which is
important and difficult.
As we all know,when we face to choosing occupation,we need think a lot of things about it.First of all,we should think of
personal emotion whether you love the occupation.If you do somenthing you don't like,you will feel very tired,boring and even
often get into trouble.If you like it,you will feel your life is very interesting,meaningful and you will finish you work easily
and perfectly,then you will succeed.Secondly,I feel that salary shouldn't be ignoral.Because we have to get money to support
ourselves and our family.It is a perfect decision that you love it and get a thick salary.And there are many reasons like
your family,enviroment etc...
My choosing occupation is doctor.The most important reason is that I want to help people who are in trouble.I don't want
to see my family in illness but Ican't do anything.So this is my choosing.I hope that I can do it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6d467e4a-90eb-36ba-86b4-6ecc692518d9> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a great case, which would make a big influence in our life. So
how to choose your job become important to everyone of us. In fact, there are many aeres we
need to concern.
No one do not want to get a well-paid job that suits his hobbies, and can get fun while
working. Of course, it's wanderful if we can get this kind job. However, things never always
go as expected, and also, we need to think about more when we made the final decision. for
example, about the situation, the fulture of the company. What we need is not only enough
money, but to a good situation which would make a great influence in the quality of life.
Both, the job that we choose must suits in your majorition in college, if you want to get
improved. Last but not the least, though everyone wants to be occupied by a big company,
it's also a perfect idea to choose small company which would surport you more opptunities.
As I am concerned, as a grade one student, I wish I would be occupied by a middle-side
hospital. There are many reasons. Fisrtly, in this kind of hospital, I will get atention of
than in big hospitals other doctors whom would teach me a lot of things that I can't get in
school,and more chancesto improve myselves, for I need chances, the better the more chances
, to get experienced. And also, in middle hospital, I will earn more money than in small kind
of hospital, to surport my family.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 67737425-0271-3c37-9547-a12a222fb3d2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, with the rapid development of our society, choosing occupation is becoming a more and more significant task for us.
As it is known to us all , in order to choose the most suitable occupation for yourself, there are plenty of factors which influence your choice that you should carefully think about.
To begin with, personal preference is the first question that comes to your mind. As we all know, interests is the best teacher. So once you choose what you like, you can get the chance to take up a career with great devotion, which has the great possibility to lead to your success. What's more, your own condition, including mental and physical, is another essential factor. For instance, you can not achieve your dream to become a painter while you are blind. Last but not least, the need of the society. We should be realistic that nobody can leave without money, and the need of the society decides whether the money you earn on your career can make you have a comfortable life or not.
Based on those factors above, my choice is to become a doctor. Although I realize what I decide to do is so hard, I will devote myself to it to achieve my own success.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b1b8819a-8bb0-3ac7-b10d-b61af24a1fef> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw,choosing occupation is one of the most important determinations in our life,which plays a spesial role in personal life ,family and the society.As a result, every one is supposed to take serious attitude to make the descision.
Diverse factors should be taken into accounts when choosing an occupation.First,I think, the most key factor is interest.As far as I am concerned,as long as you major in a subject that you are fed on ,you can really devote yourself to it and make some achievements.What's more,advantage is an essential factor that should't be negleted.Make the best of your advantage,you will make rapid progress more easily.In addition,another one is the value of your occupation.It's through the job we do that we contribute to others and the socirty,.Accordingly ,we should choose an occupation that is meaningful to ohers.In a word, when choosing occupation,we should turn all kinds of factors over.
When it comes to me, I have choosen the occupation of docrors, which I think is a great occupation.Though the prosess of learning is tough,we all think it deserves.Moreover, this occupation is essential to the society.We can't imagine what will be a society if there are not doctors.
Now that I have made this determination, I know clearly that I shoulder big responsibilities. So,I will share no efforts to study and help any people who needs help.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9701383c-f2e9-333d-9194-6477444205ae> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a Chinese saying goes,men care about choosing incorrect occupation as women choosing incorrect husbands. Occupation we choosed will string about us for a long time.All in all,choosing occupation is a essential determination of our life time.
We must take lots of factors into accution when choosing occupation.One of them is interest.As we all know,interest is the best teacher.If we choose a occupation related to our interest, we will do our best. Another is salary.To be honest,occupation is a way for us to get money to suvival.Occupitions leading to good salary will make our life more comfortable.Others are suggestions of parents,the knowledge we learnt in college,and the rest.
For me, I choose doctor to be my occupation.On one hand,doctor can lead happiness to more people . On the other hand,according to my charactor ,doctor is the best choosing.I will do my best.I will never regret for my choosing.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c556b400-73f7-3bdf-a19d-ebd17751b8cf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays，more and more graduates are thinking about not noly hunting jobs but also choosing theiroccupations.The job situation of the society is more and more secious.As we all know,choosing right occupations is also an important thing for us.So,what should we do to handle the problems towards chooosing our occupation?
When it comes to choosing one's occupation,we should think about all kinds of reasons and barriers in order to live a better life in the future.First,we should think about the knowledge we have learnt as well as the skills we have practiced so that we can handle the job better.Then,we must realize that the interest is the best thing to guide one to success.If you have nointerest in one iob or other matter,just quit it if possible.One have said that"Interest makes the best teacher.".Last but not least,the situation you work in is equally important because you cannot work well in bad working conditions.
As for me,I think Iwill choose the one that I can be passionate when I am working,like a doctor,in which way not only can I require happiness but I can devote more to the society and other people. Maybe I can gain a feeling of achievement and satisfiment after my efforts.So,be careful to choose your occupation and you'll be enjoyable to do it!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b0cee1a6-3f43-3441-a275-2e82b7517518> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that choosing occupation is an important decision in our life.T
There are many reasons to think about why and how to choose occupation.In the first
place,we are college students now and will step into the society and set up the family
so chooseing a porper occupation is of much importance to us.In addition,a good occupation
would be helpful to our developmnet in the future.
Obviously,choosing occupation is not an easy thing and it is reffered to many diffeerent
factors.First,you shouldd consider your interest and hobby,which is necessary to your
development.Only if you like and enjoy the occupation can you try your best to show your
talents and ability in your own field.Secondly,the prospect is also a major factor you have
to think over.If you choose a job that will be not hot in the future,you will not have a good
development.
As far as I am concerned,I will choose to be a doctor.For one thing,the doctor is a stable
job all the way compared to other ones.for another,I have a dream in my childhood that I want
to help and save many and many people who are ill or injured.Therefore,I choose to be a doctor
and I wish to be a outstanding one to make contributions for the human beings.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5cac1aaa-6f30-3d9c-a4e0-98ff40c038b8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing your occupation seems to be a serious and extremely essential thing for almost everyone .
You must be pretty careful when you make decisions . But what should you pay attention to when you choose
your own occupation ?
When you face the choice ,what you should think over carefully varies from person to person .Nevertheless,
what ever you do ,something is in common. To start with ,you'd better consider your interest.What do you like and
how do you like it .Interest is very important for a person who want to be successful . And than , konw more about
the situation .Make sure what you do can make your sense and do good to our society.Last but not the least ,ask your
parents for help .They have more experience than us and it's must be helpful.Besides ,you  should think over something
which is valueable for you .
Everyone is serious when they choose their job ,and so am I .I have been anxious to be a doctor since I am a little girl .
And now ,I'm trying my best to do it .I believe I can do it .Just do it .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b056e015-ab15-3932-bb9d-ae311104b65c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
The moment when we choose our major studied in college has partly decided what we will do in the future.Since college graduations
are no longer guaranteed with jobs,it has been increasingly important to choose an occupation you like cautiously.
Choosing occupation properly can lead you to a totally different life in part.And we should take many factors in account.First of
all,as the old saying goes---"Interest is the best teacher",to succeed is more easier if a person loves his job.However,only a few
people have the fortune to combine jobs with interests perfectly,and people who don't like their jobs can also reach the success.
So,what kind of job you are suit for maybe is more dependential than what you like,charactors,in other word.Lastly,since we live
in a substaintial society,we have to put much emphasis on the payment of a job.A hirh-paid occupation is undoubtedly attactive.And
a good income is the basement of living a wealthy life.
When it comes to me,I choose to study dental medication in my college,and this had depend what I will do after seven years mostly.
I love my major,although I am  not so sure about whether I am suit for it.But I am sure I will study for my future with great passion.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fc2b0d56-2925-3604-bfb0-1a2809ad233f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is very important for everyone. You dream what you want to be and that is your choosed occupation. You chase the excellent work that your passion for and the success will visit you some day. So, choosing occupation is really a big decision for your whole life.
Choosing your occupation need to consider various aspects of facts. What is your enthusiasm for? What is your biggest advantage of? What can you do best and pay your life to?
My choice for the occupation is to be a doctor. When I was at young age, I liked the feeling standing in the hospital. The faint fragrance of the drug and soda water made me excited. At that time, I decided to be a doctor. Years passed by and I entered the chemical school. I love every course that I taken. My dream is so close to me and I can imagine 5 years later, I can become a real doctor wearing the white gown.
Yes. What your passion for can act an important role in your life when you choose your occupation. Choose the occupation you like and you fit, don't be afraid, and one day when you are old, you would not regret.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID efa57002-b5ad-3b6d-9822-a69437afeffe> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Whennever you are in the world, we need to work. As a result of the importance of
occupation, we're asked what to do in the future from we're very young.And anyway,
it's really an essential decision when you grow up.
There are many factors to consider when we are choosing an occupation. First of all, we need
to take account of our interests. In fact, what you like indeed can't be knowed by
yourselves sometimes even. However, you need to find it out, because it's very important for
your occupation choice.Then, we should attach importance to our talents. Although all men
are born equal, we're not the same to an extent. For example, some are good at performing,
while others have flexible hands to do experiments. So good occupation choices differ from
different people. Finally, we have the responsibility to serve the society, and we  have to
make our decisions partly according to the employment environment. Whether you are needed by
the country or by the world is a factor we need to turn over.
Above all, you may ask what my occupation choice is.As my major is clinical medicine, my
first choice is to be a doctor. But the world is changing fast, and chances are that I find
something attracting me very much which I never think ahout it. Nevertheless, who knows the
future?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4d33cddd-a563-33d9-b4c7-5e8189cd0076> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is a famous sentence in ancient China,"Every occupation has a top". So choosing a proper occupation is definatly an importent step on your way to success.Frankly speaking, I'm convinced that only we choose a proper occupation can we have the possibility to be a super star in the field we devote our live in.
Now that we have been aware of the importance of choosing occupation, we should know some strategies about how to choose a proper occupation wisely. It's apparent that we should take  many factors into consideration,but what are those factors on earth? Now I will show you some specific things.At the beginning, the interest is the most important factor of all. If you enjoy doing your job, you must have passions when you work. And, as we all know,the passion is the source of successes. Then I suppose that another important factor is your advantages. Providing that not every one is good at doing the job he is interested in, we shuld find out what kind of occupation we can do well in .
I have chosed my occupation,and I'm going to devote my life in medicine career. I made this choice for the sake of my interets to medicine,and I want to be a man who can make contributions to the whole society.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ed7bd4dd-ff5a-3b3e-a51c-dddc91b9351d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After grated from universities,It is natural to think what will people do,it was very important because it may determine what will people do in their last living and whether they  will succeed at last.
In my eyes,The most important fator is interest,if people choose jobs which they have dreat of many years.most of them will do the jobs by their hearts and they will probably succeed. Another fator is the jobs' value,I think most people think that we find jobs that at least insure we can live by it ,if people not know what to do or have many interest,they can consider by which job they can have a more comfortable life.such as which job makes more money and is not very hard,which working-place are near to the kindergardon etc. people should also consider whether they can do the job although it can be solved sometime by peoples' determination.
As to me,I want to be a scientist someday because I am interested in it and when I am old ,I will go back my hometown and find a job in the school.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 89d09012-0705-3ed4-9efe-2c23d35a163d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When I am a child,many people asked me,what do you want to do in the future?Because I was a child,I don't think what I should
do in the future.But now I am a man,not a boy,so I must think about this question.I think,choosing occupation is a important decisionin our life.
Then I will talk about how to choose occupation in my eyes.
In our chilhood,our's job is studying.The time is passnow we are people.We must choose a suitable occupation to do.When you choose
a occupation,you need think about much factor.For examples,Do you like it? Do your parents like it? Are you suit it? Is this occupation have a
good prospect? etc.All of the questions should you think about.To myself,I choose to be a doctor.Because I like doctor.And I think If I
can heal others people who have the disease?I will feel happy and noble.And my parents also like doctor.They also ask me to be a
excellent doctor.To myself,I also have confidence to be a good people,using my power to cure others.But medical science's work is very hard.
So we must work hard than others.
Choose medical science is my decision.To be a doctor is my decision.I think,I will insist this decision in all my life,and I don't
regret this decision forever.I will work hard.Believe me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 086685cf-ae65-3c52-8b04-14cf2c666b9d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is an important part in our life. So your choice of occupation may decide the compliment you could achieve.
Choosing occupation can be a complex affair. You should consider many factors. Maybe most of us will put the salary on
the first place. Yes, the main role an occupation plays is making money. But what eles shoule we take into account? I
think interest is a factor of significance. To the majority, one job may accompany him for a whole life. If you were not
interested in it, how can you do well in your job? And value of the occupation to the society must be considered. We all
live in the society. We should think over how to repay the society when absorbing nutrition from it.
My choice of occupation is doctor. First, to be a doctor is a dream when I was a little boy yet, and I am so interested in
this occupation. Then, doctor is a lofty profession. A doctor can save human's life by his hand. And, doctor have a high
income relatively.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5653d795-cc26-33c5-a238-b7c638cc8678> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,it is necessary for people to choose an occupation
in their lives because people must do something useful to society.
Occupation is so important a choice that we must  put on our thinking
caps.
You are supposed to consider many factors before you make the choice
such as your interest,your timetable,the salary and so on.As far as
I'm concerned,you should accord topmost priority to your interst.After
choose an occupation,you are likely to devote your whole life to it.
So it is horrible if you do not like your job.In addition,your timetable
is another important thing to consider.Because you are not only a
worker but also a family member.You need to spend enough time with
your family.What's more,the saraly is important too,since you need it
to making a living.
When being asked what I will do in the future,I will declare that I
will be a doctor firmly.In my opinion,doctors are holy,because they
save patients who suffer from pains.And I like to help others,so I want
to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7f25d4bb-9ca1-3bc5-b409-b872b14b0f74> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is decision of vital importance in our life.It decides
the direction of your life.
Therefore we should take all kinds of factors into consideration when choosing the
occupation.When we finished the college entrance examation,all of us were faced with this
question.First of all,the interest is the most imporment part,which should be accounted for.
Then it is also necessary to think about the situation of the whole society.For instence,
With the development of science and technology there is a growing number of individuals that
love the work which is contacted with computer.The last but not the least,we are required
to turn over the salary which is the most relistic question we are confront with.What's more,
in my opinion,we should take the parenta' idea into consideration.
When it comes to me,my major is the clinical medicine and about seven years later I will
be a doctor.At first I have a dream to become a doctor when I was young.Then it is my parents'
idea to let me choose this occupation.I love it and I can do better.
Taking all above into conclusion,it is so important to choose occupation that we should
turn over again and again to take responsibility for ourselves and our parents.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c8026a61-a539-3ae1-bca3-afadbdf5b35f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing an appropriate occupation is a big decision in our life, because once you choose a wrong or an unsuitable occupation, you will regret a lot during your whole life.
There are many things to be considered on choosing your occupation. Firstly,I think interest should be considered above all,because only if you have interest in your job can you have a great achievement.Secondly,It should depend on our major,such as Computer Science,Math,and so on. Also,salaries cannot be ignored.Last but not the least,it depends on  on our characteristics,such as some people love to travel,while others not.
I want to be a computer engineer or an computer scientist.Because my major is computer science and I like it very much.It is so stable that I can spend more time with my family.
What's more,its salary is not so bad,hah.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d5fdaef6-4568-3c29-9e1e-6b12dcd1c23e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are some important stages that everyone must experience.One of those stages is working.Working is a way to earn our own lives and to achieve our goal.Thus,choosing accupation is a significant decision.If
we have a job both fit our taste and talent,our life will be more easy
and happy.
When choosing occupation,we should have a full consideration of all
the factors,like working time,salary,and the working place.Besides,we
should think about our majors and whether we really love that job.We all
kown that we will never feel tired when diving into what we really
interest.To the contrast,everyone will lose temper easily coping with the
things they disgust.So,finding a job with good salary that fit you,you have maken a half of your goal.
As myself,to be a scientist may be a good choice.I love to get along
with bottles and different compounds,and it's really a funny thing to
make new materials and search a new way for manufacture.The payment and
future of this job is also an attraction to me.
Choosing a proper occupation is really important.so,make your own
decision and never hasitate.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID beba6209-612c-3cee-b37d-a4c3bd2eda69> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most significant desicion that one would make in his or her whole life.The reason why it is so important is that a good job will demond one's life quality afterwards.
Choosing occupation should be faced up to seriously,since it is a complex progress that many elements may influence,such as the salary and awards,the working situation,working risk,the room to be in a higher position and so on.Besides,as far as I'm concerned,interest and dream will be the first elements influencing my decision about jobs.
When I was a little boy,I witnessed that my grandpa died from a rare kind of cancer.All of the family was immersed in a sad atomosphere.What shocked me most is that how powerless human being is before the illness and desasters.So I decided to be a doctor for the sake of saving people who suffered from pain and panic as much as possible.Untill I was admitted by a medicine college , it makes me fell more close to fulfilling my dream.As for concrete occupation,I think both being in a big hospital or tiny clinic are ok,as long as I can saving others.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6959b83d-4da8-3b30-afc6-ad7003789adb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in one'e whole life.Different people have different decisions about their occupation.
There are various kinds of aspects we should think over when they chooose occupations.There can be three main aspects that we should consider seriously.Firstly,we should choose occupation that we like very much.As as saying goes , interest is the best teacher.Meanwhile,if we are interested in something,we will do it better than something that we have no emotions. Secondly,we should compare our knowledge and major with occupation we are going to choose.We are supposed to choose occupation that we are good at.Last but not least,we should also keep an eye on society trendency.We should choose occupation that is useful and effective to society development.Above all, interest is the most important aspect that contribute our decision.
As far as I am concerned,I choose my occupation as a doctor.When I was a little girl,I had a  dream to be a doctor and I choose medical major after senior high school.And now ,I am a freshman at Shandong University and study medical.I certainly will choose doctor as my occuopation and achieve my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 338797db-c2aa-3181-b7ce-9258e5de11c8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we grow older day by day,each of us must face a problom which is about choosing occupation.I think it is a very important choice.
Because if we choose one job,we seldom change it.We must do this job for the whole life.So it is very important to choice a good job
which is suit myself.
In my opinions,there are a lot of factors that we must think about.First,we must choose a job that we like to do.If we don't like
a job,we cannot do the best and we cannot get success.Second,we should konow whether the job is a hot one or a cold one.We should try
to choose a hot one,I think.Third,we should know that how long can we do the job.If the job only can continue a short time,we must
give up.Finally,I want to say something.Occupation choosing is a hard question,we must think a lot for the question.We cannot make the
choice at once. We should be responsible for ourslves.
I think I have made a good choice.I choose to be a doctor in the future.I think it's a good job and I like to help others who need help,
and I love to do the job.Also my parents like this job.They think I can be a good doctor in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5623088b-6a01-362c-b7dc-425367b533ba> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to us all,occupation is very important to people's life.A right occupation can make your life and work happy.If you choose an unsuitable occupation,you will lead a bad life and your work will not be finished perfectly. So,choosing occupation is of great importance for men.
Occupation plays an important role in our life.So we should more care about how to choose a right occupation.Choosing occupation should think about many factors.First,we should figure out where our interests stress in.In some aspects,interests have a huge influence in our occupation.It can influence our enthusiasm in our occupation.Second,we need to take the working environment and wage into consideration.A good working environment can bring to us good mood and healthy bodies.A good wage can meet our needs and make us have the ability to seek for a better life.Last but not least,whether the occupation is stable or not is another factor we should think about beause a stable job can make you live a peaceful life.
As far as I'm concerned,my occupation is doctor.Because I think doctor is an occupation with respeact and this occupation can give me a good working environment and a good wage. More inportantly, I have a big interest in this occupation.So I think I will do well and acquire happiness in this occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 852b7983-dcc4-30e1-be13-517f3379117f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When it cmes to the choosing occupation,all of us  are careful and cautious,because it is one of the biggest things in our whole life.it is a big decision,it directly makes a great difference to our fulture.
Hence,when we choose  the job ,we should consider a world of elements,such as:interests of ourselves,district,family's opinions, the prospect of the occupation,and so on.Fistly,the job should  catch the fancy of us,in this way,we can wokk with happy.Secondly we also should listen to others' suggestions more,maybe they are useful.however,the final decision is just depedented on us,choose the useful information in our mind.And for our familys'happy life,we do expect to have a job of high salary.So we may go to the city to make our living.
As for me ,my choice is to be a scientist,it is my vainly hope,I will go for it,no mattte what difficulties are wating for me,I will never give up.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d28a7c19-598d-3b08-bc9e-c622652b4d77> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We all kown that choosing occupation is a very important decision in one's whole life.What we should do is that pay all of our attentions to what we want to do.Choose a pleasant job just not regret some time later.
However,choosing a good job is never a easy thing.We need to consider every possible matters.In fact,there are many factors having a influence on our occupation choosing.For example,own interst depends a lot.Factly,if we want to work with a good mood,we must choose a job which meets own interst.Then,the management of company,the traffic arroud the work place,the salary and so on.But I want to say that there also is one factor that matters a lot.It is the relationship between your colleagues.I always  believe that weather you are happy when you work depends a lot on your who your colleagues are or what they are doing.
Now that job is a so important thing that it can influence one's whole life,so,I will treat it as my most important thing.I will choose anyone job as long as I can work for it with a pleasant spirit.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7883e351-3016-39a9-b2a9-6bdc22840aa1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is known to all of us that choosing occupation is a considerable significant decision in our life.A proper occupation helps people fulfill their dreams and
make something meaningful for the society. The most important one is that people will be energetic and willing to try their best to do their work if the
occupation is the one that they love.
Many factors should be taken into consideration as follows.Firstly,which career is correspond to one's interests.Because interests has endless power  .Secondly,
the major which one learnt should be suitable for the occupation.As the saying goes the difference between two major just like the distance between two bid
mountains.Last but not least,salaries can not be ignored. As we grow up, it is our responsibility to make for our own lives rather than depending on our parents.
If the salary of the occupation is to low for us to make for our daily life ,it is better to choose another one .
As far as I'm concerned ,my majior is biology and it is hard for me to get an ideal occupation if I do not make every efforts to study .I want to become a professor
after I get a PHD degree.First,I like teaching students and enjoy the feeling of standing in front of the classroom writing on the blackbord.Second,as 0a professor in
a university ,I can have my own laboratory and I can do some experients that are beneficial to peopele's health .I will enjoy my career and life .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2d49fd96-e2d8-3039-a021-47836864f87b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know choosing occupation is one of important things to us. Having a good and suitable job can help a person have a happy life, a warm family, maybe a rich one. For men, a good job can not only earn money, but also make him gental, calm, and confident.For womem, a good job will help them open their mind. So have a nice choosing occupation is very impotrant and necessary.
When we choose an ossupation, something should be thought about carefully.Priority is our interest. When we will go into the socity, we should chose what we most interseted occupation, in this way, we can be glad to work it out. Then the time is also important. A good job is a job,and not your life, so we shouldn't put all our time in it. We also have time to relax, do something we love, and stay with families.
I should choose a suitable job for myself, i will respect my families'opinions firstly. As a medical student, I will be a doctor, with the knowledge and my warm heart to save lifes. I also want to ask eveybody to live healthly, keep the hospotal away. Now that i chose to be a doctor, i will try my best to it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 270472ce-f28e-3644-8ed1-9f29fe3b319d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is the most important thing in the whole life.Our lives is connected with the occupation.
In my opinion,chossing occupation is very difficulty.Because we must consider every thing.For example,we can not ignore our hobby ,the environment and so on.And our parnets will give us some advice.Their suggestion are prefer importent.But I do not like only follow their suggestion.I think that we should make the choice by ourselves.Because this is our own thing.And we are the persons who are clearest to knew our own choice.Of course,now,we are enough old to make choice.And we also should make our own choices from our hearts.And we must not follow most people' choices.We must know it is our own thing.
My choice is to become a doctor.Because it is my own choice.And the key is that I like becaming a doctor.So I will try my best to
became a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 128fa5e2-828e-3060-9dd7-b9d5ba824eac> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is of great significance for everyone to choose the occupation that we will work on all our life.It decides both whether
we can reach the high steep peak, expand our horizons and be a success.
Suitable occupation leads to happy life. Therefore, my dear friends, must take this item for good considertaion. Interests are
one of the most important factors, as I see, for its great encouragement.Besides, the prospects and outlooks cannot be ignored. At
last but not the least, you are supposed to observe yourself carefully, learn your talents and your character. This point really
matters because it decides the height you can arrive at.
When it comes to choosing occupation, the opinions vary from individuals to individuals. I list and measure the advantages and
disadvantiges, finding the one suits me best, to be a doctor. I fall in deep love with my major, and it seems that she love me at the same time. I am
willing to occupy myself to the great task and shoulder the mission of history to help the people in pain.
Sincerely, I hope you can find the one you love.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1a40f9a1-9032-3b0a-bc26-60bd73129832> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nobody can force you to do what you don't want to in the world,and of course,you should not expect others to choose occupation for you,including you parents,teachers,or other people who are really important to you.You are totally free to do all you want.So you must think it which may influence your whole life carefully.
We are college students now.I think there should be nobody that consider himself as a child or make others treat him as a childlish guy.We have learned much knowledge,and we already have the ability of choosing the way for ourselves that we may go further.But no one can be sure about it's true until he know the future,which is impossible.So we are supposed to pull the future in our heart.however,we can judge our choose true or wrong by everything that we have.Whether the occupation that we choose is really fit me?If I am interested in it?And we may consider if our conditon permits.Above all,you must think about you heart and soul.
Considered about all of this,I decided to be a doctor.I must get the skills to protect my mother who suffers operation from disease.My burth won't be her suffering no longer!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fe3be67c-53f6-3e3f-a562-6dac3373c1fb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important thing in our life. This thing will mostly decide
our whole life. Chooising a good job well make us earn more money and have a happy life. But
when we choose a job which we do not like, we will can't do our best with the job.
Nowadays，every one want to have a job which will earn much money. But I think that money is
not the most important thing on choosing occupations. Hobbies is also a very important thing.
If we like the occupation that we choose, we will do our best to make it well. so, we will
make the job will. When it occurs to choose a job, there are many things we must think about.
Whether the occupation is hot now, whether the occupation will honored by other poeple and whether
the occupation will earn much money are all the things we must think about.
Now I'm a university student, and I will choose my own job no longer in future. When you
ask me what is the most important thing to choose a job. i will tell you that they are money
and interest. I must choose the job I loved. And these will make me have the energhy to do
it better.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 94f4f4bf-9838-3f67-b0f1-5ace53b7e415> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that choosing occupation is of vital importance for the occupation do have huge influence on you in the future.
For instance,if you chose a job you loved and was ready to devote yourself to it,you would,possiblly,capture a title in the area.
All sorts of factors have to be put into account to make sure that you choose the occupation you need.The one that should put
top is interest.As the proverb says "Interest is the best teacher",you can get energy and courage to furhter your way without feeling
depressed.Health is,obviously,the other factor counts a lot.A weak or sick man can never bare the burden of hard work is what we all
kown.What's more,even through you own a stubborn will to do so,you wouldn't achieve your goal.
So I have made my mind to be a doctor,for sake of sympathy and desire to help people.And the fact shows that I am able to work on
end.Although it's generally thought as a hard business by many people,in my eyes ,it adds the glory to my name.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 97278fb3-2426-3f5f-9ae7-fbddd60a9c9d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In morden society,job plays a more and more important role in a persons's whole life.It will influence you at all aspects,so choosing occupation is a significant decision for everyone.
When we choose our jobs,there are many elements that should be considered.First and the most important is salary.I think consider money is realistic and meaningful.There is no escaping the fact that we need money for everything.Then  people will think more about the relation between their majors and the jobs.If the two are fit with each other,then it is the best.Next,they will consider where to work,whereas,working can not sepreate from daily life.Many young people will choose Beijing or Shanghai or other big cities.
On the other hand,the choicemay be influence by elements of families. People should consider if the job will benefit family members,if the job gives them enough time to take care of children, if it is convenient to bo back home to visit parents when theyare homsick. In a word,all the things around you may affect your occupation choice.
And for me,a medicine student,there is no doubt that I will be a doctor in the future.My career is decided by my major.Being a doctor is my childhood dream.so my job is also decided by my dream.Of course,choosing doctor still has many other reasons.
So,for choosing occupation,you should consider as much as possible.It never too much to think before you decide your own career.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7d770fc3-ab36-3ac6-b594-85539e60264b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
To all of us,choosing occupation is an important determination.Because we will do this job almost in our whole life.It can
influence our future and life.so choosing occupation carefully is much important.
During the process of choosing,we must think about enough facts.For example ,we have to combine our own interest with choice
and we should find out what the job does on earth or we may dislike it.And we should investigate the future of the occupation and
at the same time it is useful to listen to various advice from parents or teachers because they have more experience than us.In
fact,there are a lot of key facts to take into accout. In a word,making this choosing is vitial and difficult.
My choice is studying the medicine and it is no doubt that my aim is being a wonderful doctor in the future. At that time,my
parents and I discussed my occupation repeatedly.All of us had very carefull attitude towards this thing.According my grade, interest
and a series of thinking in detail,we made some plans in order to decide it further.Finally I choose to study the medicine.As a girl,
some physical job is unfit for me and I am interested in the occupations like doctor ,teacher and so on. Being a doctor can apply
me with a comfortable living enviroument although my life may be a little tired.I am not afraid of being tired because I like study
the medicine. I think I have done a right choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f8545ee6-72af-3439-af8b-845c067b9750> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is a great decision for everyone to choose his or her occupation. But all kinds of complex things shoud be considered when chooosing a jod. So this decision can be very difficult to make.
Considering my own interests and my dream, I have made my decision to be a scientist.
For my part, a scientist works for his or her own interest not money. When a scientist works, he or she can be very excited. Being a scientist, I can enjoy myself when working. In addition, I like the feel of inventing things. I want to create something which is unique all over the world. Last but not the least, I think the most important thing for a country's development is sience. Thus I make my decison to do contributions to the development of science of China. Only in this way, can our country be stronger. It is my duty to contribute myself to the development of my country.
We should consider our own interests, dreams, abilities and so on when choosing a jod. And this decision will affect our life. So do be careful when choosing occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fe57cc23-65a1-36b0-b76f-dc9af131af8c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is obverious that choosing occupation is an important decision of everyone.It can influnce the our life directly,
so we should consider many factors before we make a decision of choosing an occupation.
the factors including:Firstly,the pay or salary,which is the most important factor of all.besides,the difficulty of the job
is another factors,If the job is too difficult for you and it does not suitable for you,will you choose it?Thirdly,you have to
consider that do you have the interest and passion in your work.If not,maybe you will think your job is a suffering.The relati-
onship with your boss and colleages can also influnce your emotion.
As far as I am concerned,I think the the most important factor of choosing occupation is whether the job is suitable for me.So
I choose to be a doctor,which I'm familiar with，Because my father is a doctor both my grandpa.And I hope I made a correct decision.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fa8239f8-6819-3650-a983-07abf76a3b23> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
College students who graduated from or to be graduate from college have to face with the question—choose a occupation, which will influence their rest of lives.
But how can we make a proper choice? To choose a job we love, or job which can earn a lot of money? So you can see, A varity of
factors should be taken into consideration when choosing occupation. However, do always harder than say. You just say "A varity of factors", but it always different between two individuals.
As a students who is studying medicine, it seems that the only chioce I can choose is to become a doctor. However, if you think I'm right, I can tell you "you are absolute wrong". I want to be a lawyer, for doctors can only cure people's body, but a layer can cure people's spirits--to let them know their rights which they do not know now. Fighting for human beings' democracy is always my dream, and i think our society is in serious needs of such fighters. So, I choose my occupation based on my love of that occupation , or in other words, my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5d8a302a-a25b-3dc2-89b8-6b96f583bf8f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society,more and more people realize the importance of choosing occupation.We can't fail to notice
that it is a significant decision for a great number of persons.But how can we choose the right one ?
As we all konw ,when we seek for a job,we may be confused . So we should consider about jobs a lot.First,the place where
we intent to be is important.Some folks would like to go somewhere far away home ,and some not.Second,most persons feel like
a job which can make use of the knowledge that they have learned.Thus they might choose the kind of jobs.Third,we can't just
concern ourselves,our parents will give me some advice and hope us we can take it.And we shoud care for their thoughts.
Finally, which is most important is that we should choose a job which we like.If we aren't interested in it ,we won't be
happy with it.
For my part,I will be a dentist.Because I like the job and this is what I am learning,I'm happy at using my knowledge
during my work.In additon, I hope I can be near my family,in that my parents only have one child ,and it is me.Thus ,I will
consider their advice.In a word ,I want to have a good job and I don't want to make a wrong choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 57bce46c-b719-3e39-aa36-42aed14f3dd8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no escaping the fact that it is an important decision to choose an occupation,which can even have a great influence on your life.
However sometimes what you like does not always make a good life.Choose what you like, or what you can rely on to make a good life? That is a question.Everyone wants a happy life of high quality.Choosing what you like means you choose happiness and choosing another means you choose a life of high quality.It's hard to decide.In fact there are numbers of elements when it comes to choosing occupation,such as interest，family, expectation and even marrigde.You have to consider every aspects and combine.Be careful and serious.
I will choose happiness even though I'll suffer a lot in the future.I will always be happy even my life is in low quality.only by choosing what I like can I focus all my attention and my soul on it,and then I can make achievements.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6e23b5d0-4501-38f3-b2d1-0627319841d3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is one thing of great importance due to its leading effect of one's life after various education. So everyone pay much attention to it.
When it comes to choosing occupation, there are many kinds of factors waiting to be considered. In brief, at least two aspects are necessary to be thought of carefully, which are what you want and what you need. What you want consist of your individual interests, dreams you have been keeping, and what you need are made up of whether your income can cover your payment, how hard the work is and so on.
As for me, what plays the most valuable role is my interest.So I just chose medicine major following my heart. I still remember the struggling moment when I had to make a choice which would nearly decide my future in three days without any exact understanding of any major. The only thing I'm sure was that I loved something related to lives but not something without spirits. So I finally chose medicine major which proves to mean much more than what I once thought. Maybe I will face all kinds of challenges both in the procedure of study and in the way of being a good doctor, but I believe that if only I try my best, I can beat all those back!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 703d892e-bab3-3e66-9c39-ef51431fe696> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With time passing by,it is high time to decide which job you will do in the future.Not only  because we are at the age to go to the society,but also because we need it to help plan the life and study now.
Decided the life you will have,choosing occupation is a great decision for everyone.We are supposed to take every factor into consideration and you can never be more careful towards it.For instance,do you prefer working in a group or staying alone? Do you like to work outside?Is it a problem to talk with people for you?We can never ignore this questions and you have to face up to them whether you want or not.
From where I stand,being a doctor is the best choice since I'm interested in medicine.To tell the truth,I used to be immersed in the medical world at a very young age.I will not change my decision and time won't diminish my passion forever.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d79b0702-7d36-3402-bc1d-54381205bc67> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays，more and more people are facing the question that they have to choose their occupation.Compared with old days,now we should make the decision on ours own.
I agree that choosing occupation is one of the most important things in life,because only in occupation which suits you best can you do your best to make a difference.
When chooses occupation,one should think it over seariously because there are so many things in relation to the decision.The first thing one should think is hobby.Working in occupation which you are intrest in is really an enjoyment.Besides,one should make the decision according to his own ability.Everyone has his unique talent,when choosing occupation,one should think that in which field he does best.What`s more,future and wage are also important facts.
Above all,many facts we should concern about when we choose occupations.And my choice is to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID dde3aa2b-37d3-3f30-9203-2de32fba740f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important decision in one's life for occupation can decide your lifestyle in some angle. For example:
if you choose teacher as your occupation, that means you must have patients abilities and wisdom.
Choosing occupation needs to be considered many elements.  Before you choose your occupation ,you should consider your interests abilities
and the income in the future and so on .Besides, some occupations may have danger which can danger your life or hurt you. So, you need to make
full use of your wisdom and all kinds of relationships you have to choose an occupation you like.
From where I  stand, I  have chosen doctor as my occupation .You might ask me why you made this decision or what elements forced you choose doctor
as your occupation .Well, in my opinion ,I  think doctor is a very pure and sacred occupation Because it is doctors who save many people who are
going to die. You shouldn't take it for granted  ,in some angle, doctors give you the second life. What's more , doctors ease patients' pain and give
them a   life.   a result, I choose doctor as my occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 84f1d8fc-b955-3cd5-aa21-2d72e6da7849> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is a very important decision for us to choose occupations in our lives. When we choose our
occupations, we must think of a lot of things. You may consider that how much money you will earn,
is this job so hard that you can not be competent for it or does it have a good future and so on.
There are so many things you must coserder because your occupation may decide what your life
are ni your future. If you want to have a rich life, you may do a business and have a company on your
own. If you want to have a easy life, you can be a teacher or other jobs like this. EXcept that, you
still consider your abilities. However, the most important thing you should consider is that are you
interested in this occupation or do you like it.
As far as I am concerned, interests are very important. If you are interested in what you are
doing, nothing can't be done.
I want to be a doctor, because I like this job. I want to save more people when they have serious
sickness. I want everyone has a healthy boby and has a happy life, so I choose to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 094a7f2d-5aef-3689-83a7-a43d23853f4e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is very important in our life.It has a great influence of our whole life.
So,we have to put it in an important position.
When you choose occupation you have to consider all the factors of it.Because it's a great
thing in your long life.Maybe, you don't have to choose your interest as your job.But,you have
to have a strong desicion to insist on making it.Only in this way can you feel happy when you
do your job.What's more,you must consider your future when you choose occupation.Your earning
influence many people's life.Your parents' alimony,your children's expenses of education and your
life cost.All of these need a lot of money.You have to insure your job can get enough to support
your family.There are many factors you must consider,if you don't do this job,you will have many
difficulties in your future.
I have no choice but to be a doctor.However,I think if I work hard,I will have a happy life.
I believe it!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 707825a2-cb95-395e-ab91-f83c933f773e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,occupation has been drawn an increasing attention that it is a significant matter in an individual's life. It could decide how your life goes in the future,maybe wealthy or tough.
As for the great importance, so many factors should we turn over when choosing occupation.Initially,in my opinion,I think it is the interest.There is a saying that,the interest is a good teacher.Without that,you may loose the reason of presence when facing the tough lesson.Secondly,the occupation environment matters a lot.Assuming that when you hunt for job after graduating,what a great pity to find that it is so difficult to get a job.Last but not the least,the suggestions of family and friends play an essential role in your decision.They may offer you the sincere advice after making lots of research.
As far as I'm concerned,I chose the doctor as my occupation.I reached the accord with my family and friends that it is a good occupation.In that it is not only a high respect occupation,but also a meaningful one to the human beings.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2377b495-808c-337d-a654-b0a1e8934acc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Now    I am a college student who study medicine.So when I graduateI want to become a doctor.
Howerever choosing occupation is very diffcult because China's higher education has entered the popular phases, the number ofgrduates
increased and the employment of undergraduated is becoming more sever.
For our ungraduater we must have specific idea about choosing occupation.To make a wise choice, two important things should be taken into consideration. One is
the interest, the other, the demands of people and society. Only if the two aspects are connected, can a man show his talent and ability in his future word.
If we want to be succeed, we must choose a suitful job for ourselves. Choosing occupation should consider all kinds of elements , for example
to  earn more money,to achieve the parents' special expectation, even because of the profession you learned in the university,and so on.Meanwhile
choosing occupation is a significant decision.We can't make a decision easily.
Choosing an occupation may cost much time.You should look for the suggestions of the others.For example,your parents,your classmates,your teachers,
and the senior schoolmates,they can tell your their experience .
In a word,you should be careful to choose your occupation.Further,you should try hard when you choose the occupation whether you like it or not.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f8d31ef1-c1cf-37ea-943d-8a360b360086> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is important for our future life.Once we choose an occupation, we choose a direction for our future.Therefore,choosing occupation means so much for our life and it is a major desicion.
However, everyone has their own choice. In order to choose a suitable occupation,we need to pay attention to many factors.Firstly,the most important thing is our own interests.We should pick something we are insterested in or we will not have strength and patient to stick.Secendly,we should choose the occupations that could make sense to the society and ourselves.We choose our occupation not only to make money but also to contribute.And what's more,of course we need to take our income into consideration for we have to make living and afford our own families.All in all,we just need to make a decision, stick to it,work hard and live a fulfilling life.
I have turned over for a long time when I graduate from high school.Finally I make the decision that I want to be a doctor.I just want to live a health life.Futhermore,when my friends and families are trapped into accidents,I am able to do something rather than do nothing.Therefore I am here now and struggle to make myself a good doctor.I have confidence that I will stick to my choice and finally be a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 91885f8f-ae70-3a5d-9ca4-dad45488af6c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In the future, there must be a difficult choice we have to face. And it is choosing our occupation that makes us confusion.As we know, it may be one of the most important choices. Also, what you choose will lead you to completely different way. So it's really a great decision.
A large number of facts have to be thought about during the process that we make the choice. Our interest is one of the most effective aspects. It is obvious that the more I am interested in the job, the better I will do. Meanwhile, the future of the job makes the equal sense when you choose your occupation. A job with a good future means more chances. Another aspects is what you major in.
When it comes to myself, I'd like to be a biology engineer. Because what I major in and what I like are biology and that will make me pleased. What's more, the century belongs to biology, and choosing this job can exibite my talent.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9490836f-8471-3c0d-b146-cc88fce2df65> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,it is a vital dicision for everyone to choose a occupation which we will work on for a whole life.So we should make every effort to choose a apprepriate occupation.However,how to choose occupations?
we have to take many factors into consideration .Above all,great importance should be attached on our interest .As the saying goes,interest is the best teacher.Only when we get interest in our occupation,can we really put our passion in it and make achievements.Secondly,our personality should be put into thought.Different occupation requests that people may as well have the specific personality for specific occupation.Last but not least,what we choose should make profits for the society.It is the devotion of everyone that make a harmious and colourful society.
As for me ,I choose to be a doctor.When I was a child,I respect doctors who have the ability to save others,and I want to be one amoung them.And I will make every endeavour to prepare for my obligation in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d947b2d7-8d5c-365a-9249-6e90ace08096> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is of a decisive importance in our life.What our life will be is depend on our occupation to a real degree.As a result,we are obliged to take an overall consideration.
There are various factors should be taken into account.First of all,your interests.Interest is the best teacher.With interests,you will remain curious and keep exploring your field.No matter how hard it is,you are able to confront all the difficulties with great passion.Work can be an enjoyable experience,hence you are willing to devote you whole life to it.However,without interests,you will feel untolerable about every working miniute.Boringness will swollow you up.
What's more,income is another unignorable aspect.We cannot only fix our eye on our dreams,overlooking the income.Because the colour of dreams will fade without bread.Finacial income will always be the base of our lives.
In addition,whether your job is steady is also essential.I submit that an unsteady job will lead to a worryiny life.
As a university student,there are countless options standing before me.I am supposed to be sensible and realistic,for the one i pick up are bound to decide my life.It is desirable that i should mingle these three factors.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 931bbe2f-5510-3156-809f-02036d4f22d1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, occupation, which is considered one of the most important choises
in your whole life, is of significance in the extreme. Many people choose
occupation by interests but there are also other people doing what they don't
like to do. So, there are a number of factors that we should pay attention when
we make dessions.
Firstly, the most crutial aspect you should consider is your interest. The saying
goes that interests are your best teather. Only if you like what you are doing can
you do it well at the same time do it with happiness.
Secondly, the opportunity that whether your major is easy to find a job is also
significant. With the rapid development of the society, jobless rate is getting
higher and higher. So, if your job can't be well-paid or you may not be needed
by society, you must reconsider it. Although you have your own dream, bread is
as important as dream.
What's more. The environment of your working space, safety, reputation, and the
advise from your parents and friends, which are also essential to your choises
should be taken over seriously.
With the consideration of factors above, I choose the occupation of being a doctor.
I have the origin of a doctor family-my mother, father, grandparents are all doctors.
So I have the passion of being a doctor. I know it so I enjoy it. When it comes to
the environment of working spaces, I believe it very suitable as you needn't exposed
to the sunlight. As a doctor, you will never lose your job. As a result, I'd love to
become a doctor. I will achieve my dream in some day.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 65aefb2d-1012-35f1-9b1c-0b7be4a0e77b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When you grow up, the initial and significant decision is choosing occupation. Choosing occupation is such a complex thing which should take everything into consideration.
For instance, firstly you should make a list of occupation which you are interested in. Then you have to carefully to check whether you are competent for these jobs. After that, you may also have a lot of choices and the next one you should do is find out yourselves, which means you have to truly realize what interests you most. Finally make the decision and put it into the practice.
As far as I'm concerned, I will choose an occupation about trade like marketing management. Because I'm really interested in business. I can't stand that working with myself all day, which may let me go crazy. However, running a company or doing business has to communicate with others and maybe I will never feel lonely.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8db0f1cd-e3e3-32f5-a929-b51c60457380> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important thing in our whole life.It's an great decision.
It is directly related to the rest of our life.For example, If we choose an occupation that we are interested in,we'll enjoyed our work and feel funny even we are in work.
However, while you choose an occupation which is not the thing you like,you may feel awful and you are easy to feel tired .Even you will hate you job .
so you can see how important chossing an occupatuion is.
We should consider all sorts of factors when we are chossing our occupation,such as our interests,our habits,our abilities and the things that we are good at.
Sometimes we can ask our parents for some advices. After all,they have more experiences than as.In the other hands,they can see us and our occupations more objectively.
As for me, I choosed my occupation as an doctor last year. I wanted to be a doctor and my parents thought that I had the ability to be it.
It can be expected that I'll be happy with my work.And how your occupation?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 15bfffce-442c-3701-aa1e-936016476e42> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important deduction in my life.And choosing a occupation that suits you is more important.
But how to choose a right occupation?Here are my opinions.
First,you should take a positive attitude to any jobs before you.That means you won't look down every occupation,even a cleaner.So you could have more choices.
Second,you must make sure that the occupation which you choose is your favourite.You may be unhappy and easily to tired if the work doesn't satisfy you.
Third,you are supposed to know you should earn your,even your familyi's living.It is to say you have to get enough money from your boss.No one will support you if
you aren't able to earn enough money.
Then you need to have a knowledge of your working place in the future.If a company is going to decrease,you'd better not choose it.
Last but not least,you must be good at it.For example,if you have studied in a medicial college,a doctor is better for you.
People around me always think I will be a doctor after graduation.And I also refer doctor as a wonderful choice fore me,at least now.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 66b67dfc-7798-311e-ad72-a0d380378fbb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is a vital procedure in our lives. A number of people do not choose a proper job so that they feel regret after short time when they get his occupation. So choosing occupation really matters our future lives.
But, how we can find a job that suits us well? Here are some idea of mine. First of all, I suggest that we should consider varies of factors we probably meet, such as your own interest. Of course if you feel hebetude about the job you must quit the job as fast as you can or you just not take this job. What's more, the payments also should be contained in considerated. We all need a job to feed ourselves and our families, so lower salary will lead a hard life. At that point, we must find a job that equally in work and pay. And working time is also a problem that we should pay attention to. Some occupation can earn the same money but diverse in working time, we ought to choose the one of less working time. What's the most significant is that we must do the investigate well and kown ourselves well.
In terms of me, I'd like to choose to be a doctor. For the reason that I like the occupation of course, and I think I'm good at it. Although I may be busy doing my job, I can earn a quantity of money as well, so that I can take good care of my family. And to be a doctor also gives me much pleasure, I think, for helping people out of disaster and heal them up. What a happy thing that cure patient of. So it's my choice about my future occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e614a0c0-ea84-3e4c-ba08-49841c952b6c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's known to us all that choosing occupation is one of the most essensial things of our lives,especially,in a multi-cultured era.We are required to consider a huge amount of sectors faced with so many opportunities.Here is some of them.
Our interests come first.Interest is the root of any inspiration,without which we may get nothing in our career.Only the one who loves his work from the bottom of his heart can make some achievements in his field in some day,
Income is a quiet inportant sectors of our job choosing .One of the reasons that we search for a job is that we need to support ourselves and make  the end meets.It's obvious that no one would turn down a well-paid job.
last but not the least,the working conditions also matters.A jod  which offers a good  working condition is more attractive.For the reason that we can feel comfortable and may make our inspiration burst out.
As far as I am concerned,I prefer a jod matching up to my interest.We should balance sectors of every aspects and then find out the most important one to make the responsible decisions.After all,choosing occupation is one of the most important things in our lives which deserves a serious choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 88b3a8b2-02a1-3ce1-8282-79d196a20aaf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's known to all that choosing occupation is a important decision.It's the career that you will dedicated your whole life.As a result,it seems that you should be careful when choosing your occupation.
There are many fators should be take in to consideration.First,think about that whether you are interested in the career.As the saying goes,intrest is the best teacher.Being interested in can make you can more qualified for the occupation.Second,take the wage into consideration.Anyhow,you should be responsible for yourself and your families.It's irresponsible to regardless considering the reality.Last,you should think about the value your occupation do to the world.Robbery and theft are also kind of occupations.But it's illegal.Only by realizing the value of the social can you realize the value of yourself.
For me,I choose the doctor as my occupation.On the one hand,I'm interested in biological.On the other hand,I think it as a kind of skill that can support my families.The most important one is that when someone of my relatives fall ill,I can do something for them,instead of just worrying about him or her.
Choosing your occupation carefully.It can bright your whole life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 223db10a-d452-3391-a508-d5c04762bfbd> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays, the economy of the society is in the leading position.What occupation we choose is concerned about our future life. So, choosing a right occupation is very significant.
As we know, many elements should be concerned about what we choose about the occupation. What we should think of first is the career outlook. A modern occupation is maybe a better choice. Usually, in modern occupation we can earn more money. It is , however, exhausted. What is more, what we major in at university is also an important element. If you major in science, for example, chance is that you will devote yourself to the science study in future. But,I have to say, sometimes what we learn at university have no connections with what we do in futurn, that is, it depends. The last but not least, out intersts are also very significant.
As for me, I am major in computer science , a kind of IT science, at university. As what I have learn about IT , it probably the main aspect in the 21st century. So, I am very optimistic to what I am major in. Maybe, I would be a programmer when I am mature, not only for money, but for the IT science.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c48e4788-b32e-32a8-91d4-559008822b28> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,it's an important decision for people to choose their own occupation in for occupation is the thing we will do everyday in our future.So we should consider many elements when we have to decide our occupation.Such like our interests、our ability、the salary……These all are we should consider first.
Fistly,the occupation we choose ultimately must fit in with our interest.Otherwise,we will feel unhappy in the future even though the work has a high pay.Secondly,We need to consider our ability.It's a waste of source if people don't choose their occupation according to their ability.Thirdly,we have to make sure the occupation we decide can give us the salary that is enough to feed our family.
For me, I have decided to be a doctor in that I go for it and it grant me a goood chance to help others.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 275b3083-7358-349c-99b2-ce55a1447dfb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we graduate in five years ,we should search occupation in society.There are many kinds of jobs,What kind of job you will choose?My majoy is clinic medicine in college.so I just choose the job including in medicine.
Choosing occupation is a important decision in our life.What's kind of job will determine our earnings,the sense of happiness and so on. so we shoud choose our occupation carefully.
Choosing occupaton should considerate los of factors.For example,earnings is a important factor.all of us want to get high income.If we have high income,we can afford my family.but hobby is also a kind of factor in choosing occupation.I think  although we get high pice in job, we are hate this job.we will not feel happy in our daily life.The third factor, I think the environment of company or hospital is very important as well.beacaise if you stay around dirty environment,you will feel ill all day.you willhave bad emotion everday.
so I will choose a kind of job which I interested in at first.I think if I get a job which I like it,I will be excited about jobs and feel frash in jobs all day

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2db88aab-4467-3a64-a9d6-1edae0df4872> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is a great dicision for everybody's life.Once you decide what you want to be,it will influence deeply to your furture.
Due to the importance of choosing occupation,many kinds of factors should be considered,ranging from your aim and hobbies to employment and salary.Because you cannot just live on dream without the reality.However,whatever you choose,it should be remembered that you will never reach in success unless you keep work on it.
I choose medical as my occupation.Following are some reasons.First,as my mother,who is a famous physician in Shandong Shengli hospital,often tolds her work to me,it greatly raise my curiosity to this job.Secondly,physician is a honored job.It is wonderful when you help the patients recover from illness.The last but not the lest,the medical sience and technology always appeals to me.That's why I hold on to deal with the heavy lessons.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 319febd1-f67f-39ae-9b77-ba98206c04a3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With we are getting older,we have more duty to unertake.To sopport the family,
we have to make enough money.So the occupation is more and more important.If we
can choose a suitable occupation,we will have a good life and enjoy it vrey much.
So how to choose occupation is an important question.It need consider many
different aspects.Firstly,the occupation you choose must be you favorable.Only in
this way,you will enjoy it and have fun doing it.It need combine with you interests
and the fact whether you have talent in it.Secondly,you should consider which occupation
the ssociety need. Only the occupation is wanted,can you get enougu pay.Last but not less
important,you should also listen to your parents" advice.After all,they are older than you
and they have more experience.What they said is also good for your future.In a word,choosing
occupation is an important and influential event.You should be cautious about it and decide
it according to many aspects.
When it comes to myself,I choose to be a doctor.When I am young,my dream was a doctor.So every
day,I like to go to hospital to see the doctors who are working.Later,hen I go to school,I enjoy
biolgy very much and have s talent on it.And my parens also sopport me. So after college enterence
exam,I choose medical school without hesitation.Until today,I also enjoy it.I will achive my dream
and become a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 21934352-6d68-3785-b107-faf99bde3dec> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,choosing ocupation is the most essential decision after we graduate.
It decide our life with the following years.
Nowadays,the fast development of our society offering too many jobs for us,but also
bring too much pressures and competement to us.Choosing ocupation really need to turn
it over.What we want to do ?Which ocupation is fit me or I fit which one? Does it really
make me happy in it? Would I will be well payed from it ?And such other same questions.
In my opinion ,the payment is important for I need enough money to keep a qualityical
life.And then,I think that the ocupation must be interested me.Next,I want to choosing
an ocupation that is near my hometown or there is something same like my honmetown such
as the weather or custom.At last,I hope that my job can be meanningful and helpful for
others.Added all of the fore write,I choosed the medical doctor as my ocupatuion.I had
consider a long time to made this decision,so I never chang it.
Finally, I got one thing from the choosing.If you love it, just love it in your way,and don't let the
thing you loved down.So,let'tinsist and staburn to do it !

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 55dcc9e7-5394-3556-a3d3-7fac26dd96ad> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a college student, there is a choice that all of us need to face with. It is choosing occupation. So what do you think of it?
From where I stand, first, choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions that we need to make in our life. Our life orbits can be changed by it. It was so important that we have to be cautious to the problem.
Next,  It's necessary for us to think of all kinds of factors before we makes our choice, such as the development in the future, the salary......but as I think, whether you love the job is the most important thing. If you like it, you can get interests from it, if not, you’d better mot choose it, because you are likely to do the job for the whole life.
In the end, what occupation I chose was doctor. That’s why I choose medicine as my major in the university. Maybe my mother gives me some influences, as she was a doctor. So I was familiar with hospital from a very young age, and I liked it very much, because I can help patients by my efforts. That’s my decision, and I’d like to work for it in my life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d3f5a9e7-45d3-3798-8ede-4d957bc2e076> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know,it is of great moment to choose the occupation,which may accompany you the following life.And the same as other choices,to choose an occupation should take many factors into consideration.
The first factor we may think of is our own interests.Without question,we cannot go on a career perfect with no interests and as the saying goes,interests are the best teacher in our life.Besides,other external factors such as the expectance of the family,the social needs,the prospect of the career, and so on.
In my opinion, the social needs are changing swiftly and we can even develop the interests of the occupation. In fact,sometimes we could have a dig at some jobs and then choose one most suitable for ourselves.Whereas,  whatever we choose,we must devote ourselves to it and have passion to do it best.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 53ef68c8-71d3-38f7-b88b-3b766147f34f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone of us has a dream to be a successful person and makes contributions to our society. To
realise this dream, we first need a proper occupation. So there is no doubt that choosing occuption is quite significant in our life.
When it comes to choosing occuption,we always fall into confusion,for too many things calling for deep consideration appear at the same time. Where our interests lie in?  What do we do well in?  What occuption can bring us the most income? What our society needs most? And the rest,much more for consideration.
When I choose to majoy in clinical medicine, I have decide my future occuption. I have a strong desire to be a surgeon after graduation. To be honest,it has been a dream for me from my childhood. Many people may consider it as a job easy to make a lot of money and gain good reputation. But I don't attach those things to it. I choose to be a surgen simply because my respect for surgens and I have always been excited every time I heard that the patient was saved by surgeons.I just want to be one of them. I have a firm conviction that I will enjoy my job during my lifetime.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b4046ec3-efe7-3399-8928-cb785188b49d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a freshman,many students may think that choosing a fitted occupation is
not so necessary at the moment.But in fact,it is not true.Choosing a good
occupation is one of the most important decesions in our whole life.We must
pay attention to it at the begining.
when it comes to choosing occupation,there are too many aspects we should
keep in mind and think over and over again.For example,our own interests which
I think should put at the first,the environment of the job,the payment,the future
of the occupation and so on.At the meantime,we even should take our family
members' opinions in considerate.
As far as I am concerned,we can not be limited by the subject that we major in.
The world is full of chances,but in order to find it ,we must extent our mind.
The more we experenced,the more we learned.After enough experences,we will finally
know what is we really want in our life,gaining enough strenth to break the
limit ,catch the chances,find a good occupation,and fight for our happiness.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3aac48fa-0d1d-3cbc-ae40-75a360e70363> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a determination of vital importance  in everyone's life ,and I am no exception.
To choose a fit occupation as your lifelong career ,you must take many factors into consideration.
First,you need to make your ideals clear.You must make sure what you really desire,what can arise your passion
and enthusiasim,and what achievements you want to gain on earth.In brief,choose a occupation which deserves
your dedication.Second,you should learn about yourself then.To learn about what you are good at,what you are
interested in and what jobs you are really fit for.In a word,you need to find out your advantages and weaknesses.
Last but not least,you have to take reality into account.As a human being,we all have basic necessarity.And we
depend on our occupation to feed ourselves.So,you will have to take salary and  material benefits into consideration.
When it comes to my choice,I can tell  with pride that I choose to be a doctor.
As for me, I have great sympathy for those who are suffering from diseases.What's more,my parents have suffered
from the same pain.So what I expect from my occupation is to try my best to ease patients' pain and to heal the
wounded and rescue the dying.
Although nowadays the relationship between doctors and sufferers is worse and worse,I am never regret  for my
choice.
In a word,you can devote yourself heart and soul only by choosing a occupation that deserves your dedication.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3c1d6504-30e0-3a00-a050-e0ae210926a3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions of your life.
Once you have selected a career, your life will be different.This determines
the choice of occupation requires careful thinking.
Choosing occupation need to take various factors into account .for instance,
your interests,the occupation's development prospects and the income of occup-
ation,and so on.
My choice of occupation is Medicine.First of all,I love it so much .Because
there are so many people get ill and die,especially many of them are children.
Secondly,I think I have the responsibility of saving their life.I want to do my
best to let more and more patients get correct treatments.I wish to see people's
smile,and people live a happy life with their family and friends .I want to try
my best to make a world with no illness!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3e32c7bc-bbd6-34bb-b29c-d2473a44a315> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know, having a good job is many students’ dreams after struggling in schools for years. Having a good occupation, is only relevant to one person’s future, it maybe have tremendous influence on the destiny of the whole family. As we know that changing jobs frequently is not a good and not an easy thing to do. So, it is really an essential decision to choose a suitable occupation.
A good occupation can be explained differently by different people. Some people think that a good job means an easy-doing one; some think the one with higher salary is better; and some think the job a person really likes is the best. So, when choosing occupation, we must consider all factors. We may have to think about the salaries, the working hours, the insurances, the location of the companies, and so on. We should also think about whether we can handle this job, that is, we should also have our major included when we choose occupation. For example, if you are a mother of a little child, you should choose the occupation that is not too far from your home, and the working hours should not be too long so you can take care of your child after you are back from work.
As for me, since I am a freshman in university, I don’t have too much plan on my occupation. But in general, I think I will be a professor in university or be a researcher in a research institution. These two jobs are both suitable for me because I think I will enjoy doing this kind of job though they might be tough works.
As I said before, people have different opinions on choosing occupation, and we have to consider all factors and think twice before we make final decision.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1a3d654b-6f1c-3cfe-949e-f580bfdbc295> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Except sleeping and eating, doing our work account for a large proportion of our day time. As we can see, it is a crucial decision for everyone to choose occupation. It has tremendous influence on our incoming, health, life style and so on, for which an increasing number of  people choose their occupation after more consideration. So, what should be taken into consideration?
There are lots of elements that should be considered. First, salary may be the first element most people will care about. Then whether or not the distance between working place and home is far is also taken into consideration frequently. Furthermore, it is also necessary to choose a job you like, which would not make you feel boring when you work.
As far as I am concerned, the first element considered may be the interest. As long as I take the work I love to do, it doesn't matter to have low salary or to get up early to work. So I would like to choose computer programming as my occupation for which I can do what I am interested in.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 75950206-ea0b-3429-a7dc-fd091e03f71d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's necessary for us to choose a suitable occupation.In some way, it can be a turning-point of your life.When you get through the exams, you have to choose a occupation and enter a college for further study.There is no denying that a good choice can become a stepstone to your future.
So, we need to attach great importance to our choices of occupations.There are several factors that we need to think of.Sometimes, our parents decide it for us,just choosing some popular occupations or some ones with bright future.Nevertheless,we'd like to choose what we are interested in because we
will show perseverance to our favorite occupation. Yes, enthusiasm can do good to our study.Aside from the two factors, we still have to take other factors into account,such as the safety of the job, the salary of the job and the requirement the job needs.
As for me, I choose to be a doctor.The choice depends on myself with my parents' support.The choice is not only come from my devotion to medical field, but also the heart to save lives.Although the long and tough way to study medicine always makes me confused and worried about my future, I insist on my choice with an unshakeable faith.So,it's not difficult to draw a conclusion that once you choose your occupation,never regret for it.
In my point of view,I find it important that we choose our occupations carefully and wisely, but your enthusiasm and perseverance far outweigh your choice.Only when you put your heart into it,you can do every occupation well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2e8e7e86-00bb-38ea-a259-9d7e67d9e31e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important things for the young,which has a great effect on his or her life in the long run.
In general,choosing occupation should count on quite a few factors.Firstly,we should pick up a job where we can make the full use of our knowledge and skills that we learn at college or from other ways.At second,it's of great importance for us to get a job that can reward us with a well pay so that we afford to raise our own family and lead a comfortable life.What's more,as a part of the community,we should also take our contribution to the society into account when we're faced wiyh choosing occupation.
As for me,I would like to take up the carrer as a military doctor when I graduate.On the one hand,i can apply what i have learned at college to this work.On the other hand,it is at this occupation that i can donate my own contribution to the national defense career,thus helping keep our country from invasion.For all the reasons,that is my choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7224f61d-d814-3843-a193-024f8fa76d27> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation,in everyone`s whole life,is one of the most important decision that
may influence ourselves,family and friends.
When we choose our future occupation,we must consider about any factors ,including interests,parents` opinion,paying , future plans and so on.Collecting enough data about the
jobs that you may choose.It must be helpful to you when you make a decision.
When talking about me,my choice is to becoming a scientist.Because I major in maths ,it`s
the most logicial and fantastic studying,and fathermore ,the main reason is I love it.I enjoy everything that it brings to me,especially the big problems.And my parents also insist
me when I talk to them about I want to study the mathmatics.They have given me supports as much as I need.Of course to study math can`t be a good job that brings you a lot of money.
But that`s not very important to me.I believe that it will give me the joy and everything
I want have.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 47667962-6150-3c43-9c51-d3acfca92ff1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is a question that every college students have to face with, especially for the students who will graduate
from universities. So what should we do when we face with it?
Choosing Occupation is a big and important decision of our life ,it will affect the road we are going .If you choose a good
occupation and it is promising , you will success faster than others .Or you will success lower than others, even not. But as
we all see, Choosing Occupation also need to consider all kinds of factors. Such as your interests, your family backgroud and
so on.
Different people have different view. In my opinion, Choosing Occupation must base on your interests and hobby, it is the most important factor for us. Only
do the things what we want to do, we will try our best to do the jobs and make it . Only the directon is right,we will not get lost
on the road.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b24b6637-faa5-3363-8bab-2b3af74db6e3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions that we have to make in our life. And we have to take a lot of factors in to account.
First of all,what we are interested in matters most.It decides wether we'll contribute to our work in the future with all of our heart. Second,choosing an occupation that we are interested will make us be happier than choosing a disliked one.Third,when we choose occupation we have to think that wether our occupation can give us a good future.Such as finance problem and difficulties in the work and so on.
My choice is to be a doctor.first of all,I'm interested in medicine. I like to study those interesting tissue and frame.What's more, I like to help others and it always makes me happy. I think that becoming a doctor can make me help others better.Also, doctors have not a bad salary. It can let me live not too bad. I think as long as I have the interest to study medicine, I can make great contribution to the work.The last but not the least, my parents also hope me becoming a doctor.So that's why I need to study hard what is becoming a good doctor asks for.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6da829ea-8792-3b06-9715-20310d0e35c4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one thing that all colledge students have to be confronted with.
However it is not easy.I believe chosing the most suitable occupation is the most important
dicision in our life.
We must think about all kinds of poits before we determine to choose some occupation.
Firstly,the interest can not be ignored,if we do no hold interests on the occupation,we will
have not passion to do it,thus we can not get good achivement in our job.Then,the ability
we can hold is important,we must not accomplish everthing if we do not have the teconology.
Besides,I think we also should think about our families's economy.
With thinking about numouse points,I finally decide to become a dentist.When I was at the
age of 12,my tooth was hurt because I ate a lot of sweet food,it was terrible,and finally
a dentist helped me.So,I respected him and then I have build my ambitin to become a dentist.
What's more,my parents support me all the way.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7c2043ba-e250-377d-8517-0f22189d65dc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Various decisions will be made during our life time,we have to choose where to eat,which kind of clothes to buy and so on
every single day.Decision on which occupation to choose is indeed a tough one amid them.
The occupation you choose will definitely influence your rest life greatly.So,before making the decision,we have to
consider it carefully.First of all,interest is the best teacher.Most of the time,people show talents in things they are
excited about.With a job we love,we will be satisfied about it easily,the excitement about the job will make a difference
when difficulties turn up.Then,think it over whether the job will get along well with your characters.After all,a shy salesman
probably will not get a good grade in saleing.Last but not least,the income.We are living in a material world,excitement will
decend one day,our life will still go on.A steady income can gurantee your family life and do good to the next generation.
There used to be plenty of options for me,I choose to be a dentist at last.Becoming a doctor is not my dreaming thing,even
neither do my father,who is a doctor himself.I just pick it out from all the attractive job for the reason I'd love to do
something manual and live a relaxted life.I hope I can go further in the road and cure the pain of more patients.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 05f1af8d-5330-319a-96f7-580d5cdefe34> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we graduate from the university, choosing occupation must be the most important decision in our life, because
it will influence our whole life.
I think there are many elements influencing our decision. The first one is our major in university. For example, I
choose the medical as my major in my school life, so it is better to choose the occupation which has connection to
it. The second one is our interest in our daily life. If we choose the occupation we are really interested in, we will
be more energetic to do the job in the future. The last one I think is the social status when we choose the
job, because we must consider the income and the quality of our life in the future.
All in all, I will choose the doctor as my occupation, because I love the job to save patient from the death and my
major is clinical medical. I will be proud of my choice in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b292f3d9-2080-3428-9aab-ab5eed69d362> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,choosing occupation is one of the most important problems which a young person faces.It's a extremely important decision,not only decides the foundation of our economy,mood,health and living environment ,but also our last generation's furture.
As the saying goes,"opportunity cares for the well prepared".Choosing an occupation takes one's a sea of efforts and there are a lot of things you have to think about before you decide what you would like to do. As a result,we should make a plan in advance.
What we should prepared? Two important things should be taken into our consideration.One is our interests and majors,the other is the demands of society.Because you major will help you do very well in your positon,and do contribution will make you feel happy.Only if the two aspects are connected， can a man take the advantage in his job. If the two has conflicts，the people's interests should be the most important.
In regard to my choice in the future， I would like to be a doctor.Not only am I studying medcision education and I fond of it,but also the socitey and people need doctors.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4c3672f7-12ce-30a8-9d2e-254dab14b959> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is one of the most important parts of our life. It decides our future life. We must be careful when we choosing our occupation. Of cause,we should think about all kinds of influence of occupation like interesting , knowledge ,skills, money and so on.
About the occupation,my choise is medical.
At first, i learn knowledge and skills about medical for seven years in university.Maybe i can say that I choosed the occupation about medical at the first day when i stand university. Secondly, i also like medical. I have a dream, oneday i can help my family and friends get away of illness. It is not a great dream, but my wish from the bottom of my heart. In another hand, i want to beat with illness. It is my pleasure to help people get away of illness. Thirdly, i think this is a great occupation for me ,especially as a doctor. It is stable as a work, at the same time it is also challenges in the work. I am not a person with ambitions . I just want my family and i live happy and healthy.
The other important part is that my mother want me to be a doctor. I care my families attitude about my future.
In summary, i choose the occupation of medical. This is my way.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 98c37028-7926-3eb9-86e1-1af9a1b53f66> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the rapid economic development in China,choosing an occupation correctly
has become incresingly vital.There is no need to say that your cccupation has
an great effect on building your personality and partly decide the way you live
As far as i am concerned,the frist choice that dicide our occupations in the
future occur to us when we decide which colleage to further our study and what should
we major in.As for me, i started thinking seriously about what kind of person i want to
be right after the colleague entrance exam.The following factors influence me a lot.
The most improtant one is about my dream,i have dreamed to be a doctor since i was a little
girl.It is fortunate for me that my parents are so supportive to my idea but they also worried
about the whole situation in the medical occupations.So, the second factor comes to be the
prospects of the occupation.It includes how much can you earn from it,how does the society think
about your job.Last but not the least,the way you live with your occupation.
Having been considered carefully,i still stick to my doctor dream,i don't know my choice is right
or not but the only thing that i know is that if i don't choose it,i will regret.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8496e7a2-f3be-3ac6-a56c-0217a6b0dc83> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
What's the important thing in our life ? Money? Power? NO,neither of them. It's our choice.
There are many choices we shuld make in our life. And your choices will built your future.
Choosing Occupation is an important decision which we must make in our life while we are students. There is a Chinese motto said，"A man is afriad to choice a bad job,and a woman is afriad to chioce a bad husband“ .
And we should consider many factors to choose our occupation, and aviod to get a wrong choice.
Interseting is the first factor we should to think of . If you choose your occupation that you don't like ,you were make youself as a prisoner. So,we should hear the vioce in our mind.
The second factor is that if the occupation is necessary in our society. We will give a hand to built our country and hometown.
My occupation chioce is medicine , I want to be a doctor in the future. I want to help more and more people in pain. And  medicine is  also my interseting!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 00e8a164-af7c-3118-be5d-c6536d1f4e1f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
An ancient Chinese saying goes, “for a woman, the most important thing for her is to choose a good husband, and for a man, it is to choose a fitful occupation.” So choosing occupation is one of the great moments of choosing in life. And how to choose is always a hard problem for young people.
You should considerate about many aspects, for example, whether it is fitful for you, how much money you could earn, whether the improvement of it is well, and what you can learn from this occupation. First of all, you should know there is no such an occupation that is the best. Only the one fittest for you is the best. So you should learn about who you are, what you want, and what you are interested in and good at. Second, consult to your parents and teachers. For lack of knowledge and experience, you can not get entirely knowledge of the occupation and may only focus on its advantages without seeing its disadvantages. Well, at this time, parents and teachers could help you.
It’s a real hard problem for me to choose my occupation. I dreamed to be doctor since I was in junior school. However, my parents and teachers suggested me that I’d better not to choose it. They asked me to learn more about the difficulties and busy life of medical student and doctors. However, I still believe that being a doctor is what I dream of and the fittest occupation for me. So I made a decision to choose this medical university.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 434dfd4f-ef35-30c8-9a3d-7518deea4aae> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation will decide a person's fate undoubtly,and choosing occupation is the vital thing thoughout our life.Better choice make better sense and receive grander harvest.
There are many factors should be concerned when it comes to choose occupation.The most
important thing,in my views,is your interest.It is the interest that can support you go through the hardship and achieve goals from boring job.Besides,your characters also should be put into account.If you are a outgoing man and have skill in communicating with people effeciently,the social affairs jobs are suite you.Further more,the wages also ought to be considered,good earning indicate good life.
According to my dream and other factors,I choose to be a doctor.I like communicate with
others,and finding the life truth is my favorite thing.To be a doctor can let me get close to life myth.What's more, helping the ill get ride of surffing is my honor.Last but not the least,chosing to be a doctor is made by my own,I won't regret and have fath in I can do it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e225e7de-267d-30a6-8413-7f72441fd836> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of crucial desisions in life. It has profound influence on one’s life. Choosing a job, which is interested for you, you will have a easy life in mental world, with no complain all day long. If not, you will be very sufferred.
Of course, you should consider many factors in desion when you choose a occupation, such as parents’ willing, your interest, the trend of society, the prospect of profession, the income of occupation, the tradition of your family or your hometown.
From my standpoint, my occupation choice is a chemistry scientist. As we known, to be a scientist is everyone’s dream in his or her childhood, no matter it is a kid or a real goal. I choose the occapation is not because of joke, which lasts from child to now, but it is a decision thought over and over again. I love chemistry very much, espscially, organic chemistry interests me most. The most important factor in choosing a occupation, with no doubt, is the interest. And I follow my felling, and I believe that will leading me to where I want to go. The world is more colourful with chemisty, my life will be more wealthy with my dovation to chemistry.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 009d65e5-d53e-30c2-883a-906944d5ed68> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is an important thing in every graduate's life when they finish their studys in college. They will ask for their parent's advice , consider their teacher's suggestion and perhaps , just follow their heart. Thus they make their determination to live in the way they like.
But, in my opinion, we should try our best to make a good choice , with almost everything considerded because there are many factors influencing our choice of occupation. efore one gets his job, he must get himself prepared. In addition to the advice, we are supposed to collect the enough information about the field which we are prepared to set foot on. Only when we are well prepared to the job can we have a good future. Beyond any doubt, we should get enough kowledge before we leave theuniversity. At last,we should not forget that the practice is the same important as the theory . So we should try to find more chances and get more practice.
As a medical student, I must study hard in university and enrich my experience by taking part in lots of activities. So when the time comes to me, I will make my decision after I consider my parents's advice as well as the prospect of the job as a doctor in a hospital. With my effort, I believe that I can make a good doctor to help my patients and treat them.
So, I believe that with great affort, everyone can gain an ideal job as the saying goes, no pains no gains.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 79cc4e51-258a-3d9a-8d28-2b4cfb03e44a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is a momentous decision for an individual to choose an occupation.
Since it is a big event for one's whole life,we should take various factors into consideration.As far as I'm
concerned,the most important thing is whether we like the profession we has chosen or not.The occupation we chose
will probably be along with us during the next countless years.It's rather awful to spend your whole time in doing
something that can hardly interests you.Besides,it is important for us to choose an occupation that can bring you
good job,though some people say interests is the entire thing that should be considered.Time and poor life can weary
out all of your interests.That's all my own thoughts,of course.
For me, being a doctor is a good choice.For one side,it is helping others that can bring me the best feelings.It is not exaggerated
to say that I will be pleasant to save a person's life even if I have to pay my whole life on studying medicine theories.For the
other side, people are paying more attention on their health.I can surely find a job in the future.
In one word,interests and job are two most important things for me to choose an occupaion.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2e23c0ce-4a3d-32b1-9c3b-07084643dab7> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, almost all the people have some kind of jobs. People work in a job to serve each other, and to make their living. Whether the job is good or not will lead to one's life's quality or something else. So, it is clear that choosing a suitable job is important. That is, when one is going to choose a job, he'd better consider the following conditions.
The most important point is certainly the salary. People work to make a living, so the salary of the job results in your income. A low income is hard for one to live today, after all. Second, it is quite considerable whether you are interested in the job or not. It is hardly imaginable that one would do the work he dislikes, or even hates, every day in the future, just to afford himself. What's more, it is strongly recommended that one choose a job that he couldn't be replaced, that is, he is the only one able to do the job. That makes one important, and wouldn't be fired by the boss. Those who work like a machine would one day be replaced by other people, or just by machines.
When it comes to my opinion, the following conditions above of course should be maintained. It seems nice for me to become a programmer. Some one would say that programmer is nothing but a labour worker in front of a computer, but I think that not all the programmer is labour workers. As more and more new techiques are being used in the programming, I think I can do best if I can become a programmer.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 23552304-5ee3-317d-b39c-4dba61e4387e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occuption is a uppormost and critical decision in our life which
will inevitably leave great influence on on our life.
It is obvious that choosing occuption needs to take variety of factors into consideration.
Frist of all,we must choose a occuption which can cater to our interests.No one can deny that
one can't suit a occuption if he doesn't like it.Secondly,the occuption we choosing should
can fit with our major.This factor is of vital significant for us.Last but not the least,we
should choose a occuption which has many opportunities and a bright future.
As far as I am concerned,I will choose medical career undoubtedly.Doctor is a occuption which
can win great honor by save perple's lives.On the one hand,this occpution have enormous develope space
On the other hand,it is a occuption which can benefit ourselves as well. In a word,I will persist
this choice and spare no effort to achieve this dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 78c20679-d35a-373a-9d94-9a362c923776> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a tough decision for many people because it will affect your whole life.A old saying goes as that"Every occupation
will have a master. "Neverthless,only if you chose the right occupation can you do a good job.And we can know somebody failed because of the
wrong job through daily dialog,so what your occupation are influence leads your life to different direction.
Before you make the decision what you will do as a job,you should think over several factors that will influence your decision.
First,be sure you will have a good pay.To be honest,I agree that salary is the most important for one to choose a occupation with the price rising
and rising.Second,you should love your occupation.If you do not like it,you will never make any progess,your work is just a wast of time.
Third,your need to think about elder's advice.After all,they know more about job than you.
As far as I am concerned,every occupation is useful,and I chose to be a doctor.I am sure that when your patients are recover from a illness you will
be very satisfied.Doctor can help people in need,too.I am trying my best to learn konwledge to make my dream come true one day.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9d2f22c3-3fa7-3417-8463-65e06d814f11> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important dicisions in one's life. Because occupation isthe fundamental of life,only when we have an good job can we live a happy life.What's more, We have been learning hard for many years to just to accumalate enough knowledge to work better.  So we should be careful when we choose our occupation
In order to choose a good occupation which is proporiate for us, the following things should be comnsidered. Fisrt of all, we should choose our occupation based on our interests. in other words, we should choose a job we are eager to do .only then can we have more motivation. Secondly, we should have a  view of the future, the good jobs are  those that have good prospect in the future, but not those bring us temporary benifits. Last but not the least, working environment should be considered,because  we may spend half of the day at work, so a good work environment as well as working atmosphere is essential, it has direct connection with our health.
As for me ,my objection is very clear. I hope I can become a doctor in the hospital. I have been dreaming of becoming a doctor since childhood. For doctor is a very meaningfull  occupation, I can help save people's life if I master the skills.What's more, I can live a busy life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d45a7605-3c25-30b3-9b7f-5b1b90c55290> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone should choose an occupation after graduation from college.
And choosing a good occupation is very important.
In my opinion, to make a wise decision,two things should be very important.One is interest,the other one is income.
I think they are both important.If we don't have any interest about the occupation,we will have no fun when we are working.
And if income isn't enough ,we won't have a happy life.
In the future,I will become a doctor because if I am a doctor,I can help many people.I think that will be fun.And being a doctor
can make enough money to eat tasty food.
And I don't want to become too busy.I don't need so much money or power.I only want to more free time.So an occupation that is not
busy and can make enough money is my ideal occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e39259a1-650f-31fe-ae8f-72e092adcb0f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important decision in our life. Because it will influence all our life.So we should be
careful about it.
We should think many aspects when we choose our pccupation. The most inportant is that we are interest in it. Interest is
the most useful teacher. If you are interest in one thing, you can do it well even though it is very difficult. And you will not feel boring when you are working.So you can more possible to make achievement.
If the occupation has a great prospect is also a important aspect. If the prospect is not very well, you may lost your work someday. The occupation should make enough money for you,We cannot live without money.
I want to be a doctor in future because it is a great occupation.I will make all efforts to do it well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9b773163-f140-3a60-a3b4-1797e8b6929d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is paramount for us to choose our occupation which we may devote our whole life to. Surely it is a profound decision.
In fact, an occupation which suits you is the best choice. Considering all the factors, I think your interest is the most important. With great interest you will love your occupation from the bottom of your heart. Another thing you should think about is that the occupation which you choose should be promising. Only in this way, can you be high-motivited and feel the hope of the future. What's more, you can support your family by your work. It is to say that your occupation can provide enough money.
As for me, I choose doctor as my occupation. Although I have to be confronted with lots of hardships and setbacks, I feel proud to bring health and comfort to others. I have faith in my choice and I have already had the hope.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 976651f0-9ace-3ab4-939f-bf2486dfcb55> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone will do some work to feed himself in the future. Choosing the occupation will be one of the most important decisions.
As we all know, maybe someone would not choose only one job in his life. He or she maybe choose do the farm works and then do the
buisness and do some other jobs.So what decide the jobs which you have choosed? I think there are many factors causing it.
You know, there are hundreds of jobs in the world. Such as teacher, doctor, lawyer, farmer, driver and so on. This years there
are many new jobs appear increasingly. As the internet developed quickly, this industry needs more people than ever. But when we
choose a job that we want to work we should consider some factors. Almost all of us like the job which can make a lot of money and
can get more spare time. And we may like the job which is steady so we do not need change our job frequently. There also some
people who choose jobs depend on their interests. And there may be some other reasons which decide people'job.
My parents gave me many suggestions in my occupation and I also consider my own  interests. So I would not regret it in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8ea7ca00-9725-348c-b3a9-6cb7f05c5206> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Why do you enter the university ? Maybe you would answer that it's to gain more knowledges . Yes , it may be one of the
reasons , but is it the only one ? Of course not . I'm concerned that the most people is to learn more working skills to
to make theirselves competitive in the employment market . What's more , if you search for the primal mind of gaining
knoledges , you maysee that all the things are around the Occupation .
With the more and more heated competition in the society , a proper occupation paly an more and more important place in
in people's success way .
But how to choice ? What's much better ? To be frankly , noone can awser it . Because there is no better occupatin but
just more proper one . For a person , choosing occupation should be prudent . It's not about what's the heatest one .
It all denpends on what you will do for and which you have more advantages on . Maybe parents advices are also a aspect
you shoud think about . Of course , the dream in your heart is the another reason .
As a medico in Shandong Univesity , my choice is doctor abviously . When I was in my childhood , my father was always ill
and make my family sad . From then on , doing my best to be a excellent doctor is my dream . Now my dream is further clear .
I'm sure there will be nothing can top me .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0fa5a6ae-e812-3e6e-80bc-d691f9f8a4b4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Recently,more and more people pay much attention to choosing occupation. And thereis no doubt that choosing occupation is a significant decision in our life.As a result,we should do our best to choose right  occupation.
It is no exaggerated to say that we should take many factors into consideration.First of all, what I intend to stress is what we major in university.It has a marvelous influence on what we choose.What's more, the interest is also a factor which we should consider.On no account can we choose the occupation that we don't like.Last but not least, parents can give us much advice on choosing occupation.You may as well follow the advice,because it is exceeding useful sometimes.Nevertheless, under no circumstance can we let others choose the occupation for us.
Taking all the factors into consideration, I choose the doctor as my occupation.And it pays to be a doctor, because it is the doctor that I want to be all the time.In the consequence, I will spare no efforts to be a competent doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID aca5143f-38e2-3dde-b3ee-75743d973bee> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
How to choose your occupation is a hot topic recently. As we all know, it's very
important to decide what kind of job you will take, and it concerns not only your
income but also the quality of your future life.
When it comes to choosing occupation, some ascepts can not be overlooked.To begin
with, the salary should make you concent. We work hard to support our familys,
so the income is important. High salary can motivate us to work hard meanwhile
happily. Secondly, the jobs we take had better relate to our majors in
universities. Because we learn them for at least for years. Compared with other
jobs, we know more about our majors and we can work easily. Thildly, whether we
can improve ourselves is also an important aspect. We should keep studying
knowledge regardless of our age and position. It will be great if we can learn
many things in our jobs. Above all, interest is the best teacher for us. We
should choose a job that we really like so that we can make exploits and achieve
our dreams.
From my point of view, interest plays the most important part in choosing my job.
Motivated by interest, I will be very active in my daily work. I can work hard
without feeling tired and I will make my work better.I will also try my best to
creat someing in my job, make up my dreams and achieve them as possible as I can.
Choosing occupation is important for everyone of us, so we should take it
seriously and try to get a sutiable job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b36f090e-3b43-3979-bca4-348e32e68fda> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's important for undergraduate to think about choosing occupation.
It's paramount for us to choose occupation.It can change our lives.
All of us want to make our lives flawless.We choose occupation according to various factors.
Before making decision,think about do you really like the job or you just think that you can
make a living by the job.If you did not like the occupation you would feel sick of your job
soon.And do not forget consider your characters.Sometimes characters affact the way we
behave.Your skills can also be a factor when you choose yor job.If you were good at something
it can help you perform better.
I choose to be a dorctor not only because I love life but also I'd like tohelp people.
I would be happy to help people.When my family members are ill I can take care them without going
to hospital.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fe75bf9e-db9e-359f-adcf-4407e02ba1bf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's of great significance for your whole life to choose your Occupation. What you choose will directly leads you to a different life environment,such as attitude,health,mood,salary and so on.Right occupation which fits yourself will be the best choice.But, how need you think about when you face the occupation choosing?
Well,first of all,it's nesessary to acknowlege who you are.Different people have different nature and interets.In order to devote yourself happily to your work,choosing what you like seems to be importent.Because you can easily fall in love with it and have the talent of making it better.You will receive the reward soon and be prode of what you did. Then,you join in a positive circle and be always creative and enthusiastic.The more you do, the happier you will be.What a wonderful life you have.
Also, you need to understand what you want.Never lose your dreams. You have your enough energe to chase it every time if you grasp oppertunities.The courage will be increase by your facing problems bravely and firm aims.
What's more,don't forget to be sensitive to foresee the future. You need a job which has a quite good future and make you easy to be independent and hold your family.The ideal result ,maybe, is both having the bread and dream.
As for me,to be a good doctor is a dream coming from my childhood.I want to help my dear grandma out of disaster.But now,I want to do more,to help more sick people.Everyone is desire to watch the sunrise every morning. What I'd like to do is giving them hopes,trying my best.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6b4789e7-ba34-33af-8beb-1692863f275b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupstion
Currently , the discussion of choosing oppupation has stimulated a heated controversary in the society . As all of graduaters know,choosing proper opputation which  can not only suit our taste , but  foster our capability means a lot to a better future . However , it seems that reaching our needs is not effortless , though we are rather desperate for it .
Choosing oppupation is crinkled to an enormous amount of factors , which belong to different sorts . Our living conditions , our family exceptations, even our descendants , play essential roles in our choices . In sake of balancing the pole betweeen making a better living and suitting our own tastes , an increasingly  amount of people have shouldered  heavy burdens . Therefoer , the call for a policy about relifing the strain of choosing jobs has aroused recently .
In my private view , one who has grasped enough specific knowledge will hardly encournter the matter of jobless , for he could be accorded suffiency respects. The critical point lies in to what degree the occupation could content him  . Any graduater has no ability to except a job as well-paid as others get at the espense of long-time struggle . Above al , we should be impressed that the value of occupaation resides in developing our capability to be adapted to the complicted society , not how much material possetions the society may as well grant to us .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bf446884-6f76-397e-afdf-e09e1d70e698> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As the development of the society, it becomes more and more important for us to choose occupations that are fit for ourselves. There are many people who are very repentant of their choice before. So it has become such an important for all of us to choose a right occupation that none of us will ignore.
As far as the factors of choosing a good occupation is concerned, I think these following three are very important. Firstly, the occupation you choose should be fit for your interest. Only in this way can we really pour our energy into the daily work. Secondly, we ought to consider the tendency of the development of the society. By this way, we can get a job that can contribute to country’s building. Last but not the least important, the choice should also has the advice of your parents.
I want to become a good doctor, and this is what I like and what my parents expect.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9c67f314-570d-3978-aad1-62065b5e97f4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that choosing occupation is of great importance ,for the simple reason that it will lead us to different life directions.
Many factors contributed to the choosing occupation. What we should firstly take account of is our own interests. Only following our heart , can we devoted our own life to work and have access to success. Secondly, we should listen to our parents’ advices carefully, which is useful for our decision. What’s more , it is important for us to communicate with many persons who have the same interests as ours. Learning from their experience can make a clear mind for our future. Last but not least, we must realize the fact of the work we will choose. Whether it have a bright future or not. In a netshell, combining our own interests with advices from parents and other experienced persons, we will make the right decision.
As for me ,I will aim at becoming a teacher in university. I am interested in chemistry research. A teacher will have enough time to do my own experiments, and  I can talk with many young students who have the same interests, which can bring new idea to my mind.
we should thinking carefully befor making decision, then work hard to achieve our dreams.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 272d7041-ce46-37d2-b650-2084c305a207> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation never fails to disturb us.Since we human beings' value are measured by the works we done,
it is tremendously important for everyone to have a job.Furthermore,the social responsibility requires us to
have a job.Therefore,chossing a fantastic job is not only significant for individuals but the whole society.
No one will deny that considerable considerations must be taken when we choose an ideal job.
There are many factors should be thought over when choosing occupation.Above all,an individual’s interests
and professional skills take the priority to be considered.It will be of great help for us to decide which exact
position we want to chase.What's more,once the job we want is decided,we can turn into the question that
which kind of company we want to enter.In this case,companies'working environment,the projects they are
working,the salaries,ect. should be fully considered.
In my own prospectives,I prefer to choose a position that I’m extremely interested in.As a saying goes,
"Interest leads to half success."With great curiosity and passion, I believe I will keep working hard no
matter what difficulty and challenge I encounter.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 184d76db-19e5-32b4-a220-bebf3d7316ed> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing job is an important job in our life. When we graduate form the university,
we must choose a job to make money. So we should choose the job careful.
When we choose the job, we should think about many things. Firstly, we should love
the job we choose. If we do that, we will be happy everyday and we can try our best to
do this job. Secondly, we should be good at this job. A job which we can't do means we
will lose it fast. We can't ignore the importance of our ability when we find a job.
Thirdly, we should be sure that the job has long life. We should choose the job which
we have experience in. Above all, when we choose the job, we must think about all the
things to decide to do the job.
For myself, I choose the doctor. As a medical student, I will learn knowledge and
I believe that I can be good at this job. Saving people's life is my dream. I'm sure that
I will a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 516cb718-8f0b-3ab5-9db8-106f821416c1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When it comes to career, as  we  know ,it is  important for us to choose a career in our life ,especially
choosing a job which is our favorite.Of course,There are a  sea of reasons protest against our decisions .For
example,firstly,we must obey the suggestion of our parents, we could not be against them who help us succeed .
Secondly,we also consider the situation whether the job has a advance future or not. And I think somthing  thought
more  by people is that whether can earn more money to support family.
From above, we can see that we cannot have an access to our favorite job in a way. There are loads of obstacles.
But fortunately,I will get a job which is my favorite job in the future,whitch is to be a doctor.because I have much
less pressure from my parents.So I can choose what I would like.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6cc7a0dc-517a-34ee-a2ce-45f1fa136b95> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation for all of us is great of importance. Not only can we make a living by it, but also we can realize our dream through a good occupation. Therefore, choosing occupation is one of the most important determinations in our life.
Owing to the importance of choosing occupation, we should try our best to consider all kinds of cases when we make a desion. For instance, we should think about the payment, the development of the job, and so on. While, whether the occupation is helpful for achieving our dream is the most important. When we choose a job we are interested in, we can feel the happiness of work and win success easily.
According to these reasons, I choose doctor as my occupation, because it is my dream to become a doctor that cures and helps others in pain. It is my wish to let everyone be far away the disease all the time.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c983b21b-d178-3be3-8c7e-2ad84ab5018f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that choosing occupation plays an significant role in our lives. What occupation you will choose will lead
you a different life.
All most everyone pays more attention on how to choosing an suitable occupation. Many aspects should be considered when you choose
your occupation. Firstly , income must be thought in our mind. Nobody would like to choose an occupation which can earn a little
money. How much your income is reflects how good your occupation is directly. Then you are supposed to consider how your occupation
will develop. Many people prefer to choosing an occupation which can become suitable in the future. The last but not the least, choosing
an stable occupation is perfect in many people's minds. Especially the people who want to live a comfortable life.
I want to be a doctor when I graduate from college. Doctor is a respectful occupation which can save many patients. You can live a
stable life when you become a doctor. Of course becoming a doctor could earn some money that my family can live a comfortable life.
Choosing an occupation suit you is the most important thing in your life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 07dcb7dc-f48e-344b-b778-a8335545ee1c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,choosing occupation is  a crutial  decision  in our life.Maybe  we  can't  change our job  any more.So  we must be careful when we  make decision  about  our  occupation.Here are some  factors we must  take care of.
First  of all ,it is interest that counts.As an  old proverb says,interest is the best teacher.As far as I  am concerned,it's the most miserable  thing  to do what you dislike  in your whole life .And  it is certain that you will be happy when  you do  your favorite job ,which would  promote  effciency.What's more ,environment is  an important role,too.We will get different results if we work at different places .We can't deny the fact that we are easily influenced  by the surroundings.In addition , salary  can't escape  from our consideration.We have to support our family so we need an  appropriate  pay.Of course ,the more the salary is ,the better we are.
From  my point of view,interest is  the most important  part in our  consideration.Once  you fell in love with you job,everything will be okay.I love my  subject and  I am intsrested in science.So  it is beyond  any doubt  that I will be a  dentist in the future.And I believe  I will live a happy life  with my favorite job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fbdb5900-df52-3ba8-bd3a-48d1cf92bbd2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a important decision in our life.Because different occupation leads a different life.
When we choose occupation,we should consider a lot of factors.First,what you like is the most important factor.If you don't like your work,you can't devote your engry to it and you can feel pain every day.Second,you should understand what you are good at.Ifyou choose a work that you learn quikely,you are easy to get a excellent achievement.What's more,you'd better get your family support.
I want to be a doctor.Because I hope that my family and other person have healthy body.I think illness is the  worst thing.I look up to doctors because they can save life.At the same time,I like the occupation gradually.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 44939770-380b-322d-a505-b19855265abb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a great decision during our life. It determine what kind of life you will have in your last half life. So, you should be careful when you choose your occupation.
There are many factor you should take into consideration. Such as wage, environment, adress and so on.
First, we must pay attention to the foreground, it is related to our life quality. If we choose a bad job which maybe useless in 5 years, then, after 5 years, we will be unemployed and without the pay, we can't even feed ourselves.
Second, it must be considered that we should be interested in our occupation, when we like our job, we will pay great attention to it and make great contribution to it. But if we ourselves do not like our job, then, how can we do well.
Then, we must think of the payment of the job. If the job is at large low payment, we should not choose it, because we used so much money to learn so much knowledge, we should earn it back when we work. so, it is importent to find a job with higher payment.
When it comes to me, I think I will choose surgery to be my occuoation. there are two reasons for it. The first one is that as the social developed, the disease is also developing, people need advantage treatment, if I have the chance, I'd like to try my best to save more people,the second one is that I like medicine very much, if I become a surgery, I will love my job forever.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b5c5fe7e-a22c-3bb9-be8d-40fee937f1e2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no denying the fact that choosing occupation is of vital importance for each of us youngsters who are faced with various options connected with our future lives. It is beyond doubt that choosing jobs request us to contemplate and only in this way can we made a sensible decision and pursue a better life then.
Of course the factors, which will influence our occupation choice may include a lot, such as the salary, the working environment and the personal future development. Those factors vary from person to person, while individuals are supposed to take the real conditions of themselves into their consideration of job choosing.
To cite myself as an example. I have chosen Clinical Medicine as my college major and thus everybody surrounding me believes I will become a doctor in the future naturally. However, simplily for  my part, I reckon that the major is just one factor for me when choosing future career. I put stress upon the significance of interest and the motivation given by the surrounding and my inner heart. Therefore, I hope I could follow my intuition and be activated by my dream at the time when confronted with the choosing process.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 490c0f6c-8747-30ba-be26-bbec3409c56a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an importance decision in our life,it is relevant to our happiness,so we should pay
much attention to it.
We should consider many things when we choose occupation.First,I think,we should choose
the subject and the occupation we like,only when we like something can we concentrate on it and do it
perfectly.On the other hand,we will feel happy when we do something we like.So,I think,interest is the most
important element.And,we also should pay attention to many other things,such as,how much we will be paid?Are
the environment is good?How far the work place from my home?Does the work have some risks,and so on.
Form my point of view,insterest is the most inportance thing,and I would like to learn medical science,and I think
doctor can help others break away from disease,I like to help other,I feel happy and satisfied when others smile
and say thanks to me,so I choose to be a doctor,I hope I can help many people and make them restore health.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3784b050-7818-35b6-95b2-4622e2c7e53c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Our cociety consists of people with different occupations . As we all konw ,occupation is one of the most important things in our lives . Choosing occupation also is a significant decision for us .
A perfect occupation will brings ont only monetary gratification but also psychological gratification . Thus , we must to  choose occupation cautiously .
Choosing occupation needs we in consideration of multifarious elements . Some people think that hobby is the most impotant factor for them to choose occupation . While some others think mabe money is more essential .
either of them is acceptable , I think we need to choose a conformable occupation which can wants our all requirement . Do you like the job ? Do you think it is so tired or relaxed ? Does the salary wants your need ? How old can you retire if you get the occupation ?
Do you think your occupation is boring or interesting? they are all we need to think over .
my choosing occupation is to be a doctor one day . So I study clinical medicine now . In my view , doctor is a divine occupation . We can make the deal with gold for others lives . If we have enough ability ,we can save lots of lives .Mabe to be a doctor need lots of
years to achieve our dream , but I still insist on this heroic occupation .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0f0b7518-a035-37eb-b00e-7cf08d9892ea> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a essential decision in people ,having a stable  comfatable and good job is the dream
of us,and a job that you like indeed can bring hanppiness inyour life.
in order to choose a job, we should think over many factors,I think those factors are very important .First,
we should think of the distance from the company to our home ,more time and energy would waste if our company
is far away from our home .second ,our hobby is a part that can't be lost .choosing a job that you like best.
third ,wage is also a neccesary section for you to consider ,low wage  can 't hold on your family econemy,never-
theless ,it just takes a small part ,hobby is the most important factor I think.More or less ,interest is the
best thing in my life.
Think twice when you choose occupation , chsoose the one you like best.I hope everyone will discover his or her
favorite job someday.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 02ac1e82-1dbe-364c-a532-274a3f6ee2a4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we finished our college entrance examination,we all have to face a big decision,that is what major to choose.It is a important dicesion to choose our career.If what you choose is not what you like or what you are good at,it would be terribie.And it will have a bad influence on your future.So you should be very careful to choose your occupation.
There is many factors you have to think before you make a decision.First of all,we should choose what we are interested in.Einstein said that Interest is the best teacher.If we do not like a career but choose it,we can hardly make some achievement.Secondly, we`d batter have some talent on what we choose.In addition,it would be better for us to choose a career that will be rised in the future.
As for me,I choose medical as my first major in my college.I think doctor is the most glorious career in the world.During my childhood, I want to be a doctor to reduce the pain of human beings.I will stuggle for medical career,until my death.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f16fe962-97fe-3607-98f0-c874b1e47560> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Now we are faced with the choosing occupation, but as we  all known that choosing occupation is life's a important determine.
Professional choice will contact the rest of our life and to the life of planning. We always consider carefully and choose.
As the growth of the age choosing occupation also exist all sorts of factors, their own interests,
the development of the society, parents' influence, etc. As my choice of medicine rather than
your own fully determined, more it is for my future life's father planning.
Still remember he had medical concept is always so unclear, don't like medicine in this industry,
is the surface team choose I still listen to his father's advice.
Professional choice really important, we should have their own consciousness.
I hope everyone choosing oneself love occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8dc30b5e-759d-38a4-985f-980dc5ab1758> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important choosings in our whole life,
so it is extremly important for us to choose a suitable occupaion for ourself.
Choosing occupation should take many things into consideration,such as our
peosonal characters,peosonal interests and the profit we want to get from the
occupation we chooosed.And in my opinion,the most important thing is that whether
the occupation suits ourselves or not.
As for me ,I'd like to choose to be a doctor in a hospital,the reasons are
as followed.First and formost,being a doctor can save many  poeple who suffer from
disease.What's more,I can know so much healthy lifestyle that I can make my
relatived and friends live a health life.Last but not least,I have dreamed of
being a doctor for a quite long time.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e6ee5497-be3f-3a04-8408-0a3d899dfc56> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are many choice we should to make in our lives ,for example, lifestyle and school.Inaddition,occupation
is one of the most important choices meanwhile.As a college student ,there is only a little time for us to go
to the society .So it is the high time to think about it .
You need some tips to choose a fit job and there are many faours you should put in your mind .First ,you
should find your interest .The interest is the best  teacher to learn something .If you are not curious about
your job ,it is merely impossible that you can do it well.Second ,income is an important apsect in general .
The popurse that you find a job and work every day is to make support your family.So satisfactory income is
vital to movate you to work hard . The last but not the least ,the diatance between your company and your
home is another factour,if your home is very far from your company ,it will disearce your passion to go to
work ,because you are tired to ride here and there.
As far as I concerned ,you can find a job suit you if you do tips above.I think doctor is a great job ,os
I choose it .Sometimes you can not find the same job with that in your mind,however ,you can get your own
joyfrom it ,if you put your heart in it ,and enjoy it .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID eb1e1911-9ce4-3653-8d69-e5bd2747a5d5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone in the society has an occuption.Choosing an opporate occupation is very important for us because it's the
gunrantee of our daily life,and the region of our happiness.
To some extent,chooosing an occupation is a serious decision in our whole life. There are a series of factors when we choose our coouption.For example,can
we live a happy life after choosing it?Can we get high wages to guarantee our high-quality life?Can we do something
for other people?Does our character suit the occuption?Besides,we have to consider the work conditions and our famlies.
My decision is that I' be an excellent doctor in the future whose work is to cure people's disease and  save their
lives with my hand.As far as I'am concerned,doctor is a holy occuption which contribute our power to the society and
make others live a healthy life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c335adb8-2cde-316f-92da-14aa51722c5b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a big decision in our life.If we choose a right occupation ,we will succeed easier and have a happy life.If we shoose a wrong one,we maybe succeed hard and have a rough life.
There are many factors that should be worried about when we choose our occupation.They can be listed as follows.firstly,what do you want to be?when we choose a occuptionnot only because we can but elso because we love.Interest is the best teacher.If we enjoy our occupations,we will do better.Secondly, the futher of occupations is a big facter.finally,family's opinion is important too.
I choose to be a biologist.Because I love it , I think the biology has a good futher and my family agree.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 29d99e9d-6068-3190-88bd-1465324bfa92> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays,how to choose a proper occupation becomes an important thing for many people,and this is a vital determination for a person
in his life.But as for ways to choose an accurate occupation,different people have different opinions.
There are many elements for people to think about when they choose their occupations.
Firstly,interest may be the most important factor.If a person works on a job which he is not interested in,he may lose his passon.
Secondly,the salary may be the essencial factor to think of.Many college graduates will not accept a job which is in low salary,
and they may even think that it is a shame for them to get a job which is in low salary.Thirdly,the location of the corporation
may be a reason for people to choose their occupation.According to many Chinese people,they don't like to work far away from their
hometown.Fourthly,people may think of their major which they major in in university.But there are still many people who don't have
jobs consistented with their major.
As far as I'm concerned,interest is the most important element,because if I get a job I'm not interested in,I cannot work on this
job for a long time.Secondly,the salary may be the element which I must think of,because these days prices of daily things go
higher and higher,and we have to make enough money for our daily life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1a5aa1d5-8035-390a-bd0e-5ba6f52e7233> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know, everyone must has a mission when he was borning, which is the responsibility to donate to our society. Thus, everybody should at least choose an occupation during his life. There will be a problem that which occupation we should choose in correctly.
Choosing occupation is an very important determine. If you choose it in wrong,you maybe spend many years without nothing or may be so unhappy that you need to choose a new job. In the other side, if you choose it in correctly,you may be very successful and happy.
Choosing occupation should thinkabout a lot of things such as hobby,money,health or not,and tired or not...Every situation should be taken in thought.Of cause,the more vital thing is that whether or not you like it.
In my opinions,I like doing research.I want to be a scientist from the time when I was 3 years old. Now, I like doing research about ecology, because I love the nature so much.I want to climb the hill to search beautiful lifes as well as you can breath some fresh air. That is very attractive.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c5f5f400-f9f6-396f-a36a-6fed1f453001> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is universally accepted that choosing occupation is the most important thing for your whole life. It decides the things you do for the rest of your life, the people you get along with, and even the standard of living. So, there is no doubt that choosing job is of significance for everyone’s life.
To determine a job which is both suitable and favourable, we need to take those factors into consideration. First and for most, we need according to our major, for that must be the most acquainted field and you will has the largest chance to finish it well and easily. Second, you need to think about your interest. When you do something with interest, you will become higher efficient, more creative and full of energy. Third, the most realistic, material gain but basic one is the income. Up to that can you have a happy and easy life. Finally, don’t forget some little factors, like the companies’ welfare, the city or places to work in, the atmospheres of the apartment you applying for and so on.
However, the reality is that we have so many things to consider while there is so little choices to choose from. So, we need to balance the importance of those elements and find the most important things for yourselves. Personally speaking, the major has had suggested the occupation. It is because I want to be a doctor that I take clinical medicine as my major which is not only well paid but also meaningful. That is my choice and I am sure I will hold on to it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a90d3a6c-ff3e-3d1a-851b-ff74c4064d70> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a vital decided of life. What occupations will you choose and what life you will have. Occupations were divided into all kinds of jobs, the teacher `the police and the rest. Different work was provided to different people. Some people like communicating with human kinds, some people like to work with objects.
We should consider many conditions when we choose occupations. We had better choose a job that we are interested in， so that we can keep our passion while working. We have to consider the require of the occupation, for we can adjust ourselves to the job. But choosing occupation has a different meaning of find a job. Occupation is your own career, but job sometimes is only a way to live.
In my opinion, I will give my own choose on occupation, and do what I want to do. Although there are so many people can't take a job for their interests but only using the job to survive. I have chosen to be a doctor , my occupation is to help people away from the pain. I like this occupation and the occupation is adjust for me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f543d19b-140a-3084-9d6c-9e1b0466becb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is an very important decesion in our life . Because occupation matches to our life quality .
When we choose our occupation ,we have to think about kinds of features . Such as our interesting ,the income ,our power ,the distance from our home ,if our family love our job and so on .
In my opinion ,the most important feature is our interesting . If you love your job ,you can enjoy your job very much and feel very happy during your job . What's more ,you can get great idea when you are working ,and it a\can help you get confidence . Secondly , the income is also an feature. If you get a great income ,you can improve your life quality ,and you can also be happy.
I want to be a doctor ,and i love my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9848053d-83de-3cfa-83d5-4a38cfd17fec> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,it is peramount for us to shoose occupation,when we graduate.It relates to and lead to our
future,as well.How important it is.So we should be cautious .
However,there are so many factors which influences us to choose.For instances,we must consider whether it
suits us or not.Besides,we need enough money to make a living and support our family.Furthermor,it is also
necessary for us to care for our old parents,which is our duty to do so.We should convenient to help them.What's
more, we will be affected by our friends and the condition arroud us.
From my perspective,I think I will be a doctor due to my professional.It is my favoriate job.My parents and
frinds are all support me,as well.Maybe at times I  will  meet many difficuities,but I will overcome it.I have
faith in my occupation and my future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 980948f6-0ccf-307f-b554-4d63a649f2f1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After we graduate,we have to face a secious question:choosing occupation.Our students struggle for about twenty years just to find an occation in this society.Because of these,choosing occupation is very important for us.
Now,at that time,we must consider about many things.
First of all,that's what the job is.It's not every job that we can finish.Finding a correct occupation is very necessary.
Secondly,it is how much we will get every month.All of the works we have done is to live better.And in this way,money can't be ignored.
The rests,I think,should be watched.Such as our boss,our collegues,the distance between our home and work place.And so on and so on.
In the future,I suspect now,I only have two ways to choose.The one is doctor.The other is teacher.As for myself,I prefer the former.Medical mojority takes all of my energy and minds in the university.Although many people can't understand doctors and even hurt them with knifs and their tongues,I supose it will be my job in the end.I will save more people who are innocent.
I dare to face my future.whatever difficulties and hurts,I want to be a doctor.
That's my choice.I hope that I'll never regret.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9892a01a-5a5d-3677-8f15-25e0c02b05d8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone in our society must have a occupation to make a living and to contribute
to the whole society.Choosing a occuoation which is suitable for you is of great importance
for us.With a right occupation,one can succeed more easily and do much more good things for
our society.
There are many factors we need to take into consideration when we choose a occupation from
so many kinds of candidates.Firstly,this occupation must give you happiness when you donate
yourself in it.No one can succeed in something he or she dislike.Secondly,you must care about
the the treatment you future boss can qive you.Anyway interest can not always be with you.
Besides,the safety,the social status and the pressure of the job should also be taken into
consideration.
After the university entrance exam, I choose a university of medicine as my future school.
I hope I can be a doctor in the future.The reason for my choice is that I am so interested in
biology and I am willing to help others.After thinking a lot,I thought medicine is develops
fastly thesedays and it is more likely for me to make new achievements in such a situation.So
I choose doctor as my future occupation and I believe I can be a successful doctor with the
ability of creativity.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9b887bd8-f863-38f7-8aaa-38d2800b4416> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is of vital importance for one's life. If you choose a job that is suitful to your majority, you will have a better development and a happy life, however, if your don't enjoy your occupation, you will get more trouble.
So, what we concerned mostly is how to choose a good occupation. Firstly, we should find what occupation we can work on. That means the occupation you choosed must fit your majority. Then, this occupation must have a advanced platation for your development because the fast developing society required us rich ourselves continuesly. Finally, we could better to pay attention to the working environment and, of course, the salary. A good environment will give us a relaxed situation and is good for our health. And for the salary, don't concentrate more on it, if it can afford our daily expence, that is very well.
What I choose is to be a scientist, because I mayor in mathematics and I love the quiet lifestyle to study the problems. And what is your choise?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 35d809f1-ec0f-30b4-9501-effd7bb02aac> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing a job is a important thing to turn over.It can affact your life and your future.
So there is no doubt that a prefect occupation is necessary.
Doing what and in where must be considered carefully.Finding a great place can not be ing
ornted.A good circumstance may affect your charcter and your motions.For instance,you can get a high payment
when you work at sea.And it is cheap for you to cosume .
What I want to choose to work is disigner that I can travel all around the world and teast many delicious
food as I like.I can be free at any time and any place.Maybe I would to prefer to working at abroad and enjoy
many beautiful scenery.So you can choose your workplace by yourself.Do not forget that you may build your house
at there or your boyfriend.Last but equal important is that choosing what you really enjoy.
It makes you happy to find what you like.
Good luck to you.May you could find a nice job and enjoy it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 26c7c109-d708-3397-afb7-fcb88b06e293> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a momentous decision in our life. It is because we should think of various reasons. But for me, I really want to be a doctor.
When I am a child, my aunt and my grandfather left the world for cancer. And my mother has stomach and heart diseases. At that time ,I make up my mind to study medicine, because I really like to help people like them keep from the illness and death.
During my growing up, I see many others' dreaming occupations, teachers, assistant, etc. I become more and more clear to my way, because I like chemistry and biology in all subjects. Obviously my calmness also support my dream.
However now I am studying medicine, which means that I am close to my dream. I consider that saving people's life is not enough, we need to prevent the diseases.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ddb0a817-0719-3011-82ef-4f443c066077> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
What will your future life be like and what is your future job? Maybe everyone who hasn’t a fixed job thought about this question before. Choosing occupation is of significance to the whole life of you and  your family. So when faced with the choice of occupation, what would you do?
There exist too many factors that affect your ideas. First of all, is your interests. As the saying goes ,”interest is the best teacher for you.” For example, if you like Chinese, you will go to the library to seek and read, looking for what you didn’t know before. If you are fond of science technology, you will do some experiments by yourself to see the wonderful result. If you are interested in history, you will come across those people who made a big difference in those specific time and talk with them. In one words, you can be more learned in those aspects than others, so you can do better in occupation. Then you will consider the salary, the environment of your work, the Prospect and so on .
When it comes me, I tend to consider more about the funny when I do this job. I will choose an occupation I feel happy and excited, instead of more salary or other factors. If I don’t feel tired from that, I will be satisfied enough.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 483a8393-442d-3e8f-9b5e-ab694735afe3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all,choosing occupation is an important decision in my life.After all,there are all kinds of facters we should think over in the choosing occupation.
My chioce is to be a doctor in a hospital,which can enjoy the happiness with the patients who recovered from diseases.Firstly,I think it more helpful to my family.
No one can live without diseases.With the help of my professional knowledge,my parents can live far away from diseases.The next,a number of people in our country need the help of medical science.Their lives maybe destoryed by a disease which is easy to be cured,but  there is no doctor enough helping them.So I think a occuption like this fits in with me.That is why I choose my occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a3b0c1af-0432-343c-a19a-b57fa9502b7e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is a big decision for each of us to choose occcupation,which is a important stage where we realize our dreams and life value,so for everyone,choosing occupation is important and tough task.
Many factors should be taken into account when we choose occupation.From my point of view,first of all,your interest should be the factor ranking first,just as an old saying goes:"Your interest is just what your talent relys on."It is right!You must be more willing to devote to what you like, and can thus get happiness and a achievement at the same time.
then,income factor is also very important,especially for ones with household,you have responsibility to feed up your family,naturally,income is a chief factor.
As for my own choice,I tend to take my interest and industry future into consideration.It is the best condition what I devote to caters to my interest,however,income factor is important for me equally,so industry future is also a important reason I choose my occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9c7b5241-cb10-38e7-8452-136ac688e0aa> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After we college students graduate from universities,the most important decision
we have to made is what occupatiion should we choose.Yes,we must take a job to make
a living and raise our children.
There are many factors we must consider and decide which should be regarded as
the topmost priority,such as salary ,interest and so on.Salary is a quite important factor
and when we choose a job,what should be thought twice is always how much can I get
paid from this job.The nest factor we should consider is weather we can get interested
in it.We have seen many cases in which people have a high salary in work but it
does not attract them at all.So be careful and do not choose a job which is boring can not
attract you.What's more,you should also realise what kind of benefits this job can give you
in the foreseeable future.If this job can benefit you a lot now but can not help
you obtain more achievement in the future,then you should think over weather this
job is suited to you.
As far as I am concerned,I think I had better work as a docter because it is my
major in the university.Because being a docter can always bring you enough wages to
hold my famly.I know you should be skillful to be a docter,and I am not afraied to
study hard.All in all,I am confident in my choice!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5fab911b-431b-3351-81d1-671c5a6c5177> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Now many graduates are struggled with their choosing occupation.It is obvious that choosing occupation is a very important chiose that it will depend how the your future life and whether achieve success or not.You will have a great meaningful life with a good and suitable job,or you will get nowhere around your life.
When you choose ocuupation,you have to consider many factors.First,what you love is specially important for your choosing ocuupation.You will do better if you love it.Secand,we will also concentrate on the situation of the job whether it is rewarding or not.Third,you should also think about your family that hou far away it is from the place where you work and if you can take care of your family.
In my opinion,I would like to become a sciencetist.It is my dream of course.Then sciencetist can also have a good future.I also want to contribute myself to sience and our country's devolepement.Don't you think it is an exciting job?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 94dc8607-d965-34d3-bd07-8e5a1d1442a0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the fast development of our economy and the increase of the mumber of graduation,it's more abd more difficult to choose and get a job.So,choosing occupation is getting more and more to be a significant decision during the lifetime for a person.
And how to choosing poccupation is an important thing for us.
Choosing occupation must take account of a lot of factors.In my opinion,the first one is our interest and our hobbies.There is a saying that "Interest is the best teacher".Whatever we do,we should think about our interests,thus,we will inspire our potential and we will do our best.The second one is our advantages and disadvantages.Only when we know about these ,will we make the right decisions.Then is the employment prospects.Sometimes,we don't master the employment prospects,at this time,we may choose the wrong job.Thus,we will not do our best and we will feel down every day.
My choise is doctors.In my point of view,doctors are a sacred job.We can do our best to save others'life.Although we will be very tired to study our courses and there are still many years before our graduation,we  will not regret for our choise,because we can feel the feelings of happiness we get when we save a life and the respect from others.As a medical student,from now on,I will try my best  to study my medicine courses and pay attention to the solutions to solve difficulties.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e141f88d-6b84-34cc-a650-d75f6ea8d33c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important selection in our live.We will meet with many factors when we are choosing occupation.
If you can imagine it,different challenges will be on your ways.Such as attitute from your parents,interest of your own,and ablility
from training before you choose your work,and so on.We should satisfy our parents's wish,at the same time,we should make our occupation
acceptable and suitable to give us a great chance to live.
So,I choose the doctor as my task from the conclusion.The doctors are one of the most sacred wokr in our world.They try their best to
heal the wounded and rescue the dying.Their work can be concluded by some words that are pure,kind and selfless.I love the doctor.To
mu happiness,my parents also wish me to become a doctor.They consider that the doctor has a stable income,and I can take good care of
them when they are old and ill.
So I come here to become a good doctor and I believe that I can do it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0ce83ff1-831f-30a0-ad7e-e4fad9ac7528> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a exceedingly essential ddecision in everyone's life.What choice you make results in where you will go and what you will do in the rest of your life.As a result,we all should think twice before making a choice.
There are several elements that you should concider before choosing your occupation.First is your interest.Interest is not only the best teacher but also the the best assisstant in one's career life.By no means can one achieve his or her life goal without interest in his or her field.Second is income.There is no doubt that we get a job majorly to support our family,or at least ourselves,so a jot giving you extremely poor money can hardly be a good choice.I'm not in favor of the point that "No money,no way',I am just saying that all varieties of jobs should base on enough payment with which you can make ends meet.Third element,I believe,is the opportunity of getting promoted.Today we all face heavy pressure of making a living,we all wangt to live better,sowe all need to ensure ourselves that we are developing forwards.A good occupation are supposed to provide us chance to enhance our ability to behave flexibibly in the future job market.
From where I stand,After taking all facets of making a best choice into account,I determine to choose a doctor as my carrer for my life.It is my honour to become a part of this glory occupation which helps the whole humankind out of sickness.Besides,AS a job,the payment of doctors is decent.It is a satisfying job for me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c7c69f9c-2e7c-3d69-a7f3-ac4e9e4deb0f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
One of the most important problems  a young person facing  is deciding what to do. There are some people, of course, who from the time they are six years old "know" that they want to be doctors or pilots or fire fighters, but the majority of us do not get around to making a decision about an occupation or career until somebody or something forces us to face the problem.
Choosing an occupation takes time, and there are a lot of things you have to think about as you try to decide what you would like to do. You may find that you will have to take special courses to qualify for a particular kind of work, or you may find out that you will need to get actual work experience to gain enough knowledge to qualify for a particular .
My choosing is doctors.For it is a holy work.I can help many people defeat disease and  cancer.Life is more important to everybody.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8d0eeb43-6291-3be1-8857-5af9f4aec855> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In the journey of one's life,occupation is considered to be one of important factors.Being whether you fond it or not, it will follow you until the end of your life.What's more,a Chinese saying goes that jack is afraid of working on wrong occupation while jill afraid a marriage with wrong man.
So,it's obvious that choosing occupation is of great significance.And it's a commomplace that everything should be taken into consideration.Many people choose occupation depending on whether he/she can make a fortune from it,for the desire of livinga in a  clover is nature.Whereas,someone choose occupation depending on whether he/she likes it or not,since doing the task you hardly or never put passion in is tiresome or furthermore miserable.
As for my choice,I know it's in a blue moon with both choosing a high-profit occupation and what you also like.So my choice is choosing what you like.If not, with time passing by,you will find we can't be happy with your job and you can can't do it well.My fulfill life is that I can do things I love and do my best regardless of bias from society.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4a097c29-3414-3cdc-83ba-7397c57b5522> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is very important
in our life,so we should treat it carefully.We ought to think about all kinds of factors when we choose our occupation in the future.For example,we should choose the occupation which is fairly easy to find the job.What's more,we will make more money with our choosen occupation,and the job don't hurt our body and health seriously.
My choosing occupation is to be a doctor.I appreciated doctors as a child,because they tried themselves to save patients.After my college entrance examination,I choose my occupation to be a doctor.I like my job,and I believe I can make it successfully in my later life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 26e89a52-76f5-3f41-af25-18ecd909b386> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is very iomportant for everyone,because if you choose an occupation,you have to devote your whole life to it,
even if you don't like it ,you can't change it easily.Say to true,occupation is a part your life,you have to pay all your passion
to it,so,my frirnd,don't choose your precious occupation easily.When you choose an occupation,you have to put a lot of things into
consideration,such as your interest,your hobby,your gift,even your body strength.Don't make your decision too easily,it's one of
your most important decision in your whole life. My decision is to be a doctor,it's a very good occupation.A doctor can help patient
far away from diseases,reduce their pain and bring health to them again.What a great occupation,even if it will be very hard and
tired,I will still hold belief forever.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b3e67f72-09e4-36f7-b804-7bb7b8aa6123> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When you choose a occupation,maybe you chooose a way of life.Your occupation will inflution your life and your behaviour,and after you going to your operating post,the occupation will also tell you what your friends circle is.
So chooing occupation is very important for our furture.When we face the choice,what factors should we think about?Maybe the interest is the first index.If you choice a occupation whice you don't have  passion to,you will feel meaningless to do it and
it is a cheat to yourself.Next,we also should focue on the need of the society.To be fact,choosing an occupation should be adjust to the trend of the society progress.If not,you will be unemployed forever.Last but not least,you should realise the career prospects,and know the payment and treatment.
As for me,I choose the doctor as my occupation.The raesons are obvious.I want to save a lot of people who are in the pain of the disease.And I think the society can be short of doctors,and the patients need doctors. Health related， life entrusted. The moment I step into the hallowed medical institution，I pledge solemnly 　　I will volunteer myself to medicine with love for my motherland and loyalty to the people.Health related,life entrusted. The moment I step into the hallowed medical institution，I pledge solemnly,I will volunteer myself to medicine with love for my motherland and loyalty to the people. YES,I will do my best to be a best doctor--that is my reason for my choosing occupation of a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3a530193-206f-3aa8-bfe8-7c9a77ad9072> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays the rapidly increasing number of work-hunters has witnessed a traditional issue which is becoming more and more serious, occupation. Obviously choosing occupation is a big choice with significance influence.
There are various factors that may be counted in. To begin with, you interest which will decide your attitude should placed in first place. Doing something you dislike or even hate will not lead to a good result. Secondly, the future of occupation is also vital. What would you do if your job disappears in 10 years cause of its low technology or no longer necessary? The last but not the list, the environment effect can’t be ignore. Working in an international city like Shanghai and Guangzhou, your information is the latest.
In my opinion, I’d like to be a doctor in a big city. That is the best balance between factors above.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cf81b833-7e32-35e3-a259-6da5bde943e3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Beyond any doult choosing occupation is a significant decision in one's life.when it comes to occupation,there are lots of actors effecting our decision.We should take whatever we think of  into consideration such as  what you are interested in ,what you are good at ,what your chacracters are ,  the environment of the job and its  future , the geographical location of your workplace,pay ,social stature ,your family and relatives teachers'suggestions  and the rest.All of them can influnce your chocices.  You are supposed to turn over evey point in your mind and make a wonderful  banlance.
I have dscided to become a docror in the future,for I am careful,patient, handworking , axceed at science and have a strong sense of responsbility.Evey time I see others are ill ,I always show great smpathy to them.So I am dertermined to  try my best to help them to recover from disease.Iam looking forword to seeing their satisfy with my efforts and hertful gratitude.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d435972b-5469-36ae-8755-57dc2cdf3016> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When it comes to choosing occupation,many people consider it as an extremely important determinition in their lives.There is no doubt that the occupation of one person can determine one's life in the future to some extent.
As a result,everyone ought to think about the choice seriously,considering different factors releated to them.In my point of view,the dominant factor that should be taken into our consideration is what we are really fond of.Only we do our favourate work,can we achieve great success and ,most importantly ,happiness.Besides our interests,the salaries,the places we will work,the propect of the work and many other sides are concerned.
As for me,I will be loyal to my major in college,for it is my favourate subject and also I have been studing for a long time.Furthermore,my parents are always supporting me to do every meaningful thing.So does becoming a dentist by means of my own efforts.No matter what will happen when I go to work someday ,I pledge to take a positive attitude towards my job and life.
In a word,do what you are intersted in and better at,and then make your own contribution to the society.That will treasures in your life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3990ff9d-a2a6-331e-b9e0-5ea6e1a67ab3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, occupation is a vital important choice for everyone due to a fact that it
depends the direction of one's life. So when you consider what you are going to do, you must
be careful and cautious.
There are mang factors which should be taken into account. For
instance, the priority should be given to your own interest. Only if the career is in accord
with your interest, you will be enthusiastic to your work and try your best to make it. Besides, considering the other aim of the job--making enough money to raise your family, the
salary should also be paid attention to. If the job could not maintain your daily life, the
sane choice is giving up. In addition, in a long term, you should think over whether the job is too dangerous or whether it has a bright future.
As far as I'm concerned, my desicion is becoming a doctor. Because of my family having a close relationship with the occupation, I am familiar with doctors and hospitals. And the sacred career is appreciated by people.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ce718670-3954-3ef9-8083-df7aa18d15f4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a saying goes: There are three hundred and sixty trades, and every trade has its master.Of course, if you have a determinationto do a job, you can success.Actually, once you have chosed a occupation which fits you, you can reach success with less effort. So, chosing occupation become important.
When somebody chosing an occupation, there are many factors that should be considered. Firstly, you should chose an occupation that you are interesting in. Interest can make people having a faith of doing the best.What's more, a job which has many things what you are interested in also can be a nice choice. So, if you chose a job which you love it, you can go deep into it and make achievement. Secondly, you should chose a job which have a better development space. if you can find a job which is hot, you are hard to fail.Thirdly, you can choce a occupation by how many wages it pay for you. if the job is high salary and high welfare, you may get it without any hesitatation. Finally, the dream of your own can infect your choice.
In short, chosing occupation is a complex job, and ervrone must be careful about it.
My choice is to become a doctor. I believe becoming a doctor who can cure many people makes me feel happy. Although, being a doctor is very tired, but I love the feeling of saving others. Doctor is an occupation which sacrifice their own life to save other's life, and I desire to join them. Last but not least, doctor can get high salarys.
No matter who you are, and no matter how old you are, it's important to consider what you want to be in the future. Chosing an occupation which fit you very well can influence your life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID afc27cb4-2db6-3de0-8dad-18a59c2d20fc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a man, there are many steps to take and many decisions to make in our lifetime.
One of the most important decisions is choosing occupation.
As we know, occupation is an important symbol of your social position, so, it is necessary
for you to turn over it before you make your final decision. There are many factors
which are worth considering about. First, you should take your childhood'dream into account,
for in my opinion, a man who can achieve his childhood' dream is respectable and excellent.
Second, you should not be blind to your interest, which can be your motivation of your work
and occupation which you devote to .Finally, if you cast aside your background of family, your decision is
also not reasonable.Synthesiving all the factors, you can choose an appropriate job.
Considering my own study field about clinical medicine, my choice is to be a brilliant doctor ,
and Iam sure I will devote my whole life to it. This is also my childhood' dream-making great
achievements in medicine field.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bcd49fc4-204f-3e6b-bd4b-391380e26f86> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important decision of our life.It decides the direction of our career to some degrees.It also determine our position in society and income.
We have to think about many factors when we choosing occupation .the first I think we should choose the occupation we like so that we can double our efforts to do it.And income is also important,because we have to live by ourselves.Whats more,The people we meet is also a necessary factor ,For human are social animals,choosing proper people we meet is important.
My choice should be the occupation related to inorganic chemistry,for my major is chemistry.And I'm intrested in the works related to chemistry.And many of my friends are also major in this so that we can learn from each other to improve ourselves.And the income is also good.So I will choose chemistry-related work as my occupation

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ae1f6122-6715-3ab0-aaaa-c2a4aa61787b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no denying that we should make lots of decisions in our whole life, and choosing occupation is a significant decision because it means what we will do and what kind of person we want to be.
What calls for more attention is that we should consider different kinds of factors when we choose an occupation. On the one hand, it's better to choose an occupation which we are interested in for joy is an important part in our life. On the other hand, in my opinion, we should think about the salary. The price of commodities has risen sharply, moreover, we have to earn money for the future.
In fact, I wanted to be a lawyer some years ago, nevertheless, I am looking forward to becoming a doctor now. Not only for their great prestige, but also they can help others.
All things considered, it's extremely necessary to choose an occupation which we won not regret.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9853ee40-4282-3a09-b9e1-2b662098d9aa> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are a various of occupations in the world,the ideas about the occupations are different from individual to individual.But in a nut shell ,it's important for us to choose a occupation when we gratuated from the university.
Occupation plays a crucial part in our life.Many people think that we should choose an occupation that we are interested in,we should have passion for what we do in the future.It does not matter that we may make less money than others,the most important is we are pleasant when we are working,they even say that the payment is not important.But some people do not agree with this idea,the oppoents claim that we have responsibilities for our family ang our society,we should not noly focus on the intresting of the occupation but pay attention to the job's value to the society.If the country needs us on on occasion should we reject the work,I think QianXueseng is a good example.Some students at university say they want find an occupation that suits fur their majors.
There is on escaping the fact that we should consider a lot of factors when we make the decision.Our family,the distance from the company to home,the interesting and the value of the job are all the crucial elments to choose a job.Sometimes we must give up sone of them on account of the reality.
Trom where I stand,I will be a doctor in the future,the reason is that I am in medical major on the campus,doctor is suit for me,on the other hand,as a doctor I can do a lot for my patients and help them to relieve their pains,it's helpful.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 95a1dcff-f051-3373-a438-17ba25e93694> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most significant decisions of everyone, which can influence the someone's living for a whole life.
As collage students, choosing a job is not far for us any more, which has become a actually existed problems we are facing to. Bacause of its importance, it is essential to think more before your choosing. Consequently, a great number of factors are supposed to be considered, including personal characteristics, individual speciality, social status, job prospect and so on...
However, different people have different opinions. As far as I am concerned, despite of such the many aspects, there is no need to think every factor before doing.I reckon, that what the most valued factor deserving considered carefully is personal characteristics, which depends on who you precisely are and conclude which occupation exactly suits you.
If we want to live a satisfied life , there ia no doubt that we should choose an ideal occupation which we love, have fun in, deserves our hardwork to change into a career, regardless of the outer circumstance .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID dabc3463-2d4f-30d5-b92f-87e8f0de2962> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After guaduating from our university and getting our college diploma,choosing occupation will become a serious and unavoiding question.There's no doubt that this signaticant choice will direct our future life definitly.
To make a correct and better choice in our occupatiom,we are supposed to take an ocean of elements into consideration.As far as I am concerned,our major is on the top of them.Our professional knowledge will benifits us only if we take advantage of them duing our daily work.Furthermore,as the old saying goes,one person's candy may be another person's poison.The best job must,and will be the most suitable job for one person.Another determinal elements is ourselves,we are expected to choose jobs according to our different personalities and interests and passions.
As for myself,it's always my dream to be a medical docter and cure people's illness and ease their pains,my occupation means more than making money or ending my meet,its a dream and hope which I will devote my whole life into it,always and forever.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2f21dab2-35ad-3cd8-88f1-9952f3bb2909> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we graduated from school, we will be faced with an essential turning point our life that is making a decision on how to choose our occupation.
It is clear that occupation' choosing is not an easy thing. Obviously, there are a great amount of related factors that should be taken into consideration. First of all, major will be thought of by most of people. It goes without saying that we always closely connect occupation with major and consider our major together with our future job. Secondly, we should think about the society's demand. Only by making out what the society needs, can we make a thoughtful decision. Thirdly, we had better have a good knowlege about ourselves. Our future road will be covered with light if we make out what we are good at and what we are lack of. Last but not least, we should ingore our intersts. If you love you job, you will have a burning passion for it. Of course, you will do it better.
Personally, I take my major into first consideration. It is clear that I will be skillful at my major. Doing what I am good at and what I like will be a wonderful choice for me . So I choose to be a doctor in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e8432bb2-1afe-31aa-8e0c-d35a18acd905> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the bigest decisions in one's life,because it directly influence the future of someone.The correct choice means that you will have a good mind in
the fooling life time ,and of course good income.Choosing occupation carefully is the performace of mature and wisdom.
Choosing occupation should take many factors into account.First of all,you must think about what your favorate occupation is,in other word,your interests and hobbies.The interest
will be the power that drive you going on in the boring working time in the future.Secondly,you should consider whether the occupation have bad influence on your body or spirit,because
some works indeed damage people.Last but not the least,you are glad to do the work that serve the society.
My decision is being a doctor in the future,because I think it meet the above all requirements.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6e9c6767-18aa-3511-a452-11f27f7ead0e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,we attach so much importance to choosing occupation and this will
influence on our whole life.However , we can learn the fact that lots of people choose
their occupation against their wills,or don't care much about their choices.I'm sure
that those people must regret for their not being responsible when they are choosing.
So ,we have to consider almost all kinds of factors affacting our choices in order to
gain a beautiful future.Think over your charactors and favorits,because you should first
know what you love to do and what is proper for you.And then ,what is more important,the
skills you have are the basis for your decision.Suppose you have never used a computer,how
can you be a computer programmer?
In view of the things we talked above,I decide to become a doctor just like my studying
medicine now. My parents support me indeed,and even the thing I want to be a doctor is
created by them. What's important ,I love to be a doctor,and my careful and responsible
attitude contributes to it a lot.Though many people scold and don't believe in doctors,I
will never change my mind.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d8915d9a-f4b4-3f4f-85a8-9793fcaa4e7d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, what to do after our graduation is a big decision.It can be the base of the following jobs and it may determine the direction of you life .
So it's of great importance for us to make a wise decision about what to do after graduation.
As far as I concerned, we should take the following factors into consideration when we make our decisions.First of all, we are expected to do the job chosen after
graduation until our retirement. So the job we choose should be attractive to us.If not, all our life will be boring and full of complaints. Then, we should
consider the job offered whether caters to our need or not. We can think about it in terms of factors such as company atmosphere ,salary and the potential
development. At last, you can consider whether you can agree with the city you go or not.
Most of Medical study students as me choose to be a doctor in the future. The day I chosed my profession ,I decided to become a people that can help other
people in illness.So I will pay a lot of efforts to achive my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ab0ea954-0124-38e5-9d0a-b346e9ff5df3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most significant decisions in our life. For most of us, the choices we make will accompany us for many tens of years and even the rest of our life,  so we need to be careful when choosing occupations.
When making the decision that is concerned with our future life, there are a quantity of elements that we have to take into consideration. For instance, the occupations we choose must match up to our characters, interests, as well as our personal skills, or we may find ourselves unsatisfied  with the future life when busy with the job everyday. We have to take the expectations of our families into consideration in the mean time. The most important element, in my opinion, is that we are supposed to find our personal values and satisfactions when doing the job.
As for me, having chosen to be a medical student, I am determined to be a doctor and save people's lives seven years later. The main reason, is that as far as I am concerned, doctor is one of the most respectable occupations and I will get the so many chances to help others. I would like to settle in the western areas where the medical situations are terrible and doctors are greatly needed and help patients to fight agaist diseases and pains. After all, only if everyone tries to make contrabrutions to the society, will we lead a harmony and peaceful life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7d5bb18c-0827-3786-b93f-761f6c7bd0cf> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In traditional Chinese culture people say a lot about one choosing his occupation and  they believe it may become a pity of whole life if a man  takes up a wrong job .I believe the same thing still happens in modern siociety and  we can not be too serious about  occupation determination.
I believe there are several factors as follows that should be taken into consideration when making an occupation choice .The most necessary one I think must be the passion about some kind of job ,because only with great passion can we stick to a life -long career and create wonders in it.Then is the character thing , because this will determine what working enviroment is suitable for you and what kind of people you should work or get contact with ,which determines directly what job is better for you . Finally , the occupation environment , which is increasingly necessary today , for in Chinese society choosing an occupation means you have to take the risk of facing fierce competition or even being unemployed ror long ,so one have to make sure they make a choice that can earn them a living in the future .
In my childhood dreams I used to wish to be a teacher and this kind of desire increases as time goes by , maybe I will choose to be some kind of educator as my occupation , though I don't know whether it still has the possibility to come ture now, I choose to hold on to it for the rest of my life .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 292c9d97-6886-3cf8-8ce6-f4848c7e9a0d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After years of effors,finally,we become a college students.And tor the first time in our life,we get to thinking of our future occupation.It is a big desicion that will influence people's whole life.There is an old saying in China that men are afraid of choosing the wrong occupation while women fear that they marry a wrong person.
As for such an important decision,we need to consider all the elements.First,you should consider your interest.Interest is the best teacher.Working with passion,your challenging job will become much easier because you will learn much faster. The other element will be prospective.As some traditional industry graduated into recession and will definetely step out of the history stage,we should choose some new areas to study.
Considering all the elements,I choose the career as a doctor.First,the personality makes me born to be a doctor.I can devote to the tedious study of medicine without any complaints.Besides,I always get on good term with people.Some jobs may dimish sometime, but the world will always need docters.
I am content with my major and hope every can choose satisfactory occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b37046b6-a310-3285-acb0-23304e82450d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is an important part in our life. What do we do most in our daily life is work.A good job can make us live a
happy life.So how to choose occupation is essential to us.
There are many factors that can affect our choice of occupation. If we choose it ,we will do it for a long time even
through our life.So the first factor we should think about is whether we like it.An occupation we like can keep us happy,
in contrast,if we do something we don't like,the depressed emotion will affect our health.On the other hand,the important
reason why we work is to earn money.we should also consider whether the money we earn can make us live a rich life.Of
course,what we do must be legal and we can improve our ability by it.If we can help others when we work,that must be a
exllent job.
What I learn in university is medicine, but what I want to do is some kinds of jobs that I can do with animals.I think
animals are our friends,we can learn a lot from them and work with them will make me satisfied.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5bda2962-13d6-3304-b733-56205b4321a6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a big decision which will affect your whole life.Many factors should be considered when you are making this important decision.
First of all, interest is the most significant thing which you must be serious about.As an old singing goes, interest is the best teacher.Once you select the job you are interested in,you will love it and devote yourself to it.Secondly, reality is an important factor which you must attach  with your occupation choosing.You can't rely on your wonderful dreaming to support you family,on the contary,you should considere many factors, such as wages,futures,and the rest.And the last one is safety.Safety here dosen't only mean you are working uhder a safe environmrnt, but also means your work won't do harm to your health.
I decided to become a detist after my college entrance examination.I was willing to help my patients, besides I consider it as a peaceful and high-payed job which I will enjoy.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d30316c8-e9b7-30cb-b003-80b2bd81962a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Time passed by, I have growed into an adult. It's a coincidence that tomorrow is my 19th birthday, which means I gradually become independent and have to choose my life and make a plan for my future.
Since I am young, I've been told that choosing occupation is of vital importance in my whole life. In other words, it's a big decision which I need to consider seriously. Nowadays, people are experiencing a rat race in the job markets. Although I am in grade one, I turn over my future job and future life from time to time.
To be honest, I began to think about the occupation seriously when I graduated from senior high school and was going to be admitted into university. I must take everything into consideration, such as interest, salary, future foreground, especially what I want to become and to do in the future. Beyond no doubt, I am eager to become a doctor, so I just choose to major in medicine.
I have learned that it's a hard period to study medicine. Once I have chosen, I have to devote my beautiful youth time to the study of medicine. As a medical student, I have to become used to the tight schedule and learn to accept the solitude and tolerance when some friends are enjoying their beautiful, pleasant days. These days, we have got down to studying mice in experiments. For several times, I woke up from my nightmare. I always thought I had done something really bad. I killed creatures which are innocent. That is too cruel for a girl.
But I always tell myself that only if I practice a lot now, I can become a qualified doctor in the future and achieve my dream to save more people. So whatever difficulties I am going to meet, I will hold on and keep optimistic all the time.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3039841a-4e37-36fc-82db-1e17d90738ca> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is a very important decision in our life. Not only dose it decide our future developement, but also it can influence our family. So, what we choose as our occupation is important, and we must be careful when we choose the occupation.
Choosing occupation can be depended on many factors, such as interest, family, wage and so on. However, deffirent people have deffirent oppions. Some people may think that interest  is the most important factor, as the old saying goes, interest is the best teacher. Of cause, if you are not interested in something, you can not do the things best. A number of people hold the opinion that we should consider our family when we choose occupation. They think the family as the first place. Besides, some people consider money as an important factor, because if you do not have money, you can not do a lot of things. That is to say, you are limited.
In my opinion, we should balance all kinds of factors when we choose occupation, a single fator is not adequate. And we also must choose the occupation that fits us, because only proper occupation can give us a large stage to perform.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b33c0a5f-e627-3d39-b232-dc8ba24b745b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As the famous word said"men are afraid of step into a wrong field,and the women are afraid of marry a wrong man."
Yes,in the 21 century,choosing occupation is the most important thing not only for men ,but women.
When you are supposed to choose a job or professional ,there are planty of things you need to consider.At first,you need to consider about your own interest,you won't be happy and always full of passion if you do a job which you don't like at all.secondly,you also supposed to think about what is popular major in the modern society,you must be prepared for that there is no job for you after you graduated from school .Besides，the location of you job must be considerd.You can’t work so far away from your family if they have only single son.In addition,you should ask some people who are doing the job you want do,and know more about the job,then,you can make the decision.
As far as I am concerned,I like help others.When I see somebody is suffering pain,I feel bad ,and I think I am hopeless.So I choose to study medicine.When I graduate, I can help those who are suffering .And I think I have consider many problems.I like study,I can bear study medicine of hard, my family also agreed to my choice and support me .Now ,I am studying hard on medical,so that I can help as much people as possible.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 81c946f4-2381-34f9-98bd-195e8fa23180> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Just like one saying goes"One error leads to big troubles in chess". The every choice we makes influence  the behavior in future . And especially , choosing occupation can be a signaficant decision  in everyone's life which can dicides which kind of person you'll be and how you'll achieve in your life.
Therefore , before choosing ,we should try to take all kinds of factors into accounts. Brieflly , the interest can be the first one which I will think about , cause in my opinion , people should live for life rather than work for life  . Once you don't like the occupation , you will be bored with the environment you work . And if that , you will lose the passion for your better life. Would'nt it be terrified . Secondly , I will care about the prospects of the employment.None of us will deny that our world is a world of the substance and no one will doubt the hardness we will be faces without any found of the economy . If possible ,of course , I will follow my parent's advice for they have the good experience of the social life which will shelter us from the plights as much as possible after experiencing all kinds of odds.
Fortunately , I think I'm a lucky one . My parents always told me a good doctor can be an honorable thing. Besides , I think the work of doctor can serve for the dreams to make contributions to the public. So ,I'm always interested with this kind of occupation. Naturally, choosing doctor as my occupation can the only alternative for me without any hesitation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c24d5809-6839-35e4-90d6-5b0eadaf6d95> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays ,with the growing employment pressure ,choosing the occupation has played a significant part in our daily life .Because it will not only affect your living standard but also has a great influence on your  personal  acquaintance in the future .
To begin with ,it is very important for everyone to choose their jobs and you must take a lot of factors into account .In the first place ,personal interest is the most important factor .Only when you love the job will you be willing to do your best to accomplish it .Secondly ,the next factor that decides your occupation is what you’re good at .If you are poor at maths and want to be a accountant ,it will be hard for you to do it .Last but not least ,the social needs are also of great importance .You will never want lots of people to compete with you .
In one word , choosing occupation is vital for all of us .So we must pay attention to it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 76151738-c820-3bd9-85f6-ee8015594152> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In our long life,there are marvelous decisions we should make seriously.Occupation is one of the most essential decisions among them,for related to our hole life's quality.Many factors contribute to a perfect decision.However,as a saying goes,making decisions are cruel but decisions must be made whatever.There is no abandone in life:you don't choose,the life makes your choice.
Since then,how to make a wonderful choice?How to choose a suitable occupation?Above all,the suitable one is the best one.It is known to us all that Bill Gates founded the Windows company even though he dropped the Harvard University in the middle.Why?Because he realized himself and made a decision suitable for him.What's more,other factors should be considered,like employment rate,work hours and so on.
As for me,I follow my heart to do what is suitable and what I can make it.Pshcologist is my choice.I am immersed in it and I can understand how it works.That is it.I believe it my best choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 63cbfaa4-918d-35d6-8039-8426307d2413> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important turning-point in one's life, not only because the career of a person is the only way for him to make living, but it shows how the person serves his country.
A wise man always chooses his occupation under the consideration of many factors. Interest should be placed in a superior position since it brings about one's passion for the work and in some ways determines how great you can possiblly achieve. A suitable career should no be something beyond your knowledge and that's why the majority of graduates choose their occupations based on their majors in college. Occupations are places where people put what they've learned into practice. As a result of the development of the society and the increase of profit-oriented minds, many young people just pick up the jobs with higher sallery.
As for myself, I would like to choose doctor to be my career because medicine is my major and something I'm really interested in. Doctors are foundimental to our society because they save lives that donot deserve dying and plant the seeds of hope in everyone's heart. Although doctor are being questioned because of the inresponsible behaviors of a small group, doctors are still respected by  people.
Being a good doctor requires outstanding acdemic skills as well as a kind heart, and that's what I'm working for. I believe, with the desire of being great and serving others, I will realize my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f2ecf4ca-7b9b-36f9-8fa8-231e598a4db3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know，nowadays，choosing occupation has become a very popular topic in the society.
There is no doubt that we should admit that choosing occupation is really an important and
necessary event which can have an profound influence in our life.So faced with choosing occupation，
we should have an right an objective view on job hunting.
First and most important element for choosing occupation is choosing a job count on all kinds of
factors about yourself or the society.For instance，we should take our interest into consideration.
As far as I'am concerned,someone who take a job witch he or she didn't like and interest from the
bottom of his heart，is really an poor guy.We nearly will put all of our life in our occupation,so
love it, respect it,so that we will gain happy and relaxed.However,interest isn't the whole of our
life, we should adapt ourselves to the society.Jobs shouldn't be divided in to good and bad.Every
job is equal just like every humanbeing.
In my opinion，We should choose a job trying to adapt both our own interest and the need of
society.Faced with this hard choose on occupation，I hope that I can find a job that on the one
hand,it can fit with my own interest and major,on the other hand,it can adapt to the need of
society.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 61e8e55b-f344-3bcd-b53e-ff961df98776> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Faced with college, the thing that is ultimate in significance is choosing an occupation. It's not only about your life, but about your dream.
We should take all the factors into account to choose an occupation. Probably, we'll face a dilemma between reality and dream.
Everyone has a dream and everyone has a thing captures their interests. Never the less, we also has a family to raise up. What's more, your security, your happiness are your parents concern. Furthermore what benefits you'll offer to the family is also an irresistible factor.
In my personal perspective, I trend to believe interest is the critical factor that influences my choice. And also, this profession can at least support my family. We being passionate, tough works are no longer tough any more. Being enthusiastic, we
can exert ourselves doing it. Confronting with interests, financial factors are not so vital. I choose to be a doctor. An occupation that assumes so much responsibility. An occupation I have been dreaming since 10 years old. Despite of these difficulties, it suits me very well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b52cee4e-5e57-34fd-af89-c9963612d248> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is one of the most essential choices in
our life. After deciding what you want to do as your carrer, there may be no
chance for you to change.
Therefore, we must be causious to make our decisions. There are some basic
aspects we must consider. First of all, we must choose occupation according to
our hobbies. If your job is not what you love, I suppose you won't be content
with your further working life. As the saying goes, happiness is the strongest
power to push you forward. Equally important, we should consider further
development and impoving place. After all, we must ensure ourselves' development
since we are not a child any more and we have to take responsibilities for our
families.
As for me, I have already made my decision to be a doctor. This choice is not
only for my interest, but also for my family's convenience. What's more, I hope I
can help more people release the pain and come over diseases through my efforts.
Finally, I wish everyone can find a occupation suitable for yourself.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 19b16213-6a62-3fa6-8cf5-7eb5e1bfa11c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays ,it's a common phenomenon that quantities of graduates are unable to find a jod which they
can devote their whole lives on it.So ,it comes more and more essential to make a decision  to choose an
occupation which you are suitable for.
There exists lot's of details which should be taken into consideration when choosing an occupation.For
one thing ,in my opionion, whether the work being of your taste is of vital importance.If you get you
really love and can put youself into it,you may easily make  a breakthrough in that field, meanwhile you
should be pleasant while working .For another, the company or the office you may work in can also influence
your future. A good company with optimistic environment can make you have great progress while working.
What's more ,the situation where the company located can have some influnences on choosing occupation
to some degree, if you find the job which you can get your office easily ,that would be fantastic.
From my point of view ,the occupation meets all the details which I have metioned above can be a
scientist.Becoming a scientist is the dream I have when I was of a small age, and now I still stick to achieving
it and  am eager to putting all my life on it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bcbc7743-bb6f-38c4-aec8-5567a44bf75a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Now, choosing occupation is a person to face one of the many problems and is most important
decision in our lives .We grew up from day to day, when we grow up, we must spend a lot of
time to choose their own career. We should take a large amount of factors into consideration.
We can choose an occupation to people for advice and assistance. For example, we can tell
What you want to be friends, then listen to what friend Suggestions, because friends make
our mirror. Can better understand ourselves .Then , we can also listen to parents' opinions.
Finally, clear the professional, you've got to work hard, try to find a satisfying job.
I am an ordinary person, I have an ordinary dream: Is a doctor. My parents are both doctors , and I become interested in it when I was a young boy. Doctor may let these experience personally the human which the indisposition suffers to get rid of the pain. May let the human improve the health. At the same time, I believed that, will help others, own also to be able to obtain joyfully. Therefore, I choose to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 93712d8e-6b1b-37d5-a2b7-d345f1655631> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's very important for everyone to choose his occupation. It plays a very important part in people’s life.
So you have to consider a lot of things to decide your occupation. For example, if you choose a job that you are not interested in. You will be tired about your work, and you cannot finish your work well.
As for me, I have made up my mind to be a math teacher. I choose to this job for three reasons. First, math is really the subject I love. Secondly, I want to teach because I like the freedom to make my own mistakes, to learn my own lesson, to stimulate myself and my students. And I can have the opportunity to keep on learning. Finally, being around the students who are beginning to grow and change in front of me, I will grow and change with them too.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3d46b3de-e549-398b-b219-c2a78db1f2ee> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As an adult，I have been thought about what I would do in the future。Maybe just apply what
I am learning into practice and become a  chemist。Maybe I will do something none of my subject’s
business。Even，maybe I will be a professional wife。Saying so much，I just want to tell you
choosing occupation is an important decision in our lives。
It is important because it may affect our future。Simply say，it may be linked with how much
we will earn and what the lever of our living standard。So，when we choose occupation，we should
take everything into account as possible as we can for our future are held in ourselves’hands。
We should firmly hold the belief that we are the master of fate。Regard of the material condition，
we must turn over other factors just I have said‘it is important’。Such as，whether it fit you，
whether you are fond of or intereted in it，and also，whether you can cover it。
Though I am still a college，and I don’t need to worryaboout it for there is still six years
before I graduate。But I have my own plan，I want to do what I like and I am capable to。

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4f9d5340-7c67-3be7-a78d-e2ac43357fe6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we group up and become human beings,occupation is necessory to selecte.Therefore,choosing occupation is a rather important
decision for every person.And it needs careful thinking.
Choosing occupation is difficult for we should pay attention to a large amount of elements.Every selection for every step determines the eventual result.Personally,the first to think about is whether it is catering to your interest.You will not do it well or insist in it if you have no passion on it. What folllows the interest is the salary.The purpose of working is to support home.What's more,we ought to take the working environment,the future,convenience and so on into considerations.
Absolutely,my selection for occupation is a doctor .On the one hand,I am a medical student.I am determining my  mind to prepare for becoming a doctor.Although it is a long progress and I have to spend more time,money and enegry than others.It doesn't matter.Since I have chosenit, I will never regret.On the other,a docter is the ideal occupation for me.I am looking forward to be a real doctor which saves life and relieve others' pain.It's so holly.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1ce2cec3-13af-32c5-9854-5f7eed18ffa3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, occupation choosing is a critical decision in our life. Nowadays, choosing occupation has become one of the most difficult problems we have to face. Therefore, how to choose an occupation is increasingly important.
To make a wise choice, there are some factors should be taken into consideration. First of all, we must choose our occupations according to our interests. Only when you love your occupation can you achieve success in your career. Secondly, the demands of people and society aren also very important. As a matter of fact, more and more university graduates have trouble in finding satisfactory jobs. So if one considers the demands of people and society into choosing occupation, he may not have the problem of finding jobs in the future. In addition, when we choose our occupations, we should also think about our characters. Different characters suit different jobs.
In regard to my choice of occupation, I am fond of learning dentistry and being a dentist in the future. I have been dreaming of being a doctor since I was very young. And to be honest, an excellent dentist is badly needed in our modern society as the development of economy and the quality of life. After considering all the factors, I decide to choose to be a dentist. I believe that I have made the correct decision and I will avhieve success in my career.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f752f96c-81f5-3db6-8685-f89d574e65d5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone faces the problem of choosing an occupation after graduating from university, and it is of great importance in one’s whole life. Because after choosing one occupation, changing it is so hard.
People who want to have a good occupation should consider some things which I will write down right now.
One hand, it is your interest. Once you choosing your occupation, it usually means that you will live with it for your whole life. If you aren't interested in your job, how could you work for so long time.
On the other hand, it is the need of our society. If your job is just what the society needs, I believe that you will be easy to have chances to do some perfect work.
In regard to my choice in the future, I will work as a doctor. Not only because what I'm learning is medicine, but it's what I love.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d190f452-67ea-3ffd-b759-d7a06fd26349> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choice of occupation is one of a big decision for us, but every one knows, life is like a river, there are always so many
turnings on the destination. However, different choose at the same turning may even lead to completely different results.
Because of this, your future seems unforeseeable to some extent.
College student as I am, I would share my perspectives towards occupation choosing. Compared with high salary one, I prefer to choose potential one which interest me. Doing such occupations can not only improve me with an all-around development, but also I can do it on my own initiative.
To be honest, I am very happy to help people, cause I believe The rose's in her hand, the flavor In mine. I just want to enjoy
myself though occupation for it may takes a large part of my life, and to be a doctor is one of my best choices. Cause I love this sense perception of help people.
I love this word, and I will try my best to be a good surgeon in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c5982142-1cc1-3f70-842d-bbdfc5a6eb90> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is generally considered that choosing occupation is a siginaficant decide in a person's
life,on account of what you will invent mostof your time in relies on what you choose.
As a consequence,we may as well attach great importance to choosing occupation.what'more,
we are supported to think twice so that we can take all factors into consideration.For one
thing,realise what you like and what you are suitable for.Only when you enjoy your job,you
could be immersed in it,beyond any doubt,you can equal it.For another,turn over the outcomes
caused by this occupation,for instance,can you get enough pay to support your life,is it of
benefit to your further development.After that,make your decision.
From my points of view,I choose to be a doctor as my whole-life occupation,due to my
passion of saving people and the high reputation of doctors.As a matter of fact,I am looking
forward to devote myself to medicine.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 61ecbb93-b338-3245-8db7-508c232d62b9> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our life. It will decide our life styles in the future. What's more it will decide our life envrionments as well.
We need to consider a number of factors when we choose occupations. In my humble opinion, the most significant thing is the interest. Before we choose the occupations we must ask ourselves what we want to be. Only we like the occupation can we do it well. Second, we need to think about the development of occupations. We need the occupations to acquire more knoledge and keep pace with the development of society. Finally, we have to consider the income and prospects. We need to work not only for our interests but also for living.
I choose doctor as my occupation. It was my dream when I was young. As far as I'm concerned, doctor is a sacred occupation. Doctors can save lives and relieve patients' pain. Although it is very tired, yet it can bring happiness to me. Besides, I can acquire a lot of knoledge in many areas.
Whatever occupation you choose, the most important thing is that you do it with your passion.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3d5806c3-a58d-3f50-a14c-c5eed956c1e8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After the entrance examination,choosing major became an important thing.So important
it is that I and my parents have to do much searching on the net as well as debating those major'
prospects.In the end ,my parents  chose medicine for me .
Your major will affect your future's occupation,and your occupation will decide your
life partly,so choosing occupation is of vital importance.
while choosing occupation,we must consider much in rrder to have a more
wise decision.For Chinese people ,a majior's prospects rank first .At the same time,
stuents' interests shouldn'd be neglected.I think interest is a good teacher,we can't make sure
a job' satisfied prospects forever,but the one who is more devoted ofhen succeed
occupation have  unique timetable or have unhealthy
affectors For instance,doctors work day and night and chemists work with poisionous chemicals.
My chice is detection of food,for the prospect is good and I love it .But under
family's pressure,I choose medicine.Anyhow,I hope I wil be a honorable doctor .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6093fdf1-101e-3a33-941d-e53433a1af4d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We stared school at about five or six years old,all we learing not only in order to enrich
ourselves,get knowledge,but also to get a job to achieve our life goal and make a living.So
choosing occupation is a important decision in our life.A satisified  job make a great part
of our life.
There are many reason in searching for a job.Hear are there points of choosing occupation.
Firstly,an thinkful job is suit for your interesting. A man who only to do the things that
he like would he make success.Secondly,an occupation mast macth the majar ,only in this
accosion that you can do your best and enjoy it.Thirdly,you may consider the payment.Making
a living by work hard ,and let yourself be independence .What is more ,give our family economic
support.
As for my choose,l would like to do the things that l like.Life is hard,l don't want to
do a job only for wage. Making the life more meaningful .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e4207653-4fab-3c96-afc2-132266878ac6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Wiout doubt,choosing occupation is a definitely important thing in everyone's life.The job decides the life you will live.
When choosing the job,we must care about many aspects.Obviously,it has to make us afford our basic life at least.If we hardly do this well,it's tough to achieve higher goals.Of course,wo have to choose a job which is not against the law.Then we need to decide a most suitable job for ourselves.
Occupation could reflect people's dreams.We need to be interested with our own job.The job that can raise our enthusiasm may be a good one.
However,in modern society,suitble jobs for ourselves are hard to find because of the serious competition.So we shouldn't look for the perfect jobs in our heart.After all,living is the first thing.At the same time,we don't live alone,so that we need to pay much attention to our family.we could listen to their advice.
It is highly possible that I will dicide to be a doctor.It results from what I study.I will be mayor in clinical medicine in order to enter a good hospital and save more people.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 17d260aa-2728-303b-9841-ce8c58113f84> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a great decision in our whole life. On the one hand, a
suitable occuption could makes our life easy and happy. On the other hand, a bad
choice of occuption may ruin our life. Nobody would like to live a annoyed and
boring life. So, it's extreme important for us to choose a good occuption.
There are many things that we should turn over when we are choosing our
occupation.
First of all, ask yourself what you can do. The knowledge and skills we own
is the most important thing for the choosing of job. Nowdays, more and more
people are doing a job that has no connect with their major in university. So
they could get by but never become the top one. If you want a better life than
a get-by one, choose a job that match your knowledge and skills.
Secondly, ask yourself what you like to do. Although for most people, find a
job that they are really interested in is quite difficult, it's still worth to
have a try. If you are luckily enough, your life will be filled with full of fun!
Thirdly, ask yourself what you want to do. To earn a lot of money? Or to
create a remarkable career? Or something else? Your attitude about your life will
affect your choice.
Finally, for myself, I want to become a doctor, but not in a big hospital in
cities. I want to go to the western area of China, such as mountions in Sichuan
and Yunnan, desert in Xinjiang, gressland in Nei Monggol, or Tibet.In those place,
people need doctors more urgently.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ff80e06e-cebf-397a-97b0-22fd9be7813c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's reasonable that we all need go through the working period after our university life.However,many people do not take it for granted and value it too much.But nowadays,choosing occupation is a pretty big decision in a person's  whole life.
We are supposed to take variety of aspects into considerration,which isn't just dicided by his or her hobbies.Firstly,we must work by we have learned in universities.Only in this way do we not learn in vain.Secondly,wo should consider what we like.Because if we don't like it,how can we work happily?What's more,we need to work in a place that is not so far from your house so that it is more convenient.
From my perspective,I would rather choose a job that I really like.For me,this is the most important thing.And only I work happily,I live happily.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d04d34fd-da07-3dc7-b9c0-355a661fc02c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
At any times, choosing occupation is  the most significant decision in everyone's life all the time .Especially, with the development of
the science and society, it become more and more important .So how to choose ,what we should consider?
Firstly, we should find a job that has a good employment prospect,that is to say, the society need it very much,so that we can get more benefit
and realize our value.Secondly, we should choose what we are interested in to work on as far as possible, then we can take a great passion
for it, do you think so? If you don't like it , you may feel it is boring and  tiring. Thirdly , we had better combine our major, what we
have learned should be put into practice,there is a saying"theory should be put into practice".The last but not least, we ought to think
the payment of the job ,in fact, we work for money at most time,so we should think it over.There are many aspects we should consider such
as our family, our love ,our major and so on.
If I face with choosing occupation, of course,the moment will be coming  in five years or eight years, I will choose as a doctor.That
because for one  thing ,my major is medical study, for another, I love it.The most important factor is I can solve other's live as an angel,
what an honor job, how meaningful! I will cure of My mother who has many diseases.
That's all.In a word , we should lead after thinking it over.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 04078b29-e57d-390d-93e9-e1704908d5fc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is one of the most important chooses in our life--occupation.
It is hard to make a choice ,because it has an important effect
on our life. It is related to your interests, knowlege, and so on.
And maybe, your happiness and sadness are connected to this choice.
You must think carefully about all kinds of factors before you
make this choice. First, your interests. Your occupation may not give
you much money,but it must give you happiness. In this condition,
you can devote yourself to it. Second, you skills and knowlege. You
have to choose a jod where you can manage it. So,study hard in your
daily life. Final, many other factors, like money, position.
I think I'd like to become a biological scientist. I love biology
so much. I want to find the mysterious principles in our nature.
Even though there is no much money, I still prefer to do what I like
and what I really want.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 474da431-3228-38d0-af10-df5767574a46> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Occupation is a important decision of our life.Many people's life styles are decided by his choose of occupation.Do a good
and right occupation choose is very important.So how can we do a right decision?There are some methods which tell us how to do that.
Choosing occupation should consider sevarel facts.First and the most important is that you should know which styles people you are.
Different job is appropriate for different people.You can choose a right occupation only when you know youself enough.Secondly,you should
be familiar with the occupations you want to choose.Only when you know the jobs enough,can you know what suits you.So what is the job is another
important fact you should consider.And the third fact is your interests.We can't treat ourselves unfairly,so ,of course,you should choose the
occupation you interests or enjoys.
It is difficult to do a decision.But I think I did.I chose to be a doctor who help patients away pains.I study hard and interest medicine,so
I think it suit me.I choose ,I like .I will make it to be a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5257575a-e2ac-3682-9a96-c901c6bc3db0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In the morden society,pressure of employment becomes greater and greater.At this moment, choosing occupation does be a imporant
decision in our lives.But how can we choose a occupation,suitable for us?My suggestions are as follows.
It should be thoughtful to choose a suitable occupation.Interst should be put in the first place.As a famous saying goes,interst is the best teacher.Only if we have interst in something can we do well in it.Secondly,you are support to find the field where you can show yourself.If you can do nothing in the occupation you choose,why do you choose it? Finally,the prospects of employment is a neccessary considered factor.Because a good prospect of employment can bring you not only confident but also opportunities.
Just as me,my choose of occupation is to be a doctor.At first, because of listening many stories of great doctors,I form a big
interst in medicine.In addition,I'm good at learning the knowledge of medical science.What's more,doctor is a holy occupation
worthy of respect.
As far as I am concerned,we should think carefully before we act.After all, it will have a big influence on our whole life. Only
if you choose a suitable occupation can you do well in future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 090a7934-1802-38eb-837f-44b87572e279> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is a very important decision in our lives. It may affect our lives in some degree. If we choose a good occupation, we will work happily and passionately in the rest of our lives. If not, we may fell very depressed.
So we can conclude that we should be very careful when choosing occupation. But how to choose a right occupation? There are many factors we must take into consideration. Firstly, when choosing occupation, we are supposed to think that whether we are interested in the occpation.Because if we have no interest in it, we can't be enthusiastic in our work. Secondly,the need of society is worth thinking. There is more space for development if the occupation is needed by society. Moreover, abilities of ourselves are also very important. If we think all factors above carefully, we can chhose a job suitable for us.
As to me,I choose doctor as my occupation. There are many reasons for this choice. First of all, I find myself very intersted in medical studying and I want to save others. Then, doctors become more and more needed with the development of social healthy awareness. What's more, medcial studying is not very difficult to me and I can learn it well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 92968499-778d-341f-9597-1e76fb2c88e3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is said that choosing occupation is one of the most significant things of one's life.When faced with choosing occupation,we must take it serious and think of any factors,which come from our parents,our family,our society and our dream.In most occasion,they are contradictory,so that we have to make a choice among them.
My choice is to be a doctor.To begin with,it's the hope of my family,and they think we need a doctor in our family.I have no idea  about it，but，at least，I know I don't hate it,and it's a glory job,after all.As time passed by,I get more and more knowledge about this job,I know its hardness and pain,but I know its responsibility at the same time.I know I got to love this job.and it's an excellent ending.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fc7b028f-a66b-3483-9107-dc06dd511a89> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,one of the most important decision is choosing occupation.It realated to whether we will have a happy life in the future or not.Howere,it is a common phenomenon that when it comes to choosing occuption,people will become hesitate.
Many factors should be considered when choosing a proper occupation.There are some facts I think should be considered.The most important one,I think ,is that you should think about your interests.Only when you love the occupation,you can be happy with it and do it better.Then,you should consider whether the occupation is needed by the society and whether you can get a ideal life or not.Furthermore,when choosing a occupation,we can ask to our parents for advice.Knowing their thoughts about our decision and their ideal occupation for us.In addition,if you hesitate among several occupations,you can think that what will you get from the occupation,and what you want to get from the occupation.And then you can make a right decision.
My choice is to become a dentist in the future.I want to help others ,I am interested in it and I want to know more about the occupation.so I choose the doctor as my occupation.When I talk with my family,I decided to be a dentist finally.It is required by the society.I konw ,in the future, I will become a successful dentist and I will receive a happy life because of it!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f35b9ef3-6772-3a0b-a281-1cae8a3fa4be> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
AS the people said that occupation is another chance for people to choose how to live in the
whole life.We can not change the futune but to affact by choosing a good job.Therefor, many
people think hihgly of choosing occupation.
However,when we are faced with something which need determined, we should be conciderable.
We always judge occupation by its sarlary ,percentage of emoplyment, timetable and maybe
sometimes safety about oursavie and so on.
When it comes to me ,I would like to choose what I'm interestsd in .Intetresting is the best
for me.As far as I'm concider , only choosing my love can I meet the happiness,which is the
real believe I run after .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c2d2acdc-f339-31a8-adb5-9a7736b69b75> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone faces the problem of choosing occupation which plays a vital role in his life. An appropriate occupation makes a man work with zest and vigor, as well as contribute to his country.
To make a wise choice, there aer many thing we shuld thingk about.And here are two important things should be taken into consideration. One is the interest, the other, the demands of people and society. Only if the two aspects are connected, can a man show his talent and ability to the best advantage. If the two conflict, the former should be under the latter, for the people's interests are more important than the individual's.
In regard to my choice , I am fond of learning medicine. Doctor is a sacred occupation.A doctor can reduce the suffering of the people
and save a lot of people's lives.So I will try my best to be a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 68ef01f0-72d4-3ccc-8616-13e57e044fd3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Without doubt, choosing occupation is an enormously important thing in our life, which makes a great difference on the life we lead. Thus, we'd turn it over in our mind.
When it comes to choosing the occupation, we should take a diversity of factors into account. For instance, we should think about our interest at first. It's the passion where our interest lies that contributes to our bright future. Aside from that, we ought to make the decision according to the reality, since no one can live without taking a glance at his present life. Though there're so many difficulties that matter, on balance, we're acquired to dream high and catch more oppotunities, gradually reaching a higher position while making greater contribution to the society.
As far as I'm concerned, I'm determined to take up my responsibility as a doctor. I have a strong faith that I will eventually realize the value of myself through the hard work of the glorious career.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8ad3e1d0-ea54-3271-a618-dcb98a853897> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing an occupation will become more and more urgent and importent as we get close to our granduation. And choosing an appropriate profession can make sense to live a better life.
A good occupation should be one that can make a man work with zest and vigor，as well as contribute to his country. So, how to make a wise decision?
In my view, there are tow matters that should be taken into consideration when we think about this question. The first one should be interest. Interest let people be willing to concentrate on their jobs. It stimulates people's creation too. Thus people can work more efficiently and perfictly. Another one is the demands of people and society. Only when our works benifit others,do them have practical value.
When it comes to me, I'd like to be a doctor. This occupation connects tow of the aspects above. Altough it may be dangerous sometimes, I believe i can show my talent and kindness at the same time. I will be happy, an that is sufficient.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 945e703d-dcc9-36fe-ac3d-bb43881c6c83> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowdays,choosing occupation is a social puzzle event. Choosing occupation is a significant decision which makes lots of student、parents、teachers and many people headache.Occupation is sometion about interest、work、dream and future. So,when we choose occupa-
tions ,we have to think about something and many factors.
Lots of people have a good dream in their childhood. The announced that I want to be a doctor、techer、CEO and so on, it sounds very nice and full of childishness.But when we
grow up we find that we begin to think something different and realise that different people have different ideals which makes our life road fowards to differet directions.When
we choose occupation we have to think where I will have a better development in the future.
My choice is to be a doctor,because I want try my best to make people have less pain.I have a hot heart for medicine work. I love the scene that the family members have real happiness when I save the serious patient.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8fab75f1-4386-3787-8216-d3a1fb6d65a2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a significant determination for all of the people, especially for our college students.It's suggested that we should give serious consideration of this issue as early as possible.
Choosing an occupation is related to several features.In the views of our future life,we need to take the income of the occupation into consideration.Nevertheless, not many jobs can give a ideal pay at first.So it' s better to make the possibility to develop in our work a priority rather than the beginning income.We should also think about our interest and major.The best choice is to have an occupation related to what we have learned.
I take this determination to make myself a docter in the future, although it may make a low basic income.It's my personal interest to study medicine major, and I know I will study it for a lifetime.Medicine also contains many aspects, and I'll decide it in the future during my study accordingly.To straggle a life and a dream, I choose this occupation, and will make the toughest effort to reach my destination.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 54b7ee5a-7df8-32e4-9922-4c7af4e24700> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation has a long affect on our future. For instance, if you
choose to become a layer, it is necessary to learn all the subjects about this occupation
and receive professional train from education, or you will be nothing for you have no worthy
capacity to society, which is the reason why we have to choose occupation.
unfortunately, we can not choose occupation which we willing to do due to there are various
stuffs we must consider before we make a decision. Market situation, demand from human,actions
from government, and the future of occupation,  for example.  whether a occupation is popular
or not is controlled by many things we need to know. In other words, the key to your success is
your considerations about these important things.
Making a choosing maybe difficult to someone but not to me. To be a doctor is my biggest will
in my life. in spite of my own hands, my grandfather's ill, a serious hurt to his head result
in his slow brain’ speed, have a horrible shock to my heart. The decision was made when I was 7
years old, and I will never be hesitate.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3e63b35b-58bc-344f-ac65-db11a985a941> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone in this world needs to get a kind of work, thus choosing occupation is an important decision for one's life. Many people choose jobs according to their interests and their experiences. Even there are lots of people gets their jobs only due to some various opportunites.
There are many factors needed to take into considerition when choosing jobs, such as how much the salary is, what your major is, how good your education is, and most importantly, whether this job fits you. Only if one consider these factors carefully, he can get a suitable job.
When it comes to me, I think the education background is the most important factor. I learn most of what I know from school, and most of my experience is based on school life. Even lots of my interests are developed during my education periods. So I think my job should be mainly associated with my major.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c17d33d8-9e14-3fa5-beb9-979eea9b8651> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a matter of fact, most of us got to thinking about our occupation when we were admitted the university.To be honest,choosing occupation is really one of the most significant thing in our life. Many people believe that the occupation we choose will have huge intluence on our our living standard,our marrige and even our next generation.So how can we make the best decision?
In my opinion, we have to turn every fact over to choose an occupation. Above all, what you choose may not bring you a lot of money but the most suitable to you so that you can keep a good mood every day in your future life. In addition, you should choose your job which is based on the profession you learned in your university.Then you can put the theory you have studied into practice.What's more, if you are the only child in your family, I am afraid that you have to work near your home, for it is more convenient for you to tend your parents when they are old.
Of course, there are still plenty of facts you should consider. Considering all of these, I would choose to be a surgery and I am willing to work hard to achieve it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4419595b-6f20-3751-9cf7-c6aba46eaa9d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Every one faces the problem of choosing an occupation after graduation from college or university, which plays a vital role in his life. An appropriate occupation makes a man work with zest and vigor, as well as contribute to his country.
Different people choose different jobs as their ideal careers. This is because everyone has his own interest.As for me, I have made up my mind to be a teacher. I choose to do so mainly for three reasons. First, I want to teach because I like the pace of academic calendar. Two long vacations offer me an opportunity for reflection, research and writing. Secondly, I want to teach because I like the freedom to make my own mistakes, to learn my own lesson, to stimulate myself and my student. And I can have the opportunity to keep on learning. Finally, I want to teach because, being around the students who are beginning to grow and change in front of me, I will grow and change with them too.But teaching is not an easy job at all. I must study cleverly to obtain more knowledge.
To realize my dream, I have to make full use of the leisure time to acquire the essential knowledge to become one of the best in this field. Meanwhile, I will try to practise my eloquence because it's an indispensible element for me to be qualified for such an excellent occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6fd3adc4-37cb-3113-81b1-4ef6be03cb2e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, what kind of occupation we choose is greatly important to us for it leads to what kind of life we will live. It's of great moment in one's life.
So, how we choose ideal occupation for ourselves seems significant now, because we should take all kinds of factors into consideration. First, we'd better choose the job we like being engaged in so that we'll have enduring passion for doing it. And only this way, can we become competent for it. Second, we should also combine the finacial pressure of our family with the job we take. A good job does not only exits where we enjoy, but could also carry the responsibility for make a living to support our family. Third, if the job have met the needs of us, we should also consider whether it's what our country needs for developing. By combining the fates of ourselves with the development of our country, we can make our life more meaningful.
As to myself, I want to be a mathematican, because I love mathematics very much and I know our country is lack of the people who study the basic subjects. Therefore, I'm determinated to devote myself to the greatest work for science.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 834e63b9-06fb-3bba-af9d-be827403fb96> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
According to the statistics,everyone will spend at least one third time of his whole life on his occupation,whatever he likes it or not.It means that our occupation really decide on our life quality, it's a serious thing for us to choose an occupation.So,how can we choose the most adjustable job for ourselves?
Now that we will spend so much time on the job,of course we prefer to find a more interesting work than a boring job according to ourselves' likes and dislikes.As far as I'm concerned,the interest is a most important factor when we choose a job.Because if one person took an interest in his job,he would have more energy and be more alive so that he can do better,it seems like a good circle of success and happy life.Secondly,personnal ability is also a significant factor that cannot be ignored,we can be more confident if we're capable of doing everything well during our work,which is also a necessary way to cultivate our confidence and decrease the pressure from the part of occupation.Last but not least,we just can't forget our responsibility for the social,it's unavoidable for us to take basal responsibilities for the surrouding where we have lived for so many years.Moreover,it's our duty to make contributions to our country ,making it richer and more strong.
As a modern colleage majoring in medicine,I realize I really have an motivation on this science,which attracts me and makes me absorbed in it.To my pleasure,once I think about that I can be a doctor,I find my value.When it comes to me,I feel perfeCt and satisfied.Therefore,I have a dream of being a doctor,and I have confidence to change this dream into truth.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fca06ca5-c162-3056-8c99-1cd3a14b372a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing a job is a impotant decision for one in a life.Now my specialization is in preparation for my job.Many young people end up in a job which they are not suitable for. “Chance” may play a more important part than “decision”. Here are a few steps to help you think about jobs which you might enjoy doing after school or university.
And one must think about many factories when choosing a job,the job should be suitable for you rather than well-paid .If you choose a job is well paid but not your favouriate,you will live a life that you are not willing to live and your atitude of life is negative.The elements those must be thought overF are as following.First, it is important to realize what kind of person you are, which special qualities make you different from everyone else and what you are interested in. There is a difference between an interest and a skill. If you like art and enjoy looking at pictures, that is an interest. But if you can draw a horse that looks like a horse instead of a big dog, that is a skill.
Then you think over  the following three areas ― skills with people, skills with information and skills with things ― which are your best skills?
After examining your skills, the next step is research. To find out as many different kinds of jobs as possible, consume some jiob market ,read books, magazines and newspapers. Ask your friends about the work they do and communicate with others about job .
Finally, trust your own thinking and decision. It is your own life, so find something that you enjoy doing.From my opinion about the job .On the current employment situations,I get a job at random but not choose a job that I really hope.Afer I have enough bank deposit,I will choose a my favourate job .If I can choose my love job at first,I will work harder and I don't fed up to it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 78209d6d-22d9-39e9-93b7-8f8391de774f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important determination in your whole
life,because what you will become depends on what you want to be.
There are saveral factorys having a great influnce on your choice.For
instans,it might ralate to interests and background of your family.So,I want to
be a doctor who is called white-clothing angel.Here are the reasons why I choose
doctor.
First of all,I love and look forward this job when I was young.In my mind,doctor
is most meaningful job in the world,which can save life and bring back to life.Wit-
hout it human can not live that long at all.Secondly,doctor have a good coming and
it's easy to find a job.Because there are so many hospitals in China.AT last,the older
you are,the more contribution you will make compared with other jobs.
TO sum up,I really appreciate I did this choice and I must go ahead no matter what
happends in the future .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 70d88dad-2156-3653-bd40-ccab05bba2ce> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, occupation choosing is an important decision in everyone's life. To certain extent, it will change our whole world. From my part of view, to choose an occupation is to choose a way to life. for example, your job  will decide how mang and what kind of people you'll face and keep along with. And there's no dening that those guys  really get a huge effect to us.
There's many factors we have to think of when we are choosing an occupation. In my opinion, first of all is our hobbies. For me, interest is the most valuable factor. It's hard to donate all your energy and time to a job you do not interest in at all. Secondly, the requierment of the society.That also means the chance to get a satisfitic job after graduaton. We know that there's already not many blank for some hot jobs yet. So sometimes people should choose an occupation which easier to get jobs rather than to take the heavy stess in the near future. Last but not least, the expect from family and friends. We all want to help those guys who are precious to us and make them feel better because of our effort, don't we?
So after deeply carefully thinking, my final decition is to be a great doctor. It's my goal which has lasted for a long time. Even when I was a little child I began to dream about it. Having a doctor mother, I spent almost half of my childhood in hospital and I realized that I love there. I'm eager to see the smile and happiness when patients are recovered. And I get certainly support from family and all of my friends.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bd587dbf-d211-35c5-b59e-498ee152911d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is one of the most important choices in one's life.
Everyone will be extremly carefull when he faces the choice.
Every factors will be taken into consideration when choosing jobs.For most people's parts
,salary is the priority.People will also think about the potential or the environment of the
occupation.That's true.
As for me, I prefer to be a science researchor.There are two main reasons for me to make
such decision. Firstly, researchor is a steady occupation with a satisfying income. Secondly,
few people can do this job with the limit of high education, but our nation does need such
kind of person, so I'd like to be one.
Different occupations for different people, as the saying goes. In conclusion, finding a
appropriate occupation can do benfit for you in your life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b6a7b2f8-f249-386f-a835-e207983a8fe3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, choosing occupation is so essential and important for us that we must turn it over. Although choosing occupation can not decide whether we wil  succeed, a good choice can provide a short coming to the success!
When it comes to choosing occupation, a numerous fictions should be considered. First of all, most of us may take care of the income and holidays. It is no wonder that money and the rest time are necessary. Without a good payment and rest,hardly can we work hard. Second, we all like jobs with good reputition and other's respect. Doctors, teachers, governors and policemen ,compared with businessmen, can earn little money, but they have people's great respect! Especially, governors are considered to catch iron bowls in China. In addition, we also need to pay attention to the feature of occupation. Different occupation ask us to be good at different characters and abilities. If we are lack of some of them, we possibly feel it hard to work better.
From where I stand, I decide to work as a doctor.Many fictions lead to my final choice. In fact, I have made my decision when I choose to study the clinic medicine. I believe that doctors are respectful and helpful. When I was a little child,I really wanted to help the injured and survive the dying. I enjoy the happiness from the recovevred patients and their familiy.
I will work hard to become a good doctor!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e0b622bb-eea9-31bc-8c1c-a024d4f62713> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is very important to everyone's life.It will influent our life.If we do
not choose good occupation.Many things will be worse.So before choosing occupation we should
think over many things.Such as family,income and what's your interest.
First family is also forever.Thus when we choose occupation which is together with
family we must think whether we can take good care of family.And ask your family's opinions
about your occupation.
Second income is another important thing you should think.what's the aim we choose
occupation is to earn enough money to feed our family.So we should think which occupation
is suitable for you about income.
Third interest has influence in your occupation.If you do not like the occupation you
can not do well in your career.You should know what's your interest.So that you can choose
occupation which we like.But we can not choose occupation only by interest.
As a medical student I will choose doctor as my occupation.Because  medical is
my interest.When i become a medical student i decide to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID aab1cee5-38c5-3312-9011-10c07ae1a50e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Confronted with the graduation of college，we are concerned about our occupation more and more.Therefore, there's a hot
topic about choosing occupation.In our eyes,chooosing occupation is a significant decision.And it's known to us all that
the opinion when you choose a suitable job varies from person to person.
In my point of view, varieties of factors ought to be taked into consideration when you choose the job you desire.First
and foremost,you need think of your major which can contribute you to get a appropriate occupation.Second, whether you
are conpetent the job you apply for is also a important factor which can influence your promising future.Only with
indispensable ability are you likely to get your colleagues' admiration.Moreover,the salary you will get I think is
supposed to think.Last but not the least,whether you like the job need taking into account, which can determine the
efficiency and quality you work.
From the above analysis, everyone's occupation should be think over and over again.In the end, I believe that my choice
of occupation is doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 83bcc46e-41e8-3778-b1b5-be8be52918f3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know，the choosing of occupation is one of the most significant decisions
in one’s life。Actually，it can decide your life in part sometimes for many people。
So，we must be cautious about choosing occupation。Besides，we must consider lots of
factors when choosing our jobs。Above all，you must be interested in it。Otherwise，you
will feel bored and upset when doing your work，and it must make you feel sorrow when
thinking about doing the things you disgust for lifelong。
Next，you must think about the wages。You may think that it’s ashamed to talk about
it，but it is the fact。The purpose to work is devote ourselves to our country and
social。But you must make a living before doing this。
And at least，you should judge that，whether the occupation you will do is good and
comfortable。It doesn’t mean that the jobs such as cleaning the street is not great。
it means that you should make money by your own efforts。And of course，you can’t break
the laws。
When it comes to me，I choose to become a doctor after graduation because I want to
save lives。I must be proud of myself when helping other people live better and
decreasing their pain and sorrow。So as a medical students，I am energetic to be ready
for becaming a wise and knowledgeable doctor。

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 86825fa1-3cdb-3aee-9f11-b13238747212> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As the old saying goes ,it is a fearable thing for a man to choose a wrong occupation .
Choosing occupation is an important decision for men ,and it's the same with women.Occupation has strong contact with a man's success ,so when we choose our occupations we should consider as many aspects as possible.
when it comes to choosing occupation, I will play the interest at the first place ,because I think only if a man love his occupation can he gets success.But only the interest is not enough ,we should also consider the future of the occupation ,personal abilities and so on.
What's more, you need also consider your family ,the occupation should let you be able to earn enough money to make you family live on.
If you ask me what occupation I will choose ,I will tell you it is biologist ,for I think biology is an interesting subject and it will play an important role in people's life in the future .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bd2f9fb8-cf99-3170-8cce-20b8eb158bc0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
The topmost priomitry in a person's life is choosing an suitable occupation.it will
effect your life in a long term.
There are many factories we should thought about when we choose occuopation.first,intrest
is the teacher of a person.your job must be one thing you intrested in.via this,you can
make your job intresting and looked attractive for you.being energetic,to enjoy the work.
second,yourself is the best person to do the job.you must have the strengthes to work for
it.third,you should consider of the salary,the work circumstance,the people you will work
together and the rest.
From where i stand,my choice is to be a doctor.help those who are struggled in pains,
sustained suffurance,illed badly,suffurred disease and cancers and so on.as a doctor like
this,i may not solve people'affairs,graverty is not responsible for people who fall in love,
so do i.but i think i have compassion and a heart of gratitude,excellent skills to show my
love,to release their painful.
That is my choice.that is what i want to be,what would i to live.as a doctor,to be an
angel.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 70003564-8550-3c2c-a9ee-a712d9b748fe> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We are facing choice everyday.Some are very important.Occuqation is one of them .Choosing Occupation has a large influence on our lives.
What we should think of when we choose our occupation are so many and different among people.Firstly,we should think of our own interests.Only when we love our occupation,we can devote ourselves to doing the job and get success.Then,the obtain employment is another factor. After school life,we everyone will go into a company to start our new life.We will undertake the new duty which includs our parents,wife and kids.
My choice is to be a docter.In my heart,doctor is heavenly.I love this job.When patiants smile to me, I will feel very happy .I believe that I can achieve my dream as a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b53ab4c6-281e-3fa2-908b-b01f981ff2a8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw, choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our life. It matters our family, our major and so on. As a result, how to choose a good occupation is more difficult than other decisions.
At first, choosing occupation needs us to consider all kinds of factors. For instanse, the most important factor is the class we major in at college. I think we should follow our profession so as we can perform professionally in our work. Secondly, interest is another important aspect. As the old saying goes, interest is the best teacher. We had better choose a job which we like, only in this way can we work happily and enjoy it. Thirdly, environment is the one you should take over carefully, for example, when you get a job in other city instead of your hometown, you may think about whether you can adopt yourself to the environment, or where you live and where to buy your own house. Other factors like family, ability and so on also should be payed attention to.
As for me, I think my ideal job is to be a doctor, because I am studying medical major in the university, and I have dreamed of being a doctor since I was a little girl. In other word, I love the occupation although it's tough, difficult and always very busy. In brief, this job is my decision after my careful consideration, and I believe everyone will choose the best occupation which is most adopted to themselves.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4817b4a8-e80d-3a02-abb7-c0023d5f0f89> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Three years later, when we graduated from university, all of us will be faced with
a common problem that what kind of occupation should we choose. After all, choosing
an occupation is one of the most vital decisions in our lives.
Everyone should choose an occupation after plenty of considering. It consists of
many factors.First of all, one person should find out what kind of occupation attracts
him or her. Because it depends on whether you have enough patient and energy to insist
on the same thing day after day. Second is the health factor.Health is the most
important treasure for a person. It is not worthwhile exchanging money with your
health.Third is the economic factor, after all, people work for money. It won't change.
The last one is the problem about whether it is convenient enough for you to reach your office.
With the traffic jam develops, people are more eager to have an occupation which is not
in a distance from their houses.
In my opinion, a science research is an occupation which is satisfying considering that
I am fmiliar with it and it provides me with a stage where I can develop my interest in future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a54c334e-3d4d-33db-a81c-e7ec149793d6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
All the peopole will face the problim that choosing an occupation after her college.The choose
will take impotant role in our life .An apporiate occupation make the man doing work with the
tezt.As well as contribiute his country.
To make an true choosing ,more important thing should  taken to consideration.One of them
most important that interest. One man can show his ability and talent with his advantage .A ot
of peopole has advantage about his faviourite .So interest vary important in our choosing occupation.
In regard my occupation in the future ,i fond of learning midicinal .I think it is the best
job for helping people .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bf5de945-363f-30cc-a529-32353abd6845> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing job occupation is a most important choose in everybody's life.
Before we choose our job, we must consider factors all around. For example: the income, the company's position,
the time you work everyday and the most important factor is that weather you like the job or
not.It is the career you must establish in your life long, if you don't like it yourself, it
can become a sorrow last in your life, too.
I will have to choose my job in the no long future, too. When I choose my occupation,firstly I
must put my major in the university into consideration. I learn medicine in college, so, I may enter the hospital
or a company that produce medicines. Then, the salary of the job is surely the higher the better, cause I want to life a
comfortable life. And the next, the place that I work must near my home so that I can get home fast and go to work conviniently.
The last but not the least, I will surely choose the job I like most, which is easy, makes no presure and where the coleague is easy going.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9dd52a43-c417-3071-8105-98ef508dbd9e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
No one can deny that choosing occupation is an essential thing in our life. An overwhelming major of people attach much importance on the job, which can produce a far-reaching influence on the whole life.
I believe that it is advisable to take a lot of aspects in to consideration when we are choosing the occupation. and it is hard and obscure to decide what to do.In my opinion,The interest is the most important factor. I 'm supposed that if parents impose their thoughts on ours 'chooses, we wouldn’t do a good job and wouldn’t enjoy life because we are obliged to do the things we don’t like at all！Besides, not only should we take the income in to account, we also need to think whether the job caters to our tastes and the major we study at school.it's not useful if only we are interested in a certain job that we can do nothing . we also need to make a living by the job.
When it comes to my chose, there is no doubt that I will contribute all my life to be a doctor in the future . My parents always courage me to make my own decisions .I make my mind to become a doctor when I am a little girl, and the medicine captures all my attractions.
In a word ,choosing occupation follows your mind.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ec80ad27-5ed1-37c2-8a7d-fdb967f89f5e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing Opccupation
With the development of technology,the pressure of employment is heavier and heavier.Consequently,choosing occupation plays an essential part in one's life.
Nevertheless,there are so many factors required to be considered.On the one hand ,an occupation is usually one we ought to work on for so long a time,natrually,we hope to choose what is in accordance with our interest.However,on the other hand,the situation of employment is so fierce that it will not allow us to hold on to what we are fond of.Anyway,we should meet the primary  living reqiurements first.Moreover,taking the prospery of the career we take on into consideration is more resonable.That is,we'd better choose an occupation with a promising future.Of course,all roads lead to Roman.We have multipled alternatives when making our decisions in the society,which means that we can open our eyes into a wider field.
Now,as a freshman in university,although faced with the straining occupution condition,I still want to choose an occupation living up to my dream sinse my childhood-becoming a physician.Maybe I will struggle hard before realizing it,but I think the happiest thing in the whole life is doing what you love continuously no matter what you pay for it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a8a3c29b-ecec-34fc-a470-3825a66d41c1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is very important in our life,because for most of us,once we chosed an occupation,we'll
work in this career for decades.For this point, choosing occupation is related to wheather our life will be happy
or not.
As we all know,there are so many factors we should consider before choosing occupation.First of all,what
you are interested in is the most esssential thing.Since we'll be happy doing what we like,so doing a job you are
interested in will make you happy.Therefore,there will be less complaints about the jobs we are doing.Besides,
wheather the occupation is in need for society is also an important factor.If you're major in what the society do
not need,you'll havedifficulties in finding a job after graduation.What's more,sometimes the ideas your parents
hold should be considered too.There is no denying that our parents have gotten through much more things than us,
so their adviceoften makes sense.
When the time came for me to choose an occupation,I chosed to be a dentist.For one thing,it is because my mom
is a dentist,and she can help no matter what difficulties I'll come across.In addition,my mother influenced me
a lot when I was young.For another,dentists are badly needed,so I can easily find a job after graduation.
Last but not least,as long as I study hard,I can become an excellent dentist in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e59511f4-d566-3dd3-bd5b-78c758b124f4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Faced with the fierce competition,we are cautious about choosing occupation,which is of vatial importance to one's life.For this reason,we should pay more attention to thinking about our decisions.
As far as I'm concerned,we are supposed to be considerate  when we choose an occupation.After all,it may influence all of one's life.In my opinion,the interest is one of the most important aspects. If you can't enjoy your job,you can't enjoy your life. If you don't love your job, you will live an unhappy life even though you have much money.Besides,as you can see,it is hard to achieve success in a field which we have no interest in.Secondly,the income of the job is also should be taken into our consideration. It is our unshakable duty  to support ourselves by working.Last but not least,We can't deny that the development potential of the occupation ,which can inspire us to make more progress in our future,is significant,too.
After comprehensive consideration, I choose to be a medical student.I love the job and in my opinion,as long as I am deligent enough,I will achieve great success sooner or later.I believe I can make it!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0fe0d3a0-f610-3533-b4a6-af757df44603> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
One of the most important chioce for a college graduate is deciding what to do.Choosing occupation,which is of great importance in our whole life.We have to face it,and we must try our best to make an advisable choice.
To make an advisable choice, we should take into account at least two aspects.On the one hand,we should choose a job with promising future.We can enjoy the honor and challenge it brings to us.On the other hand,individual interests is another important thing.We can show our ability and talent to the best advantage by this way.
Here is what I want to do.I plan to study hard bacause I want to go to aschool overseas.I might be a teacher,a doctor or a scientist.No matter what,I'll be an expert at what I do.And I can be a useful man to society.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0d22e277-15ab-3321-8dce-521ecb96e0c0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing opsition is an important decision as it means we will doing the job for lifetime. So, we must be very careful.
Bofore making decision, I take many things into consideration.The first thing I would consider  is location. I should find the best way to save the time. I don't want to waste my time on travelling just to go to work everyday. I want to be close to my home and family. I want to spend more time being together with my family. So, the closer the unit of work is, the more possible I will choose it. Next, I will consider the wage. In my oppinion, money is not the most important thing in my life. However, it is indispensable anyway. If one is in short of money, his life will be much difficult. So, I will choose a job with not low wage. Of course, there are still many other factors we should consider such as the requirment for my abilities, environment of the job and etc.
My choice is being a teacher. Being a teacher meansd being together with yong people evryday. I can see the life when I was yong all the time and it's a good practice for my ability.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 395ffcc6-48a8-3158-a64b-8f17ba197bbc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is beyond doubt that choosing occupation is a signiphicant thing for all of us. Because we all need a job to feed our family and survive in the society. At the same time, a good job can increase our passion to the life and make our life more enjoyable. So that we must accept that an appropriate job is one of the most signiphicant things in our life.
We should turn it over before we make the decission to choose a job. And there are many aspects we can consider about. Firstly, we are supposed to think over whether we like this job and whether we want to try our best to achieve something. It is certinely perfect to find a job which is coped with your interest, but we should also believe that we can foster our interest during the work experience. Then, we must consider the prophit of the job because money is necessary for a person to survive in the society. We all want to find a job which we can make a lot of money, but we should not require much at the first of our graduation. Besides, we should think over the prospect of the job to make sure we can easily be admitted to a good company. We can learn how many people want to own this job and the requirement of the market in the past decade years, meanwhile, we should consider the future of the job as well.
As for me, I think the best choice is to be a doctor. At the very begining, I like this job and I think it is a pleasant thing to help the patients. I belive that I will wolk hard to learn the skills and deal with the relationship between the doctors and  the patients. I will take up the chanllenges in my job and try my best to be a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5ef03ea3-6577-3cb3-ad86-e53a1b8ed85b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is a important decision which can influence our future and lifestyles.When we choose our occupations,many things should be considered,such as
whether you like the occupation,wheher your parents support you,and the pay for the job.
Firstly,you should take your interest into consideration,as the saying goes ,the interest is the best teacher.Only do you really love the occupation can you do the job well.It
is the interest that leads to our achievements,rather other things.Secondly,before choosing occupation,you should take your parents' advices.Whrther they support your choice is
another important thing which influence yourfuture.There is no doubt all parents love their children and they try their best to help their children choose occupation.So if your parents
don't support your decision,you'd better give up .Unless you 're sure that you have so strong persistence that can help you go through any trouble you may meet.Last but not the least,
you should be more realistic ,that is to  say ,you should consider wheher you can get enough pay to support your family.
I chose doctor as my occupation.First,When I was young,I admired doctors very much and I wanted to become a doctor very much. As a doctor,I should work hard so that I can cure
my patients who are suffering disease.I am  careful with every thing and I think it can help me a lot with my work.It is important that my parents support my choice very much and
my mother told me:"Whether you can earn money or fame,in my eye,you are the most great doctor."

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID fccf4f3c-d2cb-3526-b467-96382c3bd15a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in the lives,as we all know.An appropriate occupation makes a man work with passion, as well as contribute to the country.
However ,there are many factors we should take into considertion before we make a choice.For example,someone may focus on the money as some other may take the job what they interest in.What their choose often depend on what they want and what they good at.What is more ,maybe family and relation is another factor.Someone may choose a job related to what the parents wish.
As for me,what I choose is computer science.I talked with my parents ,teachers and friends,and got some useful suggestions from them before I make the decision.However ,I made the decision on my own.My interest is in the computer ,and I like the coding life.In addition ,as the development of the society,the computer will become more and more important.The computer will do us a favor in many ways.I think once I choose the job ,I can make the computer do more contribute to the society which is also one of my dream in my childhood.
I think we should choose occupation careful.Choose what we really interest in.And be a useful man to the society.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b476e638-1372-3b81-83f3-8d0d4a92f05d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There's a saying that you need to ensure that your wife or your husband is the one that you really love so that your will keep in a good mood from 6 pm to 8 am each day. And you need to find a job that fits your hobby so that also keep in a good mood from 8 am to 6 pm each day.
No need to say that choosing job which determines your rest life is one of the most crucial decisions during one’s whole life. We have to take all of the factors in consideration: salary, location, major and so on. But refer to the saying above; it’s easy to figure out that we are supposed to choose the job that we are truly interested in instead of a job with a higher salary. You will only spare no effort to finish your work that you passionate about.
The reason we doing a job is not only to raise our family but also to achieve our dream that always roots in our heart, which is also the reason why we live in this world.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 38f22799-ce9d-3b12-8854-af750008f82d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all say,choosing occupation is a quite important decision in our whole life.It is
related to our future life.Choosing a suit occupation will bring us a great many of benefits
not only in economy but aslo in our physical and mentail health.Please be especially cautious
to choose occupation.
Variouse factors will influent choosing occupation and we should turn over all kinds of them
to make a correct decision to avoid regreting in the rest life.In the eye of my mind,the first
factor is your interests.A saying said,"Interests are the best teacher."Only we have interests
on the occupation we choose can we do our best to dedicate to our work so as to achieve more
in this field.Aside from that,wages,work time,work situation and so on are all essential factors
we should concern on.
After long-time considering,I made up my mind to be a doctor in the future,which is noble
and valueable.What's the most important is that I am interested in it,I am fond of helping
patiences to struggle all kinds of diseases.It is my dream.And now,the dream will come true
under my efforts.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0f42b351-85a8-347f-98a7-f46d7e29874a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the graduation approching,a serious problem,which is concerned about
the occupation choice,comes up.For many graduaters,finding a decent job is a
significant decision that we can't afford to unnotice.However,choosing occupation
is dominated by many tengible and intengible factors.
In reality,a number of things we take in to consideration affacts our decision.
First and the foremost,what we consider at first is whethere the position is able
to be connected with our major,which can give us oppotunitise to make contribution
to the company or the society.Though the majority are motivated by the connection
of major,a part of them regard interest as the priority.To their point of view,not
only can this job stimulate their passion but also it contribute to fulfill their
dreams. Apart from these two opinion,there still some people argue that the payment
should be taken into account,which meets their requirement of daily expenses.
As far as I'm concerned,I consider the interest as the basic element.Struggling
in our brife existance,we all try our best to find the value of life and world.
Only if we devote to hard working can we contribute to the society and achive
enormous achievements.Whiout interest,we can't stir the geniue appriciation to
our work,especially to our life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5f8d4ebe-7f7f-3713-bb05-c248e1bd96c4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we are admitted into university after about ten years efforts,
as we are gradually grow up into adults,it's time for us to be independent of our
parents and design our future on our selves.To live a happy and promissing life,
chossing a suitable occupation can really make a great difference and should be
pay enough as well as careful attention to.
As one of the most important choices in our lives,there are never too many
factors to be considered in.First,we'd better choose am opputation fit with what
we have majored in,for that kind of job can really offer us a chance to put our
knowledge into practice.What's more,we should also have a deep thought of the
potention hiden behind the occupation,that's to say,it's wise for us to understand
fully the work.It is said that a good job can produce success,so we should make
it clear that what we'd like to seek from this job,money or any other things,and
what we will get after some years.At last but not the least,we should choose the
occupation in which we are interested can donate ourselves in.
As for me,I choose oral medical science as my study,and I'll be a dentist after
years study.In fact,I like it and am sure to have a good future where I'll be
happy and achieve my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4ac726ee-9671-365f-aef8-8441288132c0> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of the society, we have more and more choose about our occupation.
In my opinion, choosing occupation is the most importent choose which we have to make in our life. There are
many facters we should concider such as the pay and the environment. What's more, I think the most importent
thing is that if the job fit you. because if you like the job, you will be happy when you work. But if not, you
may be tired and can't do anything. Beyond that, the pay will also influence your choose.
When people are young, their dreams are always becoming a teacher or a scientist. But as they grow up, their
dream may be more reality.
When it comes to me, my choose is doctor. There are many reasens. Firstly, I like being a doctor very much,
because I can help people get away from the pain. Besides, I will get the respect from others, which is also
importent to me. thirdly, I will meet many kinds of people, which will make my life colorful. Finally, the pay
is satisfactory, so I can enjoy my life.
That is all of my opinion about choosing occupation, maybe it will come true in several years.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e43d223a-5080-3a7b-8f67-9f9c67c98d00> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
The reason why we study here is to learn knowledge and skills, and the reason why we learn these is to prepare for our feture jobs. You will find that choosing an occupation is an  important decision when you think that you have prepared for more than fifteen years and you will do that job for about forty years, won't you?
We need to consider many elements if we want to make a good decision. Some people made the choice just after a little consideration or just considered one part of those elements, and they would be unhappy because they would find many problems. For example, someone thought the job could make him happy and chosed it,and the job could just pay him very low salary. So could he be happy if he found that he can hardly support his family? It's important to consider all the parts, happines, salary, time, environment and so on.
I want to be a scientist, which can make me happy. Also,I think I can get enough money to support my future family. This job muct be difficult and it will make people tired, but I really like science, so I think the happines can make me less tired. This is a good choise, isn't it?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 37c53017-b9ee-311d-9c96-bd9ca332e09e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a College student ,we should be ready to choose a Occupation.choosing Occupation is one of the most important thing in our life.so we should be carefully to think about it .
How can we choose a good Occupation for us, we must consider some sorts of factors: first, you must like the occupation , if you do not like the jod , you can not do it well , and you can not happy in your living life .secondly, the saraly of the occuption should be enough to you . if you can not earn monney , how can you speand your life . the last , I think the Occuption should adapt the social .it should adapt the need of people , so that you can make a contribution to our social.
I have choosed a occupation as my target . I want to be a doctor in the future .beacouse the saraly is enough ,and it is adapt the need of patien .most important ,I was born in the hospital , I like doctor , I like this job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6e1ead63-0063-3cc8-84a2-a87ab526d3c8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occuption is one of the most important choosen in our life,and it's very mangificant.
Because it can decide what we would do to support our family.So when we are choosing the occupation,
we should think about all kinds of elements.Such of the payment,the treatment when people retirement,
whether you vlike it or not,whether you master it or not,the work is hard or easy and so on.We should think over it.
My choice is to become a doctor.It's a choice that I have decided when I was young.I feel very
sad and Sympathy when I see someone get ill or be hurt.Maybe I also often got ill when I was young,so I want to be a
doctor.To became a good doctor,I will work hard in college to learn the kownledge about the medical.
What's more, I should take progress in my quality,a doctor who has good medical skill but don't have good medical quality is not
a good doctor.I will try my best to achieve my goal,and I will never feel guilty about my choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4650edb1-5a3e-38c1-88ff-315b7e4b9e8c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Now there are more and more occupations in the world.As a student studying in the university,we need to think about what we will do
after we graduate from our college.Facing so many occpations,someone maybe don"t know how to do.To choose our occupations is a very
important desicion in our lives.So we must be careful.
Many facts need us to think about when we choose our occupations.At first,we should choose a occopation that we love.Because we will
do it in our whole lives.Then,the place where we will work is also a very important factor,we should choose a good working environment.
That makes us have a good mood everyday.Besides,we must think about the money that your occupation will pay.Because if the money is a
little,you will have truble in living in the society.
At last,my choosing is that I will be a doctor.Because I love it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8555e80a-51d2-3b17-98b6-58b34179829f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is very important to choose our occupation. Our occupation is related to our future life. So wo should be catious to choose our occupation.
Before we choosing occupation, we have to consider many things.
First, we should consider whether we like that occupation. In my view, we should better choose the occupation that we like best. So we have intresting to do the work and have a happy life.
Second, we should consider whether that occupation have a good future. We had better choose a occupation that can make more money. We do the work for making money. So it is a important part in choosing occupation.
Third, we also can consider whether the occupation have more freedom and more time. For example, some people choose to be a teacher due to the summer holiday and winter holiday. So the freedom and the time also can be a part in choosing occupation.
In a word, choosing occupation is very important, so we should consider many parts about the occupation not only that three parts. Above all, I choose to be a doctor. Maybe doctor do not have many freedom and time, but I love this occupation because I can help lots of people accoding to my work. And it can bring happiness for me. I think it is more important for me. So I choose doctor as my occupation after considering.
You can choose any occupation if you like, but you should do the work with your heart.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a16d9b93-c33b-3aff-b62d-d3eaa456af21> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is of great significance to choose a suitable occupation for ourselves in our whole life. As we konw, we have to live with our occupation all our life after graduated from university. It can be a unfortunity to work with a job which you do not like and you will find yourself unhappy during the work.
There are saveral factors we should take into consideration before choosing occupations. At first, we should know clear about what we like and what we are good in. For example, if you are good in math, you can choose a job like accountant. Secondly,  we can not deny the fact that we should support our families so that we have to choose a occupation with enough salary and it is better we can earn more than we need. Then we can live easer and do more things we want. What's more, you'd better choose an occupation which has a high employment rate so you can find a job easily.
In my view, I decided to be a doctor in the future. Not only because it is a honorable job but I can earn more salary to help my parents to support my poor family. Altough I did not like this job at the beginning, I find myself graduately be interested in this occupation. I believe that not everyone can find a perfect job but they can find their jobs interesting after getting more familiar with their occipations.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 31d52943-e8c6-3e15-bab0-f83af2fb6ad1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of society ，an increasing number of careers have appearented，and    there
are various occupations for us to choose from 。So choosing occupations is one of  the most essential      determines for people for the reason that  it means  what  do we do in the futrue and  it‘s  relative to     one’s  value systems。
But how to choose a probable occupation is still a problem 。In the eye of  people， when it comes to choosing occupation ，one should take a lot of things into account 。Firstly，we should consider to choose a job that fits ourselves 。Take what we major  at school  into account  and it will make us more suitable to do a job。Secondly，  it‘s  important to think about the salary 。Most of us will depend on it to make a living ，so we should make our effort to  choose a high-paid work  within our limitation 。Meanwhile ，don’t  forget  to  think of your instersts 。As we know，insterst is the best teacher ，and it will make you full of energy when you choose a job that you‘re found of。
As for me ，I will be a dentist in the future 。I  think it’s an  ideal  occupation  for me 。I would have passion  about this occupation  and  now I’m making every effort to equip myself  so that I could be a          good  dentist 。

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5cc6ea58-4b5b-345c-8e2f-1141b809a80e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in our lives. What we choose is certain to affect our future lifestyle. Besides, only when our occupation is determined can we have a peaceful life.
while choosing occupation, there are a lot of factors that should be taken into consideration. To begin with, interest must be the priority. If we are not interested in what we work on, how can we spend our whole life in doing the job?
In addition, it's necessary that we consider our ability. Some special occupation ,such as policemen, pilot and so on, need extraordinary capability and they are no easy jobs. What's more, the occupation we choose had better have something to do with what we learn so that we can put the knowledge we've got in university to practice.
As far as I am concerned, I will choose to be a doctor. Since my major is medicine, to become a doctor will be the best choice. Moreover, it's my childhood dream as well, for it's pretty glad to see people with pain recover from illness. Helping others is always the happiest thing.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 636b789f-5842-3999-ada1-150f4b2bfe1e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is known to all, college is the place providing with us advanced professional knowledge and practical skills.
In order to make greatest use of this precious experience ,it's high time to think for yourself to choose occupation.
Occupation choosing is attached great importation to by us ,which usually involves what you have learned in college,
what branches of work you favor,how high the income will  devolope,where you will work and settle down ,and so  on.Choosing
occupation need meticulous thinking ,like a game of gamble, deciding what level of your life will be.
Well, I have made up my decision to become a doctor ,which has been my dream since my childhood.There are several reasons
for my decision.First of all, my present profession is medicine,leading to the work of doctor.Second, it is my  crazy love for
medicine that drive me to capture my dream.Thirdly ,doctor is one of the most nobly jobs in the world,curing people to lessen
their misery is what my heart yearning for.
It is never too early to consider choosing occupation .Keep a long plan of your future and struggle as hard as you can .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ac97e0a9-084d-35f8-b2b7-d22b836f6082> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, most university graduations face the problem of choosing an occupation, which plays a vital role in their life. An appropriate occupation makes one work with zest and vigor, as well as contribute to one's country. So how to make a wise choice?
As far as I am concerned, there are several vital things should be taken into consideration when we begin to choose an occupation. First of all, it is the major that you study, professional knowledge and skills make things work smoothly. what's more, the interest is also necessary, as the proverb goes, "interesting is the greatest teather". The last but not the least, we also have to consider the demands of our society to show our responsibility, for in most occusion, the interest of our country is more important than the individual's . Think carefully of this three factors before making the choice can help you make the best use of your life.
To me, an medicine student, choosing occupation is rather important, it is not only a job, but also a kind of responsibility. And I am also fond of learning meficine. Thus I'm determined to choose doctor as my final occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID b730810b-91ba-3901-be70-c99046352e30> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing is a topic for our daily life because we make choises everyday.Some of
them are trivious,while others will have an foundamental influence on us for our lifetime.
And the choosing of occupation is one of the case.
Occupation is only not a habit which largely stems from your preference.Because of its
significance,we should take every factor into consideration.A job which is to our taste
is always the origin of our thoughts.Yet the social situation such as market information,
payment,working hours,to name a few,can't be omitted.This serious choise always propel us
to have a full-sight perspective of the matter.
Having been admitted by the medicine school,I made up my mind to becomme a doctor.I do
appreciate my decision for it contained my value of life .I know this probabily is the best
decision I've never made in that I have the faith to persist this dream without regretful
feeling.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 160522ba-a89e-3143-9958-1c32c956ba3f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We have been in univercity for half a year.Although it is far away from us to get
a job,we still should keep it in mind .
Choosing occupation is great decision in our life.We should consider many fators
when we choose occpation.first of all.Interest.I think it is the most important
factor to effect us.Because interest could support us to keep on.None of us expect
we work in the office like in the prison。Next.Weagon.If someone like a job very much
so that he can devote himself to it without any payment.But most of us need money
to make a life.Last but not the least.The relationship between us and our colleagues.
Good relationship makes us happy all the day.On the opposite.You will feel in the
evil when you work.
In my opinion.I would put the interest in the first place.In short.Study hardly is
the most important task in our daily life.A high marks is a advantage to choose occation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7dff7147-4ff8-3122-bb86-c6f786578309> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
An occupation can keep you in company for many years,even longer than the time you were at school.So it can be an really important decision for us to choose an occupation which is suitable for us.
A great deal of facters need to be considered when we make the decision to take up one job.Wether the job is in accordance with our major or wether we could use our skills to do well in the job could be the most important thing we concern about.All of us have the desire to be professional in what we do,and thus,we could get promotion.The salary used to be another essential factor,but graduates today consider more the future of the job.One's  careeer could last for twenty years or more,it is required to evalute a job in the long run as a result.Other factors including social satus,insurance,and the diastance from home or family are also necessary.
As for myself ,I don't want to fix my job so soon.To be a doctor is always my first priority since I have studied madicine.But I think there are still many other things which is based on mecadicine but not limitted to it that I could do.May be a job in the government office which works on the reform of our country's medical system,for instance.Anyway,I want to try more when I am young and figure out what really love and dream to spend my whole life on.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c9c4a867-c5fe-36d9-9b9b-081e45292a38> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision of one's life,which may influence whole life of a person to
some extent.In most cases,making a decision is fairly your own choice.But when it comes to choosing
occupation,it is commonly not just your own thoughts that matter.
Some  factors must be taken into consideration when you choose your
occupation. First of all,your own interests is the most important factor ,because the occupation is once
chosen,you is likely to work all your life.So ,follow  your heart ,and choose what you like .Secondly,you'd
better open up to valuable suggestions given by your family, teachers,or advisors and  so on.Having rich
personal experiences,they can take you to the reality  and  help you avoid making wrong decesion.In addition,
it's wise of you to  know about  the demand of the labor force market in China.Through analysing the current
situation,you may get a job more easily in future.
For my part,i hope that my occupation can go well with my interests,and afford me a good life ,as well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0c38625f-5739-39c0-af4a-2590d0445610> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When we graduate from university or other professional schools, we will face another
important turning point in our life which could have great influence on our future life.
Thus, choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our whole life.
When it comes to occupation choose, there are various factors which we couldn't put
aside. Where is the city located, how is the city developed, how is the citizens' life like.
The most important I think is that if you love the job or not and if you can competent
the job well. In addition, we also should put our families' thoughts into consideration. In fact,
it is more complex than what I mentioned above.
As a medical student, I will choose doctor as my future occupation. I'd like to work in
hospitals which located in big cities like Shanghai or Jinan. For the hospitals there are
equipped with more professional and high technological equipments. We could never gain a
better life if we didn't do our best. No pains, no gains.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cfe9f773-5714-30cf-9f14-2fc02e3092f1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everybody knows that there are three vital things in a person's life:borning,working and marry.Of course occupation is a significant factor that influences one's whole life.you may have a low-paid job,a disapointing marriage ,uncomftable old life...all this may be from one thing:you choose a wrong occupation.So,nobody can ignore the importance of choosing occupation.
knowing that choosing occupation is impotant is not enough,we shouid also own the ability to choose a job.Many factors contribute to the result of occupation.First,advantages.you should know what is your goodness,is that writing,speaking,operating,oe the other things.If you choose a job you are not good at,you will find it difficult and you can't stand out.Second,the interests are the best teacher.Only when you have interests in somethings,can you finish it well.Confucius said that loving it is batter than knowing it.So,when you choose occupation,consider your interests.Third,the reality.No matter how we are smart,or how we are intersted in something,we can not always get a job that fits us perfectly.Only the reality is the real judger.Which job is available?Which job earns more?Which job can be more promiser?Instead of we directly get the job.Now,many people choose doctor as a job for doctor is high-paid and good welfare novertheless many time and money are required.Well,in end ,too much medical students are continuing produced,while only part of them can get a job.It is realily shame.
As a medical student,I chose the job just because my love in medicine and the will to help people at th beginning.Now I am a grade one student already.Many dreams came true and also broke out,I still love my job,but I have to worry about my futhure.If I have a choice to choose once again,mybe I will hesitate.But as that I have went on this way,I wil try my best to continue it.That is also my advice,don't give up easily.Trying is better than escapimg.So,don't be afraide,make your choise,then find a ocupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 61f88065-074c-3226-bcca-0f9d23080d13> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone will meet a trouble that is choosing occupation.Choosing occupation is
an important challange is one's life.It will influence a person's even his whole family's
life.And what you do will influence your life value.
When choosing occupation,many factors should be considered,such as what kind of
life do you like,and how much can you get paid for the job.
I'm a medical student,of course I choose to be a doctor it also because that I'm
willing in helping others.I think save other's life is a sacred job,when the patient
become healthy again because of you,you will fell glorious.I have to admit that it
will be so tired to be a doctor,a doctor can only have a little time to be with his
family,and work and work everyday.We can't change the truthbut we can get satisfied
when curing patients.
I'm looking forward being a doctor one day to achieve my dream.And I believe I
will be a good doctor serving for the patients.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 20f8e9bf-13bf-32a0-99bc-dfd72d81a3bc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We all know it is no doubt that choosing occupation is an impotant decision in every life .There is a saying that choosing in everywhere but only the little point.
When we was young we would be encouraged to imagin what would be in the furture .Maybe you wanted to be a sicientist ,a novel writer or a excllent driver ,but with time flies ,our orign dream have been forgot.To more reality ,we should think over what job you want and how to choose a pretty job.
However ,choosing occupation also is a difficult and bore-brain thing ,which consider all kinds of factors .For intance,wages,work environment ,work culture,work development and so on .In my opinion ,how much happiness the work can take for you is always most important.At present,I am Grade one at college and I think it is uncertain as for my future choose .Therefore I have been exploring what I admire and pursuit most .But it is certain for me that I should do .At college ,I am always understand four seption in which learn to learn ,learn to do ,learn to be and learn to together .
My choose is on the road.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a25f6afe-370c-3e37-8275-ef5ad386948e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of social economy,there are more and more occupations in our daily life,such as lawyer,doctor,teacher,athlete
and so on.Just because there are so many occupations,choosing a good occupation is an important thing to everyone.If you choose a job
which is not suitable to your ability,you will not take a good use of your skill,and the job which is not good for you will not improve
your ability.So,choosing a suitable occupation is important to everyone.
As an important thing which may make a deep influence to your future,choosing occupation asks people to consider every factor,such as
whether the job is suitable for your knowledge,your parents and so on.If you have consider every factor,I think you can find a job which
you like.
As an university student,I also face the problem of choosing occupation.Luckily,I have find a job which I want to devote myself into
it,that is doctor.Being a doctor has been my dream since I was a child.Because I want to use my knowledge to help others and give them
a healthy body.And I think one of the best things in the world is the happiness when people recover from the illness.I like it.
I have find a job which I can devote myself to it,and you?Have you find an occupation which you like?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0d49d858-e18f-341b-bca9-6b923a4a77a9> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, it is a big decision to choose our occupation, so we must be very careful when we  chooose the job.
Here are something we must be consider when we choose occupation.
Firstly, the most important thing you must give attention to is the salary. After you graduation from your university, you cannot rely on your parents, you must support your own, or may be your own family. So you must get a good salary from your boss.
The second thing is your interest. As we all know, if we do something we like, we will do it with a happy heart, but if you do the job that you hate, you will be very unhappy when you do it.
The last but not least, you should consider that whether you like the city or not where you will work. Although it is less important than the salary or your interest. After all, you must live in this city for thirty years or even longer. if you stay in the place that you do not like for more than thirty years, what a terrible thing it is.
As for me, I will consider my interest first, then combine with the salary and the city to choose my job.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 67798de5-241c-3165-ba5d-7ee0bbf54fe1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Zhao Benshan said that life means doing something after birth. It is a jok of course, but it can tell us that having a job is important for us.
It is a great decision in one's life to choose a job, because the job you get can affect you life. We are not lone people, we have our family, so we have to be careful when we choose our job. As a man, I know I should take care of my parents,my wife,and bring up my child, so having a good job is necessary for I can get enough money. As a college student who have a dream that can do something for our country in the future, having a good job is also important for I can do well and do more if the job is suitable for me.
So,How to choose your job?
You should think carefully about many aspects, Such as how much money you can get from your job. Money is the direct answer to the question why we need a job. So it is what you should think first. Second, you should think about wether it suitable for you. As a student mojor in medision, of course I could not choose a job  in computer or other areas. Third, the job must provide you a space to achieve your dream.
For me, a student now, I think I want to be a scientist major in Canser. It is  a nightmare for everyone, and one of my friends's father died of it. This is my job, also is my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 92b6557c-e0bc-39f8-b3c7-59da43661ac6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
the past several years has witnessed that making a mistake in choosing occupation has negative influnces in life increasingly. staying at a mistake working point makes people uncomfortable even sad, while choosing a suitable job can lead to success.
there are a sea of people who has a unsuitable job and fail to being successful. in fact, some parts can help us to make a right choice in it. first, it is important to think of adventage and disadventage about yourself. everyone needs to find the most suitable postion instead of running to something which is great surface. second, you'd better to link to your major,which can combine your knowledge with your work. finally, paying more attention to social situation can improve your choice. because we live in the big social circle, it is impossible for us to keep away the influence from it. basing the social situation choosingly is another point to help.
as for my choice, i major in medcine then i will choose the work postion basing on my the best subject. it will be one of thinking point to consider the futare social.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 29a617a1-4d1d-39c2-a937-608d1cb290c5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are more and more college graduates could't choose a right qccupation which they specialized in. Choosing
occupation is a significant decision of our life.So what should we do when we choose our occupation.there are some suggestions
I want to share with you.
We should think over all kinds of element when we are choosing occupation. Firstly some college graduates always want to get
a dignity so that they would be comfortable. But your profession in your college most determined your occuation. Secondly,
you should follow your interest.Just like steve jobs saids,the only way to do great work is to love what you do. If you want
get a exploit, you must follow your heart and love your occupation. Thirdly, you also should think about your family. The
elements of choosing occupation are diversify which we must think it over clearly.
As far as I am concerned, I will be a dentist. Because of my profession, I will be comfortable if I could become a dentist,
and becoming a dentist is also my dream. I like my profession so I want to be a dentist

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c9c8b58a-b044-3871-b63b-e501d38abd6e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
What you do in the future concerns what your life will be. As the saying goes, it is not what you are born but what you do that matters. Choosing the right job is a matter of our whole life.
When we are choosing job, there are lots of things need to be turned over among which,in my opinion,your interests may be the most "annoying" one--you want to go for the things you have interests and votion in, but the real life don't give you such a job. You have to surbmit to the reality, but you are not willing to put your interests aside. When this happens, I don't feel it wise to insist on our hobbies, for there are many other elements that make a job you aren't interesrted in more suitable for you, such as the working place, salary, oppotunities to have futher education and the rest. In a word, interests are something but not everyting. But there is one thing we should never forget--what you do must can let you devote your knowledge and intellegent to our society and give you the chances to make yourseft valuable to the human being.
As far as I am concerned, I am determined to be a doctor, which I think is the best job for me. No matter how the society developes, doctors are neened all the time. Doctors are the ones who save people's life and fight with the disasters. And up to now , China is still lack of doctors to serve all the civils. China needs doctors. When I was a little girl, I have great interests in medicine. Being admitted to the Clinic Medicine in Shandong University allows me the dream of being a doctor. I am young woman who is warm-hearted but calm at the face of accidents. I am proudthat my charactor suits the profession of a doctor. When it comes to the reality that doctor is a good job but not a good job to be wealthy. I can say by may herat that I can not live whithout money, but money is not all what I persume. I can serve the people in the way I have been dreaming of and lead a life whithout poority, how can I complain that I am not wealthy?
I want to be a doctor, and I wish all the youngs can choose the right job for themselves.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f0727680-bba1-3cca-993f-240c3c721dc3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important point in our life.It influence one's whole life.It desides success that ones may get.
You must think of a lot of elements if you want to choose an occupation.First,interest is the beat teacher,if you want to choose an occupation,you must think of where is your interest,what is you really want to do,if you will be happy when you do the occupation,how long your interest will last.Second,you may think of how many salery the occupation may pay.Everyone want to make more money.Third,if the occupation is be honored,if the occupation has high social class may become what you think of.Fourth,if your parents want you to do the occupation,if your relations want you to do the occupation.
For me,I want to be a doctor.I think doctor is a holy occupation.Being a doctor could help others.My parents also want me to be a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 9bda282b-5dc5-383b-8e1d-144eb5e34ebd> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,it is quite significant for our whole lives to choose our occupation.This
choose,whether it is right or not,will change our following life.
However,it is not easy to make this decision correctly.We need to consider a lot of
factors. For example,if you are the only child in your family and you didn't study in home-
town,you must think that where you are going to work after graduation.In a result,we need to
think of which major is good to you in your college.In addition,when it comes to choosing o-
ccupation,we have to think seciously of our hobbies and likes.As the old saying goes,"The h-
obby is the best teacher to us."Therefore,we should choose what we ourself love to do,rather
than what our parents want us to do.Last but not least,the future of the occupation is also
an important factor for us to consider.In a word,it is not a small thing to decide.We must
be responsible to everyone.
As for me,I have chosen the medicine as my major and I will become a doctor in the future.
This choice is not only my decision but also my parents' thought.Therefore,I will try my be-
st to become a excellent doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0958f192-b644-3b71-af52-b60e53e2206f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
With the development of economy,the pressure of job-hunting of the graduated students has become the most serious problem nowadays.How to choose an appopriate occupation is crucial for each of us.
There is no doubt that the varieties of professions offer different options for students,however,the rising rate of job-loss still stike an alart.In many cases,young people haven't a stable profession,causing the unhappness of life.We should pay close attetion to the following elements when we choose a job.First of all, a safe and legal job is the foundemental base.As for a citizen,we must obey the law and protect our securities.Nonthing is more tresure than life.While,the success depends on passion and  interest.You would better put your whole heart on the job,instead of just finishing the task and getting the salary.Enjoy and love what you are doing.Besides what memtioned above,a good salary and a respecting fame are necessary.A reliable company will make sure the interests of stuff,such as security insurance.Only with the fixed material condition,you can go towards without hesitation.
My option is to be a doctor.It not only relatives my study but also benefits for the whole society.Actually,to be a doctor is a hard,nevertheless,I will not give up my dream.It requires the holy responsibility the respect towards life.No matter what I am going to face in the future,I will meet the challenge the accept it with the smile.
Not for a job,but for a dream.You will make it.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 912c81ba-3506-3d63-b3c6-f27e3f26ed9f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Various choices are going to be made during our whole life, while choosing occupation is the most significant one which affects our life directly. It determines our direction of future. In the process of choosing, we find out what we particularly like to do and which part we are willing to devote our life and energy to. A wise choice is certain to be the motivation of carrying on our career.
People will take a lot of factors into account. Interest is the first one to be involved, in my opinion.
No one can focus on his occupation without interest, which provides us with passion and persistence. Actually, the foresight of this occupation and some elements such as salary and working condition need to be paid attention to especially in this modern and objective society. We should make choices according to the needs of our country to a certain degree.
As a medical college student, I am on the way to become a doctor, a kind of person who save life and release people's pain. What the current situation is the sharp relationship between doctors and patients. So choosing this occupation means facing a new and tough challenge of maintaining a comparatively harmonious relationship beteen the two sides. Since I have made my choice, the rest is the effort to stuggle.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID bc540aa3-12cb-3222-a026-05b0e48ccd96> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's an important decision to all of us to choose our life. As we are all college student ,choosing occupation can even decide the rest of your future life.
But choosing occupation may not be successful sometimes .With so many factors to be considered ,it may be a hard time when you choose your occupation .As the factors are complex ,we can’t choose what we would like to do or what we have learned as our job .In fact , it can be miserable .But we have to choose one ,we have to live by what you have chose as your job .That’s the truth ,and it’s life that you can’t live without what you have chose.
As choosing occupation is so important and essential to us ,what should we do to choose an occupation that will really suit us ?
As far as I am concerned , it depends on many factors .And one of those factors that I think is important is that choosing our major subject. It will be a happy and interesting course when you study your major subject .More or less ,you will be better at an occupation related to your major subject than others. So choosing a major subject that really suit you is the first step to choose an suitable occupation .
But you have to face the truth that you may choose a major subject you aren’t really interested in. Then ,don’t be depressed. You should study what you have choose anyway ,and you should just consider it as what you like .I think it will make sense. Don’t hate a subject, or you will never be succeed in the subject .And it will be danger when you choose an occupation related to the subject.
Then ,never hate any kinds of jobs. All workers are equal .You will make it if you do it by heart .And what I will choose is to become a doctor .I will study medicine here for 7 years. I think this job is a holy job ,and I really like this subject .I will try my best to work as a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 00fdd03c-274c-384d-8a77-d640b6993ec1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is an extremly important decision during our life.In fact,you can never be more careful to make the final decision.It's sure that you may change your job sometimes.But its necessary for you to have a clear arrangement about your development in the future,for your working field generiously won't be changed.
To choose your occupation,you need to take many factors into consideration.First of all ,interest.As an old saying goes,you can never be good at doing something unless you love it.You should try to get to know what you are really interested in.Secondly,you should consider the future of the occupation which suits your interest.You should be clear about what kind of result you may get finally.Then,you may get to know some detials about your occupation.Could it make you rich and respected?Totally,if you are really interested in an occupation.You shouldn't let those details change your mind.
As a college student,of course I have thought a lot about my possible occupation in my spare time.It was the interest of physics that led me to the Taishan College.Also partly because of my asmiration to those physics masters,not only about their reseach but also their personality and charactor,I choose physics reseacher as my occupation in the future.And I have a developing arrangement about myself and I am working hard to get my goal.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 84adfdb4-d82c-316a-ab2d-85b013960d39> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is one of the most important decision in our life.With one suitable occupation you will live a happy and comfortable life,but if not you will feel not good,and regret for that for a long time.
I think now you will say how can we make a good choice?Ok,when we choose occupation we should concern about many factors,whether you character is suitable for this job,whether you can do well in the work.Diferent people have diferent condition,so they have diferent best choice.It is very important for us to make a right choice according to  our condition.Know your own character and condition better,and you will get a satisfied job.
When talking about job,it's hard to avoid to come to my choice.Personally,i'm a man who like freedom .So i'd like to have a easy work,for example,a program engineer is just all right.Working time is not limited,and i can get a lot fun from it,that is quite a great choice.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4fa1252c-e8c3-3edc-a3bc-e502d2b3c13d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
When it comes to the topic of choosing occupation,there is no doubt that it's one of the most important desions in one's life.The occupation you choose will determine your social position,your contribution and your salary.Besides,it will be along with you almost the whole life.Once you get into a career,hardly will you consider to change because of the large number of difficulities you have to face.
Complex reasons should be considered when choose occupation,including the personality, the fitness with  your major and your interest in it .Also a good job will give you adquate freedom and space to your own thing,,which it's essential for young people. Futhermore,the development in a job also plays an important role in choosing.
I am lucky enough to be admitted to a famous medicine collge with a long history and major in madicine.Considering my interest and major,I want to be a professor in collge ,teaching medicine or histology.I am full of enthusiastic and erengy , I Love to communicate with young people,And I can perfom well to make the class interesting and attractive.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID c01b6dbb-e62e-30cd-bcba-b06ccff0e045> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a collage student,there are much more things we should take into consideration in our daily life. Apart from study,choosing what to be in the future is one of the most important things draw our attention.
However,choosing occupition is not such easy a task that we must consider many aspects.Interests,accepted as the most important one,has an undeniable influence on what we choose. And to be honest,salary is another thing affacts our choices as the only  way to support our family with the higher daily costs taken by rapid ecnonmic development. What's more,working place can also has an positive influence more or less. There are some more aspects that we should consider personally when choosing a job.
As fa as i'm concerned,I'd like to be a doctor as I'm majoring medicine, and to be a doctor to cure people, bringing them happiness,is one of my dreams.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 15ca0c82-3e1e-3057-b5cd-3763aa18efcc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all konw,choosing occupation is one of the most important things in our own life.If we make a correct choose,we
will have a bright future and have a great success.So we should be caution when we choose our occupations.
There are many factors that we should considerate when we choose a occupation.To begin with,the interests of us is very
important.As long as we choose  occupations that we really like,can we put our passion into them.What's more,we should choose
the occupation which is suitable to our subject.Because it is easier to do the things we know about.Equally important,the aim
of work is makeing a living,so choosing a occupation which has higher salary is also very important.Last but not least,the
ideas from parents and friends also can influence us to some extent.
I think I will be a surgeon in the future.For the one thing,I am learning medicine now.It is suitable to be a doctor.And
for another thing,I want to be a surgeon.Because if I am a surgeon,I can help a lot of people.I can care for patient,I can
help them.It is a happy thing,isn't it?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 3a13b8cb-920f-3384-b5b1-1600a816737f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Well,everyone plays his different role in society.The most effective factor for us is own occupation.So choosing occupation
is a very important decision in our life.
As it is so important for us,I thike we should make our choice carefully.We need to think kinds of elements such as the money
that you earn,the time you take.What'more,you must think about prospect of the occupation that you select,the problem of care parents
.While,the most important is your dream,you should try to choose the occupation that you dream of.
Not everyone can select occupation that they love.While,I think I make it.I choosed to be a medical sudent.So,I will become a
doctor in the future.Doctor is a honourable job that i dream of.Whaterver difficuties come,I would stick to it with my determination.
Because it's my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 066dc8c6-07ae-3065-b2a1-6b0632f6dc0a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's so essential for people to choose occupation.In addion,whether you choose a ideal occupation is so momentous.
And what should we think of? Firstly,it is  basal for you to know what you love.If you choose an occupation which you
love,not only can you throw yourself to the occupation,but also you can be easier to succeed. And then,what is important
is the future of the occupation.If the occupation is populor in recent years and it will become out in two years,you are
better not to choose it.What's more,whether you can make a living can influence your choice.If you can't get money,it will
ombat your self-confidence and it is bad for you.
As far as I'm concerned,I will choose a job which I love and I can  develop myself in even though I can get less money.
Beacuse I can put my shoulder to the work and I can succeed only in the way.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 08b4eeaf-24a8-3e24-ade2-4d9c049bd734> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing a occupation is a very important thing that concerning your whole life.That's to
say,it's  vital for us all to choose a proper occupation with full considerations.
when we choosing occupation, our strengths, weakness and interests must be involved. We
should analyze what kind of job we can undertake and accomplish well. We can take our major
in college into account firstly. I think most of us will be confident when we do the job we
are familiar with. We learnt a lot of knowledges on our majors, we can deal with it easily.
In addition, we'd better avoid to do the job on the field that we are weak in, we may lost
our confidence and our leaders' belif on us. What's more, we should consider our interests,
if you do the things you like, you will enjoy your work and perform well. Otherwise, you may
be disgusted especially when you get a complex and disturbing task.
As far as I'm concerned, to become a doctor will be my best choice. I major in clinical
medicine in college and I'm convinced I can be a good doctor.I dream of saving  people who
suffer bad diseases and great pain. I want to do something meaningful for the human beings.
I know I will meet a lot of challenges and failures but I'll never give up.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ec87e985-eecf-318c-b073-e25e62a47d6f> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays it is very hard to find a job.There are many people who have a job which do not use what they learn in the university.so,choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in one's life.
There are many things should be considered when one chooses occupation.firstly, if the job that you find use things you learn before? If not,you'd better change your choice.The next thing you have to consider is salary.you should have a job to earn your life.what's more,there are many other things you should consider such as if it is dangerous,or if you will be away with your family.
As far as I am concerned,if possible,I want to find a job in the chemistry lab because my major in university is chemistry,though it is a bit of dangerous and not very good for one's health.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2a4ce082-d58c-35ab-bc23-97e02726591a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are many important decision which can decide our future.Choosing occupation is one of these.If we can choose a job which is suitable,we will have a happier life.On the contrary,
if we make a casual decision,we will regret the choice when we meet some problem at work.But it will late.
There are many factors we must think about when we choose our occupation.Firstly,we must choose a occupation which we are interested in.If we don not have any interest about the job,we can not
do it very well.What`s worse,we may even be tired of this job and feel unhappy all the day.Secondly,choose a occupation which adapt to your professional knowledge.A job which you are
interested in but bryound your ability can also make feel very difficulty to do it.If you know nothing about it,it is impossible to keep your position for a long time.Last but not the
lsast,the occupation you choose should give you enough money which can afford your life.If you can not live,you can not work.
I want to be a doctor in the future.You know,I major in medicine in the college.It is means that I prossess the professional knowledge,so I can do my work well.What more,when I was young,I
dreamed that I can be a doctor in the future.That is my dream,to treat and cure the patients.So I think the doctor is the best occupation for me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 639b31c6-2736-322e-8e02-40222285a34d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know ,it's an essencial decision to choose a career.And it really
make sense in our whole life .
When it comes to how to choose one's career,we
should consider variety of reasons.Firstly,what we should think about is our
interest.Doing what you are fond of is a pleasant thing.Secondly,we should
make clear how much monney we look forward to earning every month in order
to support our families.Last but not least ,we should know our advantages.
Only by knowing what we are good at can we make the best use of our strong
points.And the we can do the job effciently
After thinking over all these reasons above,I am finally determined to
choose the dentist as my future career.Because I am interested in it .And
I have onfidence that I will do well in it as my science subjects is not
o bad.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8f29e7c4-df06-3311-8668-33a54804eea2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
NOw there is a serious problem about how to choose occupation.Choosing occupation is very importion for our future.So we must pay more attention to choose a really suitable occupation for us.In terms to this problem,diffent people have different idears.
Many conditions will influence our choice about how to choose occupation.On the one hand,some people choose their occupation in order to earn more money.Sometimes they don't really like the occupation which they choose.What's more,parents' opinions have a great influence inour choice.Parents all want us to own a decent job.Then we don't need to pay too much attention to make a living.Maybe their care will make us feel the life  boring.On the other hand,the other people could make their own decision.They can choose the occupation which they are interested in.Though the job is hard and disreputable.but they can try their best to do the occupation.As the saying goes, three hundred and sixty rows, profession.By their hard working,They can also get proud achievements.
As far as I'm concerned,We need to consider many factors synthetically. Choosing occupation is both according to our parents' suggestions and our interests. So obtain satisfy both sides effect.Then our choosed occupation will become more meaningful.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 144e1ffb-8291-34f1-99e3-f9a4447ae48a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a vital decision in our life,which can probably have a crucial influence in our destiny.
While choosing our job,we have to take many factors into consideration.As far as I am concerned,interest is the most
essential factor.I form the idea that interst will not only lead us to make a deeper investigation in something but also
provoke some unfailing perseverance.Imagine if everyone takes no interest in their job,our world could be less colorful without
lots of brilliant  innovations.So follow your interest!In addition,there is no escaping fact that salary and prospect is another
crucial factor,which can affect your quality of your life to a large extent.
My option is to be doctor.As for me,my aspiration is to save many people's life and get rid of pain and sufferings from this
world.Meanwhile,as we all know doctor enjoys a high level of reputation and social level in society.Absolutely,I am really proud
to be a doctor,who will bring some new changes to this field.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 734a9fb3-6d5d-3b3a-bb57-f7aa7aa09fbc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In our sociaty, each people has their own occupation.Most people will spend their all life to take their occupations.So choosing occupation becomes a big desision in our life.As the saying goes, "Men don't choosing wrong occupation, women don't marry wrong husband".Therefore a good occupation is very important.Then how can we choose occupation which is suited for us? I think we must think many factors.First, the interest is very necessary. Only we have interest in our occupation, we can do their better.The second factor may be the ability we have.Sometimes a little people can't know their abilities, and they can only accomplish nothing finally.Next,we also need think about the real problem, such as the money, the fame.
At last, my choice is to be a physics professor because I love physics, and I hope I can make the contribution to our motherland.I think I can try my best to come it ture.And I believe I can finish it well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d643fb57-d8a8-371b-af18-971300f46e66> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,Occupation is very important for us to live by ourselves.Just for that,choosing occupation play a important role in our life rode,so that,chossing occupation
is a great decision for life.Only we choose a correct occupation for us can we have chance to achieve our dreams.
Of course,chossing a correct occupation is not a easy thing.We should consider many factors about that occupation.Firstly,we should learn if the occupation is suitable for us.
At the same time,we should know if we are interested in the occupatiom.Secondly,We also need to support our family.So we should consider the salary.Thirdly,we maybe consider if
the occupation has the space that we can improve.In my opinion,Choosing occupation should depend on these factors.
When it come to me,I think I will choose doctor.All that we know is that doctor is a very important occupation for socity.In addition,I major in doctor in college.Of course,
the most important factor is that I am very fond of doctor.Doctor can help everyone who needs help.And I am willing to help others.So I will choose doctor as my occupation.I also
take proud of becoming a doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a2d3cb12-c227-3dbc-b1aa-c822090e97ec> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation  in our life is a most important decision.  First, a good choice can give you a better future and development.  Next, the carrer that is suitable for you could determine the length of the way on which  you can walk for.  Last, it have a good or bad effect on all aspects in our life.
There are many factors that we should consider about for choosing occupation. In the process, we should think of that whether we are interested in the carrer that we will choose.  We would keep active working enthusiasm  on working if we are keen on it.  Meanwhile,  what I majored in college is for the occupation or not.  It will decide how much
grade you will gain in working.  Finally, we should think about all other kinds of factors in your life.
Now, I am a medical student in Shandong  University.  In future , I want to be a good doctor because I had the dreme in my childhood.  I want to drive the suffering of patients and give them a healthy life.  My mother is weak, so if I will be a doctor, I will make her more strong.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d53e3697-eb9e-39f6-94fe-1fc4ab64aa43> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is a very important decision in one's life time. A success career depends on the decision we made today. As an old saying goes, 'a good beginning is half of success'. So we should think through when we choose our occupation.
We all agree that interest is the most important factor because one can only be happy when he is doing what he likes. There is another reason for why we should choose what we like. The reason is that when we do what we like, our effficence is high and we can do more work in a certain time. We should also note that salary is another important factor because we need enough money to lead a satisfied life. There are also many oher factors like parents' advice and the need of the society. In a word, we should take it seriously and try to take everything into consideration so as to make a proper decision.
In my case, I would like to be a scientist. First, this is where my interest lies and I have dreamt of it when I was a little child. Second, being a scientist will lead a simple life and I do not need to worry about my everyday outcome. Third, our country is developing and need more scientist to make our country develops faster. So, from the three points above I would like to be a scientist in the future.
So, what would you like to do or what your occupation choice in the future?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f5586862-8d33-3787-92f4-f280692362bc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is quite  important for us among major decisions in our life.Since a good job means
a good life.Only when you choose right occupation,can you engage yourself happily in it.
When it comes to choosing occupation,there are many aspects which we should take into consideration.First,we'd
better know what we are really intersted in and determine our occupation dimention.Second,we should measure those major
factors while choosing our career,for example,we can collect as much information as possible about the prospects of
the kind of job you are going to take up.What's more,we can turn to experienced people for some advice on how to
select a satisfying occupation.Last but not least,we should not lose heart when we cannot pursue our ideal occupation
right now because we still have opportunities to achieve this goal in future.
I believe we can make it as long as we have a suitable attitude towards selecting occupation.As a college student,I now
study hard to find my own occupation after graduating.I major in clinical medicine and myideal occupation is to relief
patients from pain.I will keep on pursuing my aim and follow suitable rules to try my best to be an angel in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 48edbd54-8b60-37a0-b9e9-902321b9c156> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Today there are many kinds of occupations in our daily life. Choosing occupation is important to everyone. The kind of
occupation you take determins how pleasure your future life will be.
Choosing occupation is not as easy as eating,it should take many kinds of facters in consideration.For example,the place
you will work should not be far from the place you live.The payment shoud be resonable.The company you want work should be
excelant. The more victors youconside, the more fluncy life you will get.
And I want to be a Doctor.That's why I come here to study medicine.And I think being a doctor is good to me and
my parents.A doctor can save many people's life and can fight against diseases.I think I can be a good doctor in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 30d759fc-6313-3076-93f2-2e1451b877ba> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is regarded as one of the most important decisions that can decide one's fortune and life.Choosing a proper occupation means a good start,which is the half of success.As a result,it is of great importance to balance all kinds of factors and think twice before making the decision.
First,interest is the best teacher.Sometimes,the occupation you choose may take your whole life.In this case,interest is vital.Only people with interest in his career have enough passion to devote his whole life and energy to career. What's more,people with interest can work efficiently and do a better job than others.But make sure your interest is not an impulse.
Second,in my opinion,the occupation must be practical.Dream is always good,but the reality is cruel.In the real world,occupation is not always equal to dream.We had better pay attention to the reality.
Last but not least,know your character and advantages well.As the old saying goes"Everyone has the opportunity to be a genius if he chooses proper work".Do what you are good at,you are more likely to succeed.
As for me,I chose to be a doctor although I know the road is hard and difficult.When I was young,I was always dreaming of being a great doctor.All my friend told me it would be a hard job.I once hestitated,but Finally I made up my mind.I am sure I can achieve my dream one day.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7537d96d-70e5-3372-be85-d4b7f56baae8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are many different Occupation in the word. As students in a university, we can choose our Occupation in the future. But we should think about it before graduating because choosing occupation is so impoetant that we should make the decision carefully.
When we choose our occupation, there are many feature we should consider such as our hobby, our family and what we learned in our university. So choosing occupation isn't an easy thing as we think and it may make a difference in you life.
As for me, after thinking about it for a year, I decided to be a doctor. It seems that I nearly have no choise to choose other occupations because that I major in medicine in my university and I have to study it for at least 5 years. Besides Doctor is a good occupation and I can get what I want as a doctor. So I will learn medicine hard and become a good doctor in the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ac2881e0-6e4b-37ab-8ccf-37846d65d40b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is an rather important desicion during our whole life to choose a suitable job.
Because working is an important part in our life.Choosing the proper occupation can help us
enjoy more pleasure in our life .We will also be in good spirits every day.
We must consider various things when making this desicion. I want to tell you my ways to choose an ideal jobs.
I think that the most important thing you should consider is that what you are really interested
in. There is a saying going that interest is the best teacher for us ,which means that you can do
the thing best you are interested in.I am interested in medical science so I consider to choose to be
a doctor.
Then you should consider you characters. For instance,I am patient and like helping others.
So being a doctor may be a perfect choice for me. If you are active and have the ability
of leadership, I think you can become an excellent manager or something like that.
The last one you should consider is the occupation itself.You must consider some practical things because you live in the reality and have to earn a living. If it is very
hard for you to support your family on you wage, you have to think about how to choose
a suitable occuption seriously.
Choosing suitable occupation is a tough work.I Choose to de a doctor which I think
is the ideal occupation for myself.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 52337cd4-2dd9-3084-851d-0e8658ad0c3a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know, it is one of the most important decisions for every one to choose
occupation.If you choose the right one,your life would go though very well.And
you may succeed easily.However,if you choose the wrong one,your life would be
hard and you would be not happy.you can imagine that you are making decision for
the rest of your life when you choose a job.So choosing a grest job is important.
When you choose occupation,you should take all the things into consideration.
First of all, you should choose a job that you really love.Then,I think you
should think about you education so that you can choose a job which is suitable
for you.What's more,every wants to choose a job with high salary,so you should
take this into consideration.Last but not least important,I think you should think more
about your future,when you should realise the importance of a good job.
In my opinion,I think I will be a mathematical researcher.Firstly,my major is
mathematics. And I want to say that I love mathematics and I want to do this.I
think mathematics is a important subject in this world,and it is meaningful for
us to do research in this subject.Finally,being a famous mathematics scientist
is my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 721f63db-f587-3bc6-a398-fe94029c6841> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in our life. It will influence our family and future. Many people
lead a hard life due to choosing occupation which is not fit in them. So we are supposed to choose occupation
carefully.
When choosing occupation we should think about many things. To begin with, we should care about whether you
like what you choose. If you do not like the job, you will feel unhappy when you work. Then money is an important
matter which you should think about. the more money you earn, the more energy you will have. Last but not the least,
health is essential. when choosing a job you also should think more about it. If you do not have a healthy body,
you cannot work lastingly.
according to my interest, I am willing to choose to be a doctor. I want to save more and more people who suffer
a disease. I will work hard and pay more attention to what I should learn. In a word, I believe I can become a
good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID db768262-af98-35c1-a6bf-b55917963e21> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is important to choose occupation,as a result,we must treat it serious.After education,it's time to choose occupation,no matter how unwilling we are,we have no choice.
there are severl reasons,above all,we need money by working,then,it's a way to achieve success.In a word ,choosing occupation is a important decssion.
There are quantities of statement of occupation we must think about.First of all,interest is the main statement.Without interest,we would live with a boring job for all life.
How can you image what life it is. Moreover,environment is a necessary statement,beautiful surrounding make us healthy,not only body but also mental.Last but not the least,we
couldn't deny that money is a necessary statement,without  money ,we couldn't live up.In all,we must think about any statement when choosing occupation.
As far as I'm concerned,occupation should give us basic need;then,it should provide us stage to get more success.So my choice is doctor,not only I can get high income,but also
I can give more to world.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 75446716-335b-33bf-b63c-cf0168f4aeb5> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is of great importance for us. We are living in a society, which need people to produce something valuable and useful. Therefore, we need a lot of jobs, so we can achieve something, and we can prove our values. In doing so, our lives have significance and we will not regret when we become old.
However, nowadays, we have plenty of choices of our occupation because there are so many kinds of jobs. Thus we must consider many factors when we choose our occupation. First,I think we should choose a job we like and we really want to do. Second, we should take our profession we study into consideration. Anywang, we should not waste it. Third, I think it is important to refer to your family and friends's opinions. However, they will support you all the time, I think. What's more, there are many other factors you are supposed to take into consideration, like your home, your wife or husband.
As for me, my choice is to become a doctor. Actually, when I was a child, to be a doctor is my dream, which is and will be my dream no matter now or in the future. Here are my reasons if I have to say. In my mind, doctor is a good occupation, which is respected amoung people, although there are still many problems and conflicts between doctors and patients. Besides, I like to help others, which can always give me lots of pleasure and satisfactory. A doctor is saving people's lives and ease their pains. A doctor is comforting people with diseases. In my heart, doctors are angles who love and help people. They are kind, reliable, trustworthy. So, I choose my occupation as a doctor, a kind doctor , a good doctor. Though, to be a doctor is not a easy thing like to be a child. I need a lot of knoeledge about my profession. I have to study all the time no matter how old I am. However ,practice is the most important and difficult.But , I will not give up.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d2572f87-5073-34d3-b6a6-6ded4775a87a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
We will meet many important decesions in whole life. Choosing an occupation is one. After we had finished our examination of high school. We began to choose our occupation. And our families and teachers gave us advice.
We should consider about many sides. For example, we should think about our future, our hobbies, our family and aslo the job.A lthough it is hard to choose a perfect one, everyone should give an answer.
After thinking about all of these,I  chose to be a doctor. I like to be a doctor, and I will be proud to be a doctor. And mu families also support me. As far as I considered,t his would be a good choise. I will work hard to be a good docter and return my hard work to the society.
And I hope that I can be succeed to do this job. I will be responsible to my pacients. I think strongly that my choice is right.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID f7bd7211-7e7d-3826-84c4-64aeeacd6c2b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
After graduation,most of our daytime will be occupied by work.Therefore,choosing occupation is an important decision in our life.The choice will actually make an influnce on our life.We ought to pay much attention to the choice.However,how to choose a job becomes a problem that we must be faced with.
A number of facts should be under consideration before we make choices.First of all,interest must be considered.If you are bored with the job,there is no possibility that you will do it well.And you won't enjoy yourselves.Besides,you should take your ability into consideration.Don't do what is beyond your ability.What's more,the wages is very important.We need to support our families by our wages.Actually,we rely on the job in order to live.It's certain that there are many more facts.In a word,think twice before choice.
I am going to be a dentist,which is my choice.To be a doctor is a pride and it means that i have to take on more duties.The health of our mouth is closed to our life.This area has just developed a little in our country.So i have a lot to do and explore.I think i will do something good to my patients.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d7081ea0-b351-3f19-a36b-03c1d008e701> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all known，choosing occupation is an important thing in our life。We always
made this decision after thinking for a long time 。Mybe somebady will find some
datas on the internet or asks to his teachers or frients for some help。
From my perspective，salary is the most paramount，because，an appropriate salary
can make me achieve my dream，such as I can buy a big house for my parents，and buy a
car which will  help me save more time and make my work conwenient。Besides that I
have enough money to do everthing that I want to do。On the other hand ，in my opinion ，
the scale of the company is also significant，a big company must can provide more chances。
As a student studying medicine，I want to become a doctor working in a hospital belong
to nation。I believe I will be a excellent doctor who can help people to be more health。

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 643cbd03-07e9-3dc0-9c85-5607d3395ddd> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is important for us to choose occupation,especially for  college student.However,
we can not choose  vocation  that  our favorite sometimes,for example,if we do not have
enough money,we will not opt profession that need  a great deal of money.So we have to
consider a number of problems about occupation.
As is known to us,occupation which is chosen may  decide our future life,we must conscientiously
consider our vocation.What is more,we seriously look for our interest,at the same time,we also
pay attition to ourselives prerequisite.
As far as I am concerned,my occupation that I will work is doctor,I espect to help people
who suffer ache.I will shudy hard and never give up .Friends ,let us struggle together.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 571f4b1b-d452-3fcb-889d-91e5787920f4> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important thing for everyone in the world. As a human, we have to study hard and practise our professional skills to adapt ourselves to the society. Because we all need to choose our occupation and make a living.
I believe that choosing occupation is one of the most significant determination in our lives. In fact, when we choose our university and specialized subject, we are choosing occupation in the future. However, we have to think about a lot of facters when we choose occupation. On one hand, the income of an occupation is very important. What we can't deny is that we need to make money and support our family by doing our jobs. On the other hand, our hobbies and the occupation itself are also of great significance. As we all know, the best job is one which we enjoy ourselves, help others and make enough money at the same time while we are doing.
In my opinion, being a doctor is the best choice for me. Firstly, I love being a doctor and saving others or making others feel better when there is something wrong with them. Secondly, doctor is a kind of stable and keeping studying job, I love a job like this. So I chose to be a medical student and I wouldn't regret my decision forever.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 6572f4fd-cd20-36e3-976e-92299148e01b> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occuoation is a large decision adouot the whole life of everybody,for it can affect if you enjoy your job even your life and it also can influent what others think adout you .
When you choose your occupation,you should think it over to check on it is a true dicision,with considering every partings .In my view ,first otf all ,you should think it completely while you like that job,which will dicise whether you will enjoy your job and have a good mind everyday in the future.Then consider whether your family will agree with your dicision .Family is important for everyone and their views is also important for you and it also may help you.What's more ,consider if the occupation will complish your dreams or if it can make you enjoy the job quietly,and so on.
Thinking it over and over ,I made the strict decision to study my major and become a dentist in the future .D uring the choosing occupation ,I considered a large number of the partings , take many advisors which were put up by my family and friends,and also think about my views.
In a word,please be strict about choosing occupation.And you will have a prefect future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2acc1d1d-798d-371f-ae26-dc3dbc805997> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In our life, we will have many chances to choose, which can have a big
influence on our whole life, and choosing occupation is the most vital one,
for it determine the track of our life.
Now that choosing occupation is so critical, we should be careful and cautious
when we choose our occupations to aviod change our jobs in 30s or 40s, resulting
in wasting our time, or even life.
Interest is the first thing you are supposed to consider when you choose your
occupation. One can enjoy his life and make great achievement, if he choose his
job in terms of his interest. However, if not, one would feel spend a day that
semms a year. You should also think about the future of the Occupation, because
this is related with your fortune, affecting your living standard. In addition,
you should be conscious of yourself before you make the decision.
My major is medicine, so I will be a doctor one day in the future. The reason
why I choose doctor, which I think is saint and respectful, as my occupation is
that I want to help human beings get rid of disease and pains. And I am also
influenced by my family, in which most members are doctors, and they impressed
upon me that the greatest thing in the world is seeing your patience recover.
I hope everyone will make a correct decision to choose a suitable occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID cb3e4ec9-19bb-3723-bc2c-b8c7e445b292> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know,we have studied for about 12years in order to find a good
job after we graduated.However, choosing occupation play an important role
before we go to work.Here are some factors as follow.
There are lots of factors which mislead us.Firstly,we should know
wheather you like it.We must know if we choose one we will do it untill
we die.So,we should understand what you are interested in and it can help
us to achieve our dreams . I think this is the valuable of yourself.Secondly,the
wages is also impoetant.We all don't want to gain less wages than others.
Many people want to have more money and work relaxed.A good company
could give us great .However,they must be choosing geed person,so we
should let us become stronger and styonger.Thirdly,a pleasant place can make
you have a good attitude and you will be happy.Finally,friends are the best
ingredient in our life.The work place should have frienfly person to make friends
with them.
As far as i am concerned,the best choosing for me is to be a dentist.I will
meet my friends there and I think it may as well let me form a quiet character.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 50c1e887-24af-3eab-b2f5-da7da0763389> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There are some important steps in our lives.The born, the college and the marriag.As far as I am concerned,choosing occupation is the most significant matter.
Various factors are supposed to be taken into account when you want to find an approciate job after graduating from college.First of all,you need to think over that what is your favorite thing.Only when you do something you are fond of,will you try your best to do it and spare no space to make it perfect. In addition,the distance between you home and your workplace is also a big problem.I bet that nobody want to get up early and spend severl hours on the way to work.It is too expensive for us to afford the fares of holding a car or taking a taxi.Last but not least,your major in college depends on your occupation.We spend four years or longer studying our major classes.We do not want it in vain.Most students put their major into the first place when they choose theis occupations.For instance,if you study English,you will be a teacher.If you major in economy,you will consider bank as your workplace.
As I major in medicine,my occupation choosing is to be a doctor.I will work in hospital and cure the patients one day.I know it is a tough way to be an excellent doctor.But it is my dream job. I will work hard and learn more to improve myself.Only in this way can I achieve my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e7615c93-0bb8-3d50-8420-fc07d086ea73> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
For everyone living in this world, choosing occupation is a significant thing through his whole life. As an old saying says, if you choose a right occupation you will be happy during the day, if you choose a right lover you will be happy during the night.
In modern society, choosing an occupation depends on many factors, if someone is ready to choose his or hers occupation, he or she needs to consider many things. The first thing he considers often is whether this job is his cup of tea, or he is ready to do that job. And another important factor he may consider is money, though you can't buy everything with money, you will suffer a lot if you live without it. So there are many important factors for a man to think about when he is facing occupation choosing.
As for myself, I'm a student in university majoring in medicine, so this maybe means that there are less things for me to think about when I choosing a job. I used to read a result of a research on the newspaper saying that a large percentage of medicial school students choose to work in hospital after finish their study. For me, being a doctor may be a choice which suits me well, moreover, it is my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a9bcf7fc-40aa-3688-97c5-522ca055f3ef> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know, all the education we have are the preparation to work. Work is one of the most important thing
in our life. We need work to earn money and meet our value. So it is an important decision to choose our
occupation.
To choose an occupation which is really suits you, you need to consider many espects. Such as what are your
interested in, how much money do you what to earn, how much spare time do you want. If one can do what he like
as his job, he must be a quite happy man. If you want many long holidays, do nt choose the occupations which
are pretty busy. If you want to live a rich life, remember to choose some occupation that earn much. Each
person has thire own oppinion towards this item.
As for me, my choise is that I will be a doctor in the future. Because I am intrested in biology and willing
to help others to be healthy. And to be a doctor is well-paid so I can support myself and make my family living
a good life. Though I will be busy, I won't complain about it for I will love my occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2c597fcf-270d-3e15-872c-5e7f65997812> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is where we work, where we contribute to our society. So choosing a good occupation is an important decision of our lives. But how to choose a good job?  The following is the tips.
First, you should consider where you are interested in. Only you love your occupation can you do your best and dedicate willingly. And you can come up with many new ideas for your jobs. Then, you must take many specific things into consideration, such as where you would like to live, how much you would have to earn, your health and habits. Because your occupation not only influence yourself but also your family and society. You must be responsible to them.  At last but not the least, what occupation you choose cannot be illegal.  No matter your occupation is upper or lower, you should love your job and be immersed in it.
As I am learning medical knowledge, my occupation may be sure. It is to be a doctor. I think I suit for this job. I am compassionate and want to help people who are injured. And my parents really support me to choose this occupation because they think it is a good job. I admit that to be a doctor is very busy and tired. But I know every job is not easy and also needs patience. In a word, I love my future occupation.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 353909f6-047b-384a-a87f-e39504750f25> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,it is very important for us to choose occupation which have great influntion
on our future life.If you can choose an adequate occupation and then you will have a better
life than they others who have not choosen an adequate occupation.Thus we must pay more
attation on choosing our occupation.However,there are many aspects that we must turn over
when we want to choose our own occupatoin.For example,the payment,your intrests,where the
company located in and so on.
Facing to these different aspects,I take it that what have the most influnce on me is that
if I have interests on it.No matter how much the payments is,I will choose the occupation if
I am interested in it.I believe that if I pay more attention on the job,I will make a better
life.As the proverb goes,360 the line do the top line.I think if I can work hard,I will be
success.
In conclusion,we must choose our own occupation carefully and then try our best to do the
job well.you will be success.Please remember the proverb that where there is a will, there is
a way.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 73ba62e5-1a9c-3b43-b021-43f6d66ed3b6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we know, everyone should have occupation to enrich his or her life. And if the occupation is suitable, it will be of great benefit. So choosing occupation is very important in one's life.
When you are choosing occupation, you shuold think much about it. At first, when you are working, you should make use of your knowledge. So you should choose a job which is relevant to your subject in your school. Besides, if you are interested in a job, you can also try it. Then you can think about other things, such as the salary, the working time, the advice from other people and so on.
As for me, I major in computer technology and I am interested in the computer. So I will choose occupation about computer without any hesitation. And by now I will study hard to make use of my knowledge in the future!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a3ea2239-7621-320d-8e29-4eb540df33c8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is important for everyone without any doubt.When we talk about things about our future life,occupation is a forever topic.It is no wonder for this phenomenon,owing to choosing occuppation is one of the most significant decisions in our life.
So,we manage to consider all the aspects making our decision more meaningful.In my own opinion the basic point is whether we like this caree or not.Apparently,no one can work sparing no efforts for his job except he loves the job from bottom of his heart.Andalso,income,our parents'suggestions,the future and many other fectors can have influnce on our decision.Sometimes we should admit that we are live in a real complex society,thus,we can not avoid think about the meterial things like money and house.
When it comes to me,in my personal perspective,I would choose doctor,the only caree I would like to devote myself to.Here come several reasons.Doctor is the occupation I expect when I was in primary school,for I long for helping those people who suffer from diseases recover.Then,because my mother was weak and sometimes was sick,I am convinced that I can relief her after I graduate from the medical school.Last,doctor is actually a holy caree and is respected by public.Perhaps it is steady compared with economy or some other subjects.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 340d1a53-73f1-3322-ab8a-3f3dab9aa233> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is an important decision in everyone's life when it comes to choose occupation for ourselves. As we all know, what you will do relate to your happiness
in the futrue. There are many things that we should consider seriously. Such as what is your favorite job, where are you prefer to work in, and
how long do you prefer to work on everyday.
In my mind's eyes, my choose is to be a doctor. because it is my dream since I was a litter girl, I like the clothes wear in doctors and
I think they are so amazing that they can kill the pain of people who sufffer from disease.
Altought study medince is not an easy thing, but I will try my best and devote myself to it. I hope I can became a great doctor one day.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a6e48e69-c36a-338b-b5d7-2437465abf95> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is a lot of crucial choices in our lives, one of which is choosing occupation, for it occupies more than half of our whole life time.
To make this choice, we should be cautious and turn over all kinds of factors. First of all is our own interests. As an old saying goes, interests is one's best teacher. If you love your occupation, you will do it well, and whatever hardships there is, you will have enough courage to overcome. Secondly, some relevant professional skills are of the essential. If interest is just like your brain, then without any relevant professional skills you will only be a man without arms. Thirdly, the wage should also be considered, because you will have a big family, which contains your parents, your husband or wife and a child. Your wage should be more than enough to cover the payment of family.
I want to be a doctor after university. With my medicine knowledge learned in the university and strong will of saving people's lives, I think it will be roses all the way.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1b50a2fb-0895-3a38-b258-b1fef3a64982> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Everyone faces the problem of choosing an occupation after graduation from college or university, which was an important decision in our life. Because of its importance,
choosing an occupation becomes more difficult. A proper Occupation can make people full of energy and enjoy his life.What's more, they may have an easy access to success. On the
contrary, if you don't make a right decision on choosing an occupation, you may lose heart to put your full energy to your work. As a result, your life will become very boring.
In order to make a wiser choice, two important things should be taken into consideration. One is the interest, the other, the demands of people and society. If we can
choosing an occupation which meets these two aspects, I think we really make a good choice. However, if we can't satisfy them at the same time, as far as I am concerned, we
should have to choose the latter. People's demands are more important than individual's. Nobody can make a living without considering the demands of people and society.
In regard to my choice in the future, I will choose to be a doctor. My major is medicine, besides, I really like to help people who are in danger. Last,but not the least,
doctor is a good occupation which meets the demands of people and society. So I think I really make a right decision.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4f31852a-2dd2-3907-8fd9-a59462f176c6> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a important decision for people to make.In the recent
years,more and more people find that it is more difficult to find a content job.
So Choosing occupation is becoming a question for many people.
Selection of occupation  must take into account various factors.Firstly,we should
choose the occupation according to what we major in during the university time.Next,
we can choose the occupation which we are interested in,after all interest is the
best teacher.What's more,we need to considerof the salary and bonus that the firm
can give.
As far as i'm concerned,i want to choose the occupation according to my specialized
subject,because my specialized subject is what i am interested in.Becoming a doctor
is my dream for a long time,so i will choose to become a doctor as my occupation in
the future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 170f33ed-7aa4-3c61-b8ec-97d2212eebe8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's vital important for us to choose occupation in our life.The occupation you choose can make a big difference on your following life.If you can pick up a job which can capture your heart and it's more possible for you to achieve your ambition.However,if you just pick up one casually and the job isn't suitable for you and you don't like from the bottom of your heart.It's obvious for you that you won't make big achievement.Since the occupation choosing is so important,how can we make a right decision when we should make one?
We all know that before we choose a occupation we have to count in plenty of elements,such as the income,the future of the job,the knowledge we can get from the job.And the most important one is that whether you are interested in the career that you are giong to take up.
As for my choice,I picked up medicine as my major when I enter college.It's obvious to know that I plan to work as a doctor in the future.How do I make such a decision?
I think it is the goal that grows from the bottom of my heart.I do think it's great job which is full of hardness and difficulties.But the feeling of helping others to recover from illness is pretty good.My heart about medicine will go on.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a12b4a64-fe89-33fa-8db0-59367cdae839> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Chossing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our life. We
have to pay enough attention to it. It may decide on what kind of life you live
all of your life. Sometimes it also seems most difficult for us to determine to
make a best choise.
No matter who you are, before you make a decision, you must think over many
things, for example, what your interets are, what kind of people you want to be
in the future, your relatives' means and so on. Sometimes we will make a choise
that we dislike, but it maybe the best. In a way, choosing occupation is harder
and more important. Because most people have no second choise. Once you start,
you don't want to change.
Take me for example, I graduated from high school in 2011. Now I take
professional lessons and I may become a doctor in a day. But it is the decision
of my paterents.I dislike the occupation.Although I have to study it now. I
prefer to work as a business woman. So if I are not able to like to be a doctor
at last,I will give up and do the job I am willing to work in. It may be not the
best, but it is the real occupation I enjoy.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID e1971a02-ceb4-3487-8926-a3dbf01cf275> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays，we are faced with a varity of choices all the time.Such as schools,clothes,friends,and the rest.Besides,choosing occupation is an essential decision in everyone's life.Occupation is a thing that we may do all our life.So we must be careful enough to choose a career which we really love,only by doing this can we be happy and content when at work.
Just because of the importance of occupation,it allows hardly mistakes.We need to take all factors into consideration.First of all,we should decide which area we want to do at the base of what we have learned.And of course,if you don't want to do what you have learned in the university,you can choose one you are interested in. After that we need to search various information concerning the occupation and choose one city where we want to stay.At the last,what we need to do is to take part in the meeting that eventually decide whether we can be employed.
As for me,my profession is mouth which means i shall be a dentist in the future to some degree.And because i like it ,i think i will a dentist without doubt.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID edcf1aca-ba9f-301c-8d7c-4fc0ed382dd1> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It is known to us all that occupation is one of the most fundamental parts of someone's life. As a result, choosing occupation should be an important decision after deeply thinking, which would make various sense to our future's life.
Concerning about the importance of choosing occupation, as  persons who would face the challenge,  we ought to think about all kinds of factors. In my point of view, hobby is the most important. One persons can make success only when he does the job he likes. Certainly,
there is no denying that income, working environment and so on are also should be thought of.
After concerning about all the factors above , I have make my decison about my occupation.
I would like to become a scientist for my deeply love of science. Only in the way  of discovering science, can I feel sastisfied and happy. I will work as hard as I can to make my dream come true and prove that my decision is correct.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 156f208a-58d5-323c-8132-2813a5091f06> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It's very important for you to choose your job in the future.It might be bad if you choose a job that doesn't fit you.
But not all people know how to choose a good job.In their mind,The more money they get,the better their job will be.But when they start to work,they will find that that job might be bad for them.To choose a good job,you must think of all about the job.
In my mind,I think the good job is that you meet a good leader.If the leader is bad,it will a be bad job even if others is the best.The nest is that the job must need what you learn.You might feel bad if you don't know how to finish your job.The partner is very important to a job too.
What's more,the development,the environment and the time you need to work are also important for a job.When you choose you job you must think of all of the job.There is not the perfect job in the world.What we could do is choose the job that fit us best.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 0d5960ad-3adc-3550-8660-843c31d89bf2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a colleg student,I must have a job to make a living after graduating from university.
Choose occupation properly is very important to a person,because it may decide a person's
life all the time.
In my opinion,chooseing occupation is associated with many things.First ,it may be decidede
by our mayjors.This is obvious,though it mybe different somethimes.Second,it may be associated
with our hobbies.If you like a job very much,it is possible to make a great success after your
hard work.Only we love it,we can do it well not just finish it.Besides,we should consider the
salary of the job.This should be necessary.
I think I will choose doctor as my occupation,because my major is about medical .Besides,
doctor is an honor job which is very uesful to society.I also think a doctor must have a well
body.He or she must be very healthy if he or she is a doctor.This is a reason why I want to be
a doctor.My parents and my grandpaents also want me to be a doctor,so I can look after them
when they are ill.
That is all I want to say.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 56787e6d-44ac-3613-bd10-62e5d6873c1e> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Having passed the college entrance examination, we, the freshmen, are confronted with
another vital choice in life, and that is choosing occupation.
There is a phenomenon in rencent years that college graduates lay high expects and
commands on their future job. However, as a consequence, they are always feeling unsatisfied.
Therefore, we should pay much attention on occupation choise.
When choosing occupation, numerous conditions are bound to be under the consideration.First,
your major. Whatever you will undertake, you had better fllow what you are good at.Second,
your interest.Only you work in the atmosphere of passion could you release all your potential
efforts.At last, your character and ability. Whether you are a person loving stability or
adventure, whether you are a leader or a practicer, these inside personalities are what
you should never ignore.
From my point of view, since I am one of the medicine science students , I am intent to
be a doctor. Using my knowledge assembling rich experience, developing great creation,I
would like to be my patients helping angel.
In a word, be cautious to choose occupation. After all, a happy job can lead you to a happy life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID dc8b5309-6060-3d8a-a9ca-133c440c7ad9> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is a very important decision for everyone in his life.
A proper occupation which can stimulate one's largest motivation can be really beneficial
to him.Also,choosing the right occupation is profitable to our sociaty.It can make our sociaty
more properious as well as harmonious.
There is no denying that we should take account of all kinds of related factors when we choose
occupation.First,we should consider weather we can take on this job within the limitation of our
majority.Then,we should ask ourselves if we like this job and can we devote the best of our ability
to doing it.In the meanwhile,I think one of the standards to assess weather the occupation is suitable
to us is that if it can stimulate our ambition and encourage us to achieve our great goals.Last but not
least,we can not neglect our financial situation.We can't deny that salary is also a necessary factor which
need to be take seriously.In my opinion,we must clearly recognise our interests、abilities and our
responsibilities.Onlu by considering cautiously can we really choose the right occupation that can make us
develop better.
For me,because I major in medecine and it's my favorite,I really want to be a qualified doctor in the future.
I think it can motivate my largest interests and enthusiastion.On the other hand,I trully want to help prople
remove their pain.I think doctor may be the most proper occupation for me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4c260747-cf7c-30e6-a8e0-92b3f478b5c9> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is almost the most important thing in our whole life. Our job can decide our future life is happiness or not.
As a college student, we may think that choosing the occupation is so far from us, but it's not ture. We are adults, we should do something for our future life, not only study hard, but also think about of our future. If we choose a wrong occupation, more than 10 year's hard study will be wasted. And we won't live better or complete our dream. So, in all aspects, choosing a right and proper occupation for ourselves is very important.
However, choosing an occupation is not an easy job. We should think over many things. For example, if this job is relaxing or full of pressure, if this job can make my family and my friends feel good, if this job can let me live happily in this city, if this job can make money, if this job is meaningful or a waste of life, if this job can have possitive mean on our sons or daughters, if this job can give me a long protection of my whole life, amd so on. These things must be thingked over when we choose an occuopation.
I think I wil be a doctor in the future. First of all, I learn about meidical, this has decided my future in some aspects. Then, my family hope I can be a doctor and I love this job. Now I am still studying in the university, so, I will do much better for my dream, for my future.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID a23cac2e-6c7b-3abc-90fb-99bccb9b3e76> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing As a physician, I can better serve the community, back to society, I believe I can become a good doctor is one of our significant decisions of our life. When choosing occupation, we should take
various factors Into account. Such as, we should consider whether we realy like this career, because we only will make every
effort to do the thing that we are Interested in. Then we will make earns relying on it, so we must be good at it and can stand
out it. What's more, the career must have a future, be able to find a high-paying job, because we must rely on it to support the
family.In addition to, the career can bring hope to this community and be able to serve the people.
As to me, my Choosing of Occupation is medicine, when choosing it, I also take the future of the occupation into cosideration.
I think it's a good major and I can find a good job after graduating from the university. Of couse, I like my major. I think I can
Commite myself to it and can do well in it. What's more importantly, As a physician, I can better serve the community, give back
to society, I believe I can become a good doctor!
That's all! Hope everyone can choose his best physician!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 73055ec7-8432-3f55-ae75-362879ad6d5a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know, choosing occupation is very important for us. If we can
choose a good job, we will enjoy it and have a happy life. However, in
case that we get a job which we are not good at, we will failed in our
life. In a word, choosing a good job is important.
Of course, we should think about many aspects when we choose job. Such
as payment, and so on. Payment play a important role in occupation. But
a good job is not decided only by its payment. We also need to consider
other aspects. Interest is important, too.
As far as I am concerned, doctor is not bad. In other words, I want to be
a doctor in future. Doctor may be very tired and nervous. But they have a
high payment. To be frank, high payment is attractive for me. Last but not
least, I am interested in being a doctor. Because I can help many people
keep away from disease. In addition, I can keep my family healthy.
Choosing occupation is important for all of us in our life, we can not
be careless.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 064ecad2-b48a-303d-9510-5fbeae56ec8a> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Nowadays, there are a variety of occupations in the world. And choosing occupation is one of the most important decisions in our life. Because when you choose your occupation after the senior high, it merely means that you will do this from now on.
While choosing occupation, we should think of a plenty of reasons seriously. Some of the occupation is warmly welcomed by a lot of students, who are affected by their parents that admire their income or little working time. Well, mostly the occupation we ordinary choose can support our basic need, and we can live a simple life. So in some way, we must follow our own thought. What’s more, we can’t deny that some occupations are not proper to us. We should see our advantages and disadvantages before we choose occupation.
What I choose is the doctor. When I graduate from the senior high, I don’t know what other occupation is. I don’t know if I choose the other occupation, where I can work. I’m at a loss. Just as what I said, I followed my parents advice. Now I thought it is too hard. However, since I have made the choice, I ought to face it, try to love it and become a qualified doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 7ca971f8-cf1b-38b6-ac1e-928b0d8196d2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no deny that everyone longs for a happy life and a sensable career.Accordingly,in our lives, choosing occupation is a decision that matters a lot to anyone.And we can say,it determines a person's life.Only having a suitable occupation,a person can do his best and achieve success more possibly.
However,we all know that it is far from an easy thing and there are various kinds of factors which we are supposed to take into consideration.Firstly,we should choose an occupation that is suitable to us and can draw our interests.So,we are willing to take every efforts to do it well.What's more,the occupation must be in your field you majored in university.Moreover,you have to know this occupation very well such as its daily job,the characters it needs,the employment and so on.In a word,before choosing,you must have a deep thought and determine it cautiously.
As for me,becoming a doctor is always my dream,and because of that,I choosed my major in my university.Therefore,I will work hard towards the gole.And I believe,I will do it well.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 1096f712-44ba-306d-bf1a-f0bf9329c6ff> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
It means to all an exceptionally important decision throughout life to choose an occupation ,especially
an relatively satisfying one.Choosing occupation is also an exceedingly demanding stuff for the majority of
us and we are not confident while making a choice all the time for there are so many factors which need to be taken
into account.
As far as I am concerned,we are supposed to lay emphasis at least on points listed.The first and the most
important is the interest towards the occupation,which is surely attached to our lifelong happiness.Then,whether
the payment could cover our daily comsume and bare necessaties.What is more,the major you are in must be
accounted. Last but not the least,you are advised to listen to suggestions from people around you,especially
the older and senior.
Personally,I have not done the choice totally,but doctor at present.I am going to lay solid foundation in my
further college years and the decision is likely to be made in future.What I have been thinking the most is that
my occupation should benefit the sake of not only me and my family but the whole human society,and I have an ideal vision.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID acdc0cac-f888-3a46-bbb5-088cb7f926a2> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important decision in our life because it has an effect on our development.
As we all know, it isn't easy to choose an appropriate job and we have to consider many aspects.One of the important factors is our interest.If we choose a job that we dislike, we will not have passions in our work when we do something.In addition of this, salary also calls for much attention.We choose a job to earn money to severe our essential life.Moreover, we have to pay attention to the job if it can put our dreams into practice.That is to say, we have chance to devote ourselves to our career to make our secioty more advanced and hormonous.
In my view, being a doctor is the best choose for me.It provides me an oppotunity to help others, which makes me feel happy and content.What's more, I think I will be immered in this job and have enough passion to do my best in the future because it is my initial dream .

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID d35d1f56-a7e6-3e30-9097-8295e6915161> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
In the morden world ,attention is paid to choose a great job more and more often and everyone of us wants to have a positive job that we go for.
As you know ,choosing a great occupation plays a essential role in people's life ,which maybe sounds a bit exciting ,Well ,how to choose and what are the fators that influence your chorice are the questions that you should focus on. Fiast of all ,you need a talk to your parents about what is your favorite and your friends are also good ones to consult.And then you should think of that could you insist on your job and is it positive in the future? What's more you should think of some extra elements about your job such as fare and so on.
In a word ,holding a confident heart ,I support that I am a man who is ready to help people all the time ,consequently I study medicine now.By the way,you must believe yourself when you make up your mind to do the occupation and as the old saying has it :if you can ,you can.Thus ,go for it!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 837eb54c-47be-31f9-b661-a8f430525167> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
For everyone,occupation is a vital item.It's crucial to choose a satisfying,high-pay and significant job.One's job may influence his or her whole life and even their families.For the sake of the above,you must be more and more careful to make such a great decision.
Before we choose the occupation,the following factors should be taken into consideration.First,the choice must be suitable for your major.Only if you do that,can you perform well when you are facing the task.What you learn in college is what you will use in work.Second,you are supposed to like your occupation.If someone want to accomplish the task perfectly,he must be interested in what he do first.So he will devote himself into the job and do it well.Finally,salary also can't be ignored.For most people,they work for a living.So,a bad payment can't work for that.
I choose to be a doctor and I like the sacred profession.To save more people suffering from many severe diseases,I will work hard and achieve my dream.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8adbdd78-05c5-3064-9207-2ae39a15ec06> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As more and more students graduate from college,the situation of choosing occupation is more and more serious.Some graduates don't know what should they consider first.Interest or salary?They are confused.
It's a common sense that choosing occupation is a decision which is of vital importance in one's life.That's why so many high school graduates and their parents are so anxious when they choose what they plan to major in in college,because their major decide their occupation in some degree.
Therefore,choosing occupation should be very careful.You should think about all kinds of things,like salary,workplace,worktime,your interest,your boss,your development in the future,etc.For instance,if one chooses occupation depending more on salary,he may be dull after several years.Whereas,if one chooses occupation just thinking about what he like to do rather than salary,he could break down because of the lack of money and the loss of passion.In a word,everyone should think twice or more when choosing occupation.
As for me,choosing occupation is a very hard thing.I still remember when I choosed which college should I apply to and which profession should I major in,I had a headache.Finaly,I made my decision after consulting many people.In my opinion,we should choose occupation which can gives us enough life resoures and provides us with continuing interest.Thus,we can have the passion of work every day.
As a conclusion,choosing occupation should be a very careful and serious process.Better occupation,better life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID ca8f54b6-b576-31c6-9aac-d64695d2b4f3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As is well known,occupation is very important in our whole life. A good job
will make our life more colorful while a bad one will make our life meaningless.
Especially in the current condition, it is difficult to fing a good job , so,
what can we do to face the challege?
One thing that we should know first is different occupations will make our
life different.  When we choose our job, we usually consider money first rather
our interests, so, many people can make enough money but they are not happy at
all. Someone choose occupations because the company is near to their home or
the city is beautiful while others is just wanting to make a living. In short,
people' opinions and decisions very in a different way , everyone has his own choice.
personally speaking, I will choose the job that I am interested in. We will
do the work at least for several decades, I do not intent on looking the work as suffering.
I think the work should be enjoyment. We do it because we like it rather than just
makeing a living. Another reason is I choose to be a doctor because I want to help
more people who are suffering. Being a doctor is my dream and I like it, everyone should
pursue his own dream. Only when we do this, can we have a unique tomorrow. So, be
careful when we make decisions. Good future is in our own hands.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2747df75-0ac5-3b29-a276-d3fff3a0b671> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all known,it is very important to chose our occpation.And choosing one's occupation is a very momentous decision in
one's life.But when we come to  choose an occcupation, we must pay attention to a lot of details,and here are my opinions.
Generally,people are likely to care about how much money they can get from their job.Everyone is more willing to have
a job with a high pay.So it is very popular to major in finance in college.Next,I think it is also very important to care about
the stabliablity of the job.If you don't want to be in the pressure of unemployment and strong compitition,you are more likely
to choose a job ,such as a teacher or a doctor.And especially for women.Besides,many people choose their jobs according to the needs
of the market,or according to their personal hobbies.So it is very common for people to work for new and modern industries.Or to
be a musician according to their talents.All in all,there are many factors for people to choose there jobs,and those are only
pieces of them.
For me, I think I want to be a doctor.As a girl who likes to help others and who is full of patience,also
as a person who likes to be busy , there is nothing but doctor is suitable for me.Though it is very hard to major in medicine,
and it is also very hard to get a good job in a excllent hospital in today's world, I still want to be a doctor, who can reduce
the pity of the patients and save lifes.In my opinion,it is very hornorable for someone to become a doctor.I am sure I will be
proud of my choice in the future.
Those are my opinions,what about your's?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 52351e94-990d-3ac2-a891-0e8fb29da2e3> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a significant decision for everyone. Because the choice will have influence on our lives. Making the right choice, we may not live very happily. But the wrong choosing mostly make us regretted.
At the same time, we must think about the impacts in all sides when choosing occupation. We must count on our majors and choose correct jobs. After all, most people have to work using what we have learned. Also, we have to think about our ability to do the work. And we know the same work can be divided into different levels. What's more, we have to research the varied market requirements. And what's the most important for us is to know we belong to which level. Moreover, if we don't want to live far away from our hometown, we can choose to have a job near it;if we love some city, we can decide to work in that city.
I am a medical student. My first choosing is doctor who wearing white clothes can save patients. Loving my birthplace deeply, I hope to go back and work for it. At the same time, I can take care of my parents.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 542facc7-f5c8-3cca-841f-71a9e661eb10> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is one of the most important things in one's life.Your choice is so important that it will have an effect on your later life condition.So  we are supposed to try to find what we are interested in even from a very young age,thus we can know clearly about our ideal job.
Choosing occupation,however,is far from an easy job.In order to choose the one which suits us most,we must take everything into consideration.Above all,we should lay emphasis on our own interests only because that as a saying goes,interest is the best teacher.In addition,choosing occupation also has something with one's personality.That is,for people with a variety of characteristics,there are different types of occupations for choosing.Choosing the one in which you feel comfortable and feel that you are useful is very important.And,last but not the least,of course payment is worth to be considered.
As for myself,my choice is to be a doctor.Why?The reasons are as follows.
Firstly,my grandmother is a doctor,and she always tells me something about medical science when I was very young.So during that period of time I developed an interest in medicine.Secondly,in my opinion I think I'm quite careful and serious.Dealing with patients doctors are required to have such characteristics.I'm willing to help others,also.Thirdly,doctor is a steady job and it is well paid.As has been said above,I choose medicine as my ideal occupation.
Well,what about you?I hope that you can find your favorite job,thus leading a happylife.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 337c2593-ab0c-3066-95ca-a0a9ac86f0fc> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
There is no doubt that chooseing occupation is one of the most important things
in life to everyone. Almost all of us have ever dreamed what lives we will lead
in the future, especially what job we will have. However, in fact ,when we face
up to choose, we considerate a lot. The chances are that we choose a job which we
do not interested in it very much, but we need it to make a living at first.
Besides, we also take taking after parents and family into consideration.In a
word, there are so mang factors that have a influence on our choose.
As for myself,because my majoy is medicine,so I will be a doctor in a hospital
without any doubt. I am also long for a opportunity to work as a volunteer and
going around the world with my colleages in a group to help more people who need
medicai care but do not have money to get it.
Money is of vital importance in life,but it not stands for the all of life.
Whatever we do in the future, we must realize that we live for ourselves. Only get our
favourate job, can we be happy and enjoy our colorful lives.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 64a2d8ad-f62e-3a93-a0ed-c34d03eaf6a8> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Longing for a better life, almost all the people are desire for perfect jobs nowadays. However, everyone who is finding a good occupation must be faced with the serious problem : what kind of occupation is fit for me. In other words, how can we choose the correct jobs for ourselves among these options?
Because of the importance of the choice for your life, we should think over before make decisions first. Related to the enthusiasm，we'd better do things which we are intersted in so that we can make huge achievement in this field. On the other hand, the outlook of your choice is as important as its intersts. By no means can we take useless things as our jobs. Last but not least, whether it is covenient or not for you to do is also a aspect.
In my opinion, to be a doctor is a perfect job for me. I can use what I knows to help people  in pains to make them feel better. In addition, the uniform of doctors is handsome! So, I'd like to be a doctor one day!

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 660209c2-a490-3045-b191-1b50dffe90ed> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all knew, occupation is a very significant part in our life. So it is important to choose our own occupation. But what should we do when we are choosing our occupation.
In my opinion, choosing occupation should consider many aspects. First of all, what is your interest is vital to make your decision. It is a life occupation, and you mast like it. What's more, Innovation power is also important. Because of The innovative society, Innovation power has became more and more major. In other word, if you don't  have Innovation power, you are out. last but not least, your should consider your family's ability that allow you to choose your favorite occupation.
As far as I am consider, A computer student is my occupation, no matter now and forever. And I will study to realize the dream. Only in this way, I will be happy, and have a batter life.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4d1ac985-cd96-3303-b1fc-2f44280c8376> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Occupation is indeed an important part of one's life,for that more than one third of human's life(for about 30 years or more) will be spent on it.Choosing occupation is one of the greatest decision in our life.
So,how to choose a occupation currectly?I believe that many factors should be taken
into consideration.For example,ability,interest,salary and so on.It sounds not very easy
to do the decision.
As far as I am concerned,I think my futuer may be a physical researcher,in material field.Because I have great interest in material development.It will be very interesting and exciting to find or form a new kind of material,do experiences that nobody had ever
done before.The knowledge both I have got and I will get will provide the ability.Also
the salary is considerable.I do not know if this decision will be the final one,but it
must be a considerable one.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 86e0212f-2aff-3c1c-a501-ef519c909a2c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is a very important dicision in our life. In general,a well-choosed position can benefit one's whole life.
To choose a more suitable occupation, you have to consider many aspects carefully. First of all, the job you choose must be relitated to the professtional knowledge you own. It is much more harder to start a job without any fondition. Secondly, you have to compare the payment that compay offers. The payment not only include the salary, but also the holiday and the chance to study abroad, which is far more valuable than money. Last but not the least, the gold rule of chooing occupation is "follw your heart." Interest is the best teacher. Only if you have a extreme passion on your job can you show great creativity and perform excellent in daily work.
As for me, I will choose to be a doctor in the future, for I am a medicial student. To be honest, I have been dreaming about treating folks around me since I was a child. Curing paitions gives me a sence of happiness. I believe that being a doctor is the best choise for me.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 5e4c9b5f-f766-3e74-aaa5-14428ce0801c> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As a college student，it is the high time to think about choosing occupation and to start to prepare for it. Choosing occupation is a great important decision in our whole life, because of it will decide our direction and even living standard in the future.
With this decision being so important, consequently we need to consider many aspect when we choose our occupation. Firstly we need to find out our interest. Interest will affect us most in the future, and if you choose something you do not really like and you will need to work in this major, you will never find joy and can never konw how happy it will be when you are immersed in something you like. Secondly, people are always born with some talents, and you should never doubt that. It will be much easier to work at something you are good at since you just knew it like you are gifted. Thirdly, people always say that character can decide you fortune, so take this part into consideration, and asking someone who really know you for some advice can be helpful.
As for me, a clinical medicine student, to be a doctor is the best choice I have, and fortunately, it is what I am interested in and maybe gifted in. More specifically, I would like to be a surgeon to heal people's wound and help them to get rid of pain, and it is exactly what I dreamed of since I was very young.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 8c4930d6-6c38-301f-941a-661407fd643d> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
As we all know,choosing occupation is an essential decision of our lives.As a result,there is no doubt that we should take
all kinds of cases into account when choosing occupation.So,what would you do to choose your occupation?
As for me,I would like to choose a job that I like as well as fit for me,and in order to achieve my goal,I will do as follows.
First,I will make what I really like more specific so that I won't make the decision just because of a flash idea.Maybe I will
ask others for suggestions to find which kind of work suit me better. Second,I will try to collect as more information as possible.
Analying the information,I can get a rough idea to improve myself,which will do me a great favour to realize my dream.Next,I
will ask some people who are expert at the job for help.I am sure their advice will be of great vaule. What's more,I will work
hard all time so that I can mantain enough professional knowledge,which will perform a vital role in my work.
I've shown my plan for choosing occupation.How about yours?

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 4c56936a-8fb7-3e2a-a89a-e169b76caa44> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation is an important part in one’s life. It is a so important chioce that it decides the foundation of our economy,mood,health and living environment ,enev our sons and daughters' furture.Thus,making good occupation choices is also difficult.A good job is the key to a fortunate life.
So ,how to choose a suitable job? I think we should consider two question. The first one is “what do I like?”We must choose a job we like so we can study it for a long time. And it make easier to get a good mark. If we get a major we don’t like at all. It will be a cumbersome. So whether the job we like is the first to be considered. The second quest is that “what does the society need?” we have to choose a job that many people need, so that we can play a part in society and make more money. So when we choose the job, we’d better to think about these question.
I choose the medicine, and I love my job. I believe I will study hard to make a good doctor.

<TITLE Choosing Occupation> <ESSAYID 2625a653-dee3-3f28-a63a-65b2e8743efb> <SCHOOL SDU> <SCORE ?>
Choosing occupation impacts on the foundation of our economy,mood,health and living environment.SO choosing occupation is important and difficult in our life.
As the saying goes,"Suitable for their own is the best".What the best to us?
We should prepared to consider some factors.A good example is that we should choose that we like most.
Furthermore we should consider what fits us most.besides we have to think our family and health.
Considering those reasons,I choose to majoy in medicine.I have much passion in this occupation.To be a doctor is my dream.During my study, I think I am making my dream come ture
,so I am willing to study this subject.Ater gruation ,I can take care of my family and my friends.What a good dicision that I make.



